,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Scientist,$60k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description *
We're looking for an advanced mathematician who has the ability to think in entirely new ways. This person should be excited to solve complex problems by applying the combination of a deep mathematics background with intuition and the feedback of experts in the field.

The successful mathematician at Event Dynamic will utilize strong problem-solving skills, significant programming experience, and business analytics to solve real-world dynamic pricing problems at scale. This role will be highly involved in the development of the core AI-driven pricing product and will be expected to make key business decisions on complex real-world problems. This position will interface with the subject matter experts and machine learning team to communicate business impacts of technical decisions.
Job Responsibilities*
Automation of the ML pipeline and development of models to scale. Generalization of pricing models for new use cases. Collects, creates, ingests, analyzes, evaluates, and iterates through datasets to explore key features, develop training data sets, and create new models.
Performs Feature Engineering on the ML pricing models. Works within a team of data science professionals and digs into complex technical problems. Reports back on findings and technical decisions to subject matter experts.
Will show drive and initiative to push the core product and technology forward. Collaborates with cross-cutting team of executives, product managers, clients, software engineers, and data scientists.
Requirements*
A bachelor or master’s, or PhD degree in a highly quantitative field (Computer Science, Machine Learning, Operational Research, Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering etc.) or equivalent experience.
Minimum of two years’ experience utilizing advanced mathematics and/or machine learning techniques to solve real-world problems. Experience writing code to build complex data pipelines.
Experience using Python and ML libraries, pandas preferred
Minimum of four years’ experience in software development and data analysis.
Excellent verbal and written communication. Ability to present complex technical findings to a team of subject matter experts.
Company Description*
Event Dynamic’s technology is the most sophisticated ticket pricing system in the world. We employ artificial intelligence and advanced mathematics to automate ticket pricing, delivering smart and adaptive prices that puts lost revenue back in the hands of primary rights holders of live events.

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
software development: 4 years (Required)
Machine Learning: 2 years (Required)
data analysis: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)",3.1,"Event Dynamic
3.1","Dallas, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
1,Data Scientist,-1,"Data Scientist

Programming in R and Python
Data ingestion and data cleaning
Model building, testing, deployment, and maintenance Building visualizations
Presenting and explaining output
Executive presentations and discussions
Adherence to internal standards in data science Collaboration across functions and business units
Minimum qualifications
Master Degree
Academic study or independent training in computational, quantitative, or technical fields, such as computer science, math, physics, or statistics
Working knowledge of Python, C++, and Statistics
Quantitative and technical skills in math and computer science Community engagement, involvement, and volunteerism Demonstrated leadership and change-making
Strong communication skills

Qualifications
Enthusiastic about pursuing an interdisciplinary career in data science, analytics, and technology Research and/or practical experience in related fields
Demonstrated work experience through part time employment, internships, or professional endeavors",4.3,"Liberty Personnel Services
4.3","Philadelphia, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
2,Data Scientist,-1,"About us

Boxy Charm was founded in 2013 and continues to be a leader in the beauty subscription box industry experiencing immense growth of more than 100% year over year. We work with some of the hottest brands including Butter London, Dr. Brandt, Elemis, GlamGlow, Smashbox, Tarte, Too Faced and many more.

Today, Boxy Charm has a community of more than 2.4 million followers across its social media platforms, 10 million monthly visitors online and is the #1 searched beauty box brand on YouTube. In 2018, Inc magazine named it as one of the fastest growing companies in the nation. Boxy Charm is headquartered in South Florida and has an office in Toronto, Canada.

About you

Boxy Charm is seeking a Data Scientist who will use a range of data science and machine learning methodologies to build solutions for a variety of business initiatives. Additionally, the ideal candidate will be able to solve complex problems and apply those solutions within a cutting-edge cloud-based technology platform.

The role will be filled with a solution-oriented candidate that thrives on working in a highly dynamic and engaging environment.

What you will be doing
Work closely with different business units and translate high level business problems into actionable deliverables for the Data & Algorithms team
Work with a wide variety of data ranging between social media and email to customer transactions and logistics
Develop a variety of machine learning models including customer recommendations, customer propensity, forecasting, and marketing performance.
Collaborate closely with the Software Development and DevOps teams to ensure continued delivery of high-quality data through our data processing pipeline
Partner with various business stakeholders and implement solutions that improve their business process
Conduct big data analysis using SQL, Python, Snowflake, Spark and other technologies
Break down complex projects and problems into actionable tasks that be delivered quickly and iteratively and provide value to the business stakeholders
Key Understandings
Customer lifetime value, regression analysis, cohorts, retention, customer lifecycle, customer segmentation, machine learning, large-scale data analysis, classification and propensity modeling
What you will bring to the table
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Math, Statistics or a related field
3+ years of experience programming in languages such as Python, Java, Scala, Ruby, R
3+ years of experience working with SQL and relational databases
3+ years of experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, and data mining techniques
Experience with one or more machine learning algorithms such as neural networks, regression, clustering etc.
Working experience with machine learning technologies such as TensorFlow, Keras, ScikitLearn, H20.ai, MXNet, Caffe, Gluon etc. is highly desirable
Experience working in an Agile (SCRUM, XP etc.) development environment
Experience with AWS or other cloud environments is desirable
Knowledge of Big Data and NoSQL systems such as Snowflake, Hadoop, Spark, MongoDB, etc. is a plus",3.1,"Boxy Charm
3.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Beauty & Personal Accessories Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
3,"Data Analyst, Senior",$74k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

Leidos is a Top 10 Health IT provider drawing on decades of success in delivering solutions to meet the healthcare challenges of today. Our unique position as a technology company with deep health and life sciences expertise equips us to transform patient care, as well as provider and payer operations in commercial and government health organizations. Everything we do is built on a commitment to do the right thing for our customers, our people, and our community. We’re looking for talented people to join our team and help us revolutionize the future of health.

The Senior Data Analyst designs and develops methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse sources including big data sources. Develops and uses advanced software programs, algorithms, querying and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate datasets and models complex business problems. Is familiar with disciplines such as Natural Language Processing, Machine Learning, Predictive modeling, Statistical Analysis and Hypothesis testing. Works with cross-discipline teams in order to ensure connectivity between various databases and systems. Identifies meaningful insights and interprets and communicates findings and recommendations. May develop information tools, algorithms, dashboards, and queries to monitor and improve business performance. Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.

Primary Responsibilities

The Senior Data Analyst will have experience in consolidating data by designing and developing methods and processes. Will have experience in developing software programs, algorithms and automated processes to evaluate datasets and models. Will have experience in using software programs, algorithms and automated processes to evaluate datasets and models. Will have experience in ensuring connectivity between various databases and systems.

Will have the ability to interpret and communicate findings and recommendations. Will have experience in monitoring business performance by developing tools, algorithms and dashboards. Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.

Basic Qualifications

Familiarity with Natural Language Processing, Machine Learning, Predictive modeling, Statistical Analysis and Hypothesis testing.
Experience with analysis stemming from multiple databases: SQL Server, Oracle, MySQL
Ability to work with cross-discipline teams.
Proficient MS application knowledge (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, SharePoint).
Excellent analytical and organizational skills.
Ability to work with the customer to define requirements.
Excellent writing and research skills

Preferred Qualifications

Expertise in working with National VHA program deployment centered on patient scheduling (VistA, VSE, Cerner, etc.)

External Referral Bonus:
Ineligible

Potential for Telework:
Yes, 100%

Clearance Level Required:
NACI

Travel:
Yes, 10% of the time

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
5
Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
4,Data Analyst,$38k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Big Huge Games is looking for a qualified Data Analyst to help provide data insights to our games teams and upcoming BHG titles to assist them in making successful strategic and game direction decisions. This role works closely with our Product and Design teams to structure quantitative questions, gather player data, employ statistical methodology in analysis of the data, and construct insightful reporting and visualizations to communicate those results to the wider team.

Responsibilities
Provide reports and monitoring tools to assist team in daily game health assessment
Perform in-depth analysis of game metrics to inform and support both short and long-term product direction decisions
Communicate the results of analyses to the product team, game studio, and outside partners through data visualization and presentations
Qualifications
3-5 years experience with querying large complex data sets with SQL on relational databases
Several years experience performing quantitative analysis preferably with a games, web, or technology focus
High level of proficiency in data visualization tools such as Tableau, Excel, or equivalent
Passion for problem solving, from generating insightful questions to research, through presentation of results and follow-on steps
Track record of success working in fast-paced environments with shifting priorities and deadlines
Ability to work in both individual and team settings
Excellent organizational, communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, or another quantitative field
About Big Huge Games:

Big Huge Games is a small, passionate team led by experienced game development veterans, proudly located just north of Baltimore, MD, who are excited about the rise of touchscreen platforms. We believe in hiring talented team members who enjoy working in a fun and positive environment.

The company was founded in March of 2013 by Brian Reynolds (Civilization II, Rise of Nations, FrontierVille) and a group of longtime collaborators. Big Huge Games is dedicated to ""Finding The Fun"" through rapid prototyping and a focus on great user experience.

In July 2015 we launched our first game, DomiNations, which was awarded “Editors Choice” in the app store and continues to be successful with audiences across the globe. In 2016 we were acquired by our publisher, Nexon, and now operate as a wholly-owned subsidiary, allowing us the stability of a larger studio but the feel of a smaller, indie game team.

Our goals are simple: Make great games, strive to always be improving, and live up to the motto you gotta have fun to make fun.

This a full-time position onsite at our studio in Timonium, MD.
Due to the circumstances surrounding COVID19 positions will begin remote before transitioning to onsite.

Applicants should download DomiNations on iOS or Android and be prepared to discuss the game.",4.9,"Big Huge Games
4.9","Timonium, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
5,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"A trusted partner at nearly three million commercial customer locations, Ecolab (ECL) is the global leader in water, hygiene and infection prevention solutions and services. With annual sales of $13 billion and more than 45,000 associates, Ecolab delivers comprehensive solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service to advance food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, optimize water and energy use, and improve operational efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, hospitality and industrial markets in more than 170 countries around the world.

Ecolabs Institutional division, serving the restaurant and hospitality market, is seeking a business focused Data Scientist to unlock the value in data assets while creating new and unique offerings for customers. As a data scientist in the Advanced Analytics organization, you will play a pivotal role in planning, executing and delivering machine learning-based projects. The bulk of the work will be in machine learning (ML) modelling, management and problem analysis, data exploration and preparation, data collection and integration, as well as operationalization. You will be a key interface between the advanced analytics team and the business unit and various other departments (such as IT). Candidates need to be very much self-driven, curious and creative.

In this role, we are looking for:
A problem-solving mindset with the ability to understand business challenges and how to apply your analytics expertise to solve them.
The unique person who can present complex mathematical solutions in a simple manner that most will understand including customers.
An individual excited by innovation and new technology and eager to finds ways to employ these innovations in practice.
A team mentality empowered by the ability to work with a diverse set of individuals.
Whats in it For You:
Opportunity to take on some of the worlds most meaningful challenges, helping customers achieve clean water, safe food, abundant energy and healthy environments.
Ability to make an impact and shape your career with a company that is passionate about growth.
Support of an organization that believes it is vital to include and engage diverse people, perspectives and ideas to achieve our best.
What you will do:
Problem Analysis and Project Management.
Inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of artificial intelligence.
Collaborate across the business to understand IT and business constraints.
Manage data science projects and the corresponding key performance indicators (KPIs) for success.
Data Collection and Integration.
Understand new data sources and process pipelines and catalog/document them.
Acquire access to various databases and other sources systems such as SQL or graph databases.
Create data pipelines for more efficient and repeatable data science projects.
Data Exploration and Preparation.
Apply statistical analysis and visualization techniques to various data.
Generate hypotheses about the underlying mechanics of the business process.
Test hypotheses using various quantitative methods.
Display drive and curiosity to understand the business process to its core.
Network with domain experts to better understand the business mechanics that generated the data.
Machine Learning.
Apply various ML and advanced analytics techniques to perform classification or prediction tasks.
Acquire domain knowledge and integrate it into ML solutions, for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing.
Testing of ML models, such as cross-validation, A/B testing, bias and fairness.
Operationalization.
Collaborate with ML operations, data engineers, and IT to deploy ML solutions.
Follow established best practices around ML production infrastructure.
Network with internal and external partners.
Upskill yourself (through conferences, publications, courses, local academia and meetups).
Collaboration with other technical teams within the organization.
Encourage and leverage the reuse of artifacts.
Be encouraged and expected to innovate and be creative in your data analysis, problem solving and presentation of solutions.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 3+ years related experience, or
Masters Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 1+ years of related experience
Experience working with statistics/analytics/visualization tools, preferably in the Microsoft Azure Suite.
Preferred Qualifications:
Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics.
Experience working in Python/SQL/Jupyter.
Self-driven, curious and creative with a collaborative mindset.
Demonstrated ability to work in diverse, cross-functional teams in a dynamic business environment.
Strong communication and presentation skills.
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

At Ecolab, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.

In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce. Ecolab is a place where you can grow your career, own your future and impact what matters.

We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",3.7,"Ecolab
3.7","Saint Paul, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1923,Company - Public,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
6,"Scientist-Engineer, Analytical Development, MSAT",$58k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scientist-Engineer, Analytical Development, MSAT

The Scientist-Engineer, MSAT performs process and analytical experimental studies as part of a team that is effectively delivering cell therapy services to clients in accordance with defined scope of work, timelines, and budgets. This includes leading projects in process development, technology transfer and continuous improvement of our client's novel manufacturing processes. Our goal is to support our clients in developing commercially viable cell therapy products, so that they can become accessible to all.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities

Accountable for the design and execution of experimental studies in the laboratory, for example:
Perform laboratory experiments for client projects; perform analytical testing for client projects
Preparation and scheduling of laboratory equipment for experiments
Provide technical leadership of client products during manufacturing and development, for example:
Direct technical communication with clients during manufacturing and development
Support manufacturing in identifying and resolving manufacturing process constraints
Lead the generation of manufacturing and development documentation, for example:
Generating experiment protocols and reports for development projects
Generating draft batch records and other manufacturing documentation
Generating manufacturing risk assessments, such as FMEA
Perform data analysis to reach actionable conclusions, for example:
Compile and analyze experimental data
Present experimental data internally and externally to clients

Qualifications

Minimum of a Bachelor's degree in relevant life science or engineering discipline
Minimum of 3 years' experience in aseptic cell processing, cell culture and cell analytics under the guidance of scientific protocols
Demonstrated ability to deliver projects to specific timelines and budgets
Experience in working effectively and delegating tasks in a team-based environment
Demonstrated ability in technical writing and the preparation of, protocols and reports, presentations and/or other communications
Basic understanding of the technical principles, theories and concepts of cell therapy or similar products

Competencies/Candidate Profile

Collaboration, Accountability, Adaptability, Can-do, Technical Capacity, Problem Solving, Customer-centric, Communication

Supervisory Responsibility

No supervisory responsibilities

Minimum Required Training (optional)

Aseptic processing, Good Manufacturing Practice (GMP), communication skills, specific process and analytical equipment

Working Environment

This job may require occasional evening and weekend work

Physical Requirements

N/A

Direct reports

N/A

Other Duties

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $85,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
in a cell therapy, aseptic environment: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Mountain View, CA 94043 (Preferred)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.pctcelltherapy.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.8,"Minaris Regenerative Medicine, LLC
2.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
7,Data Scientist-Senior,$107k-$171k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

Over 10 years of experience and a MA/MS degree.

Typically works on high-visibility or mission critical aspects of a given program and performs all functional duties independently.

Oversee the efforts of less senior staff and/or be responsible for the efforts of all staff assigned to a specific job.

Current TS/SCI clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
8,Data Analyst,$32k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for a Data Analyst to work with product and business teams to find key metrics, monitor data quality/consistency, help identify problems, and propose data driven solutions. The analyst should have in-depth experience with SQL reporting and building dashboards, as well as be a self-starter who is curious and detailed in their problem-solving approach. This job will require heavy reporting in SQL Server.

Requirements
Create and maintain complex SQL reporting for product and business teams as well as external clients.
Create Health Check metrics for monitoring data quality and consistency.
Design and build automated reporting dashboards on our FoundryBI platform.
Use statistical analysis to generate clear and effective recommendations.
Proactively analyze data for key insights and metrics.
Ability to understand business operations as a whole and translate questions into effective analysis based on the goals behind the specified task.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree with a minimum GPA of 3.5 in Computer Science or a related field of study.
1-4 years of experience writing optimized and reusable SQL code.
Knowledgeable in either R or Python preferred.
Experience with performance tuning and query optimization.
Benefits

When you join Softheon, you will:
Have an opportunity to add value to a diverse team of innovative professionals
Rise to new challenges everyday
Receive competitive salary and career growth opportunities",4.4,"Softheon
4.4","Stony Brook, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
9,Implementation/Data Analytics Consultant,$84k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Congratulations on exploring your career opportunities with FAST and taking the first step to becoming a FASTie! A FASTie? Yes, a FASTie.

FAST-ie’faesteoun

1. an energetic, intelligent, enthusiastic person who works at Fast Enterprises. 2. a person dedicated to modernizing government technology to better serve the general public. 3. someone who is open to adventure and wants to experience new places around the world. 4. someone who enjoys collaboration with clients and camaraderie with teammates while solving business and technology problems.

If the description below speaks to you, take 5 minutes (seriously, only 5 minutes) to apply!

Implementation/Data Analytics Consultantson our team are involved in both the implementation of FAST software and the use of analytics to optimize the business processes that FAST software supports. We have sites across North America and abroad—candidates should be flexible in regard to work locations. This career path typically starts with more emphasis on software implementation and gradually involves more analytics as candidates better understand the business processes FAST tries to optimize.

Candidates should possess a degree in one of the following areas:
Computer or Management Information Systems
Computer Science
Mathematics
FAST may also consider degrees from other areas of study when they are supplemented by technical experience or aptitude.
Employment qualifications include:
Candidates are not required to have a background in data analytics. However, candidates should have an interest in working with data and performing data analysis.
Strong communication skills are imperative.
Exposure to specific technology is not required. However, experience in the following areas is desirable: Data Warehousing or Analytics and extensive knowledge of SQL and Microsoft Visual Basic .NET.
FAST is an equal opportunity employer.
Voluntary Self-Identification Information is requested for U.S. applicants during the application process.",4.4,"Fast Enterprises
4.4","Denver, CO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
10,Data Scientists with TS/SCI,-1,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking Data Scientists with TS/SCI to support a client in Springfield, VA

My name is Stephen Hrutka, and I am the owner of a Veteran-owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

We are looking to hire (2) data scientists to support NGA in Springfield, VA. The role is remote to start, no idea when traditional onsite will begin.

Please see below for the position description. If you’re interested, I'd be glad to provide more details about the role and further discuss your qualifications.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
www.hruckus.com

Position Tasks:
Develop Python or R code to read/categorize large amounts of unstructured data
Develop code to evaluate Intelligence Information Reports (IIRs) for metadata accuracy
Develop code that recognizes and extracts entities from IIRs w/ 90% accuracy
Visualize data derived from structuring of unstructured/semi-structured data
Brief results of code development to leadership to include methods, limitations, and assumptions
Position Deliverables:
Monthly reports
Code modules using Natural Language Processing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Code modules using Entity Recognition to analyze multiple unstructured data files and identify all people, groups, and categories of objects
Code modules using Latent Semantic Indexing to analyze multiple unstructured data files and database the information derived
Develop code that can be stand-alone or incorporated into existing applications
Visualizations of large data sets, bringing forward unobscured data, and enabling personnel to understand the data quickly
Position Requirements:
Government Security Clearance
Minimum of (3) years of experience related to the following areas: parametric and non-parametric statistical methods; visualizing statistical effects in complex datasets; performing statistical data analysis in Python and/or R; providing and explaining clear analytical results in well-written reports
Ability to write and execute queries in SQL
Ability to visualize data with aid of data visualization tools such as Tableau
Bachelor’s degree in computer science or related field
Ability to work in distributed systems and to develop creative solutions to data problems
Experience with database tools
Preferred Qualifications:
Statistical Modeling: 10 years
Natural Language Processing: 5 years
Python and R: 3 years
Latent Semantic Indexing: 5 years
SQL: 3 years
Tableau: 1 year
Entity Recognition: 5 years",5.0,"HRUCKUS
5.0","Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
11,Associate Scientist/Senior Associate In Vivo Scientist Biology,-1,"Company Overview

DTx Pharma, Inc. is a privately-held biotechnology company creating novel RNA-based therapeutics to treat the genetic drivers of disease. The company’s proprietary delivery technology platform utilizes fatty acids as targeting ligands to enable the delivery of oligonucleotide therapies to tissues and cell types throughout the body. In preclinical studies, DTx has demonstrated cellular uptake and broad activity of oligonucleotides in the retina, muscle, heart, neurons, T cells and many other specialized cell types. Based upon the novelty, IP position and data demonstrating the effectiveness of its proprietary fatty acid motifs, DTx has previously received investment, nondilutive funding and other forms of support from Eli Lilly, Eye CRO and the CMT Research Foundation (CMTRF) for its ocular and muscle programs and has received multiple grant awards from the NIH (NCATS, NIA), and the TPEP program of Alzheimer’s Association and Rainwater Charitable Trust to advance its efforts to treat CNS diseases.

DTx Pharma is seeking a highly motivated, results-oriented scientist to join our biology team. This individual will be required to plan and execute in vivo studies to support our leading research and development programs. The successful candidate will be a critical player in our efforts to break open new therapeutic areas for RNA medicines.
Responsibilities: *
Dosing (intravenous, subcutaneous), Bleeding and Tissue collection

Development of functional assays to support muscle and CMT1A programs

Tissue processing to support RNA and protein assays (western, qPCR, Immunohistochemistry)

ELISAs to support pharmacokinetics and serum biomarkers

Breeding and Genotyping

Assay development (Target engagement)

Mechanism of action study design and conception

Data analysis and presentation
Requirements: *
BS or MS with 3-5 years of experience in a biotechnology or pharmaceutical company

Experience developing and executing in vivo experiments

Ability to work well in collaborative fast-paced team environment

Excellent problem-solving and interpersonal skills

Knowledge of computer software and Microsoft applications (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, GraphPad Prism)

Optional but, a plus: Experience in ophthalmology, CNS and/or muscle disorders

Optional but, a plus: Experience with nucleic acid drugs (siRNA, Antisense etc.)

Compensation: Competitive salary, health and dental insurance, benefits, 401k, stock options, gym etc.

Keywords: biologist, scientist, siRNA, biotech, pharmaceutical, drug development, drug discovery, preclinical, animal models, antisense, CRISPR, eye, CNS, neurons, muscle

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Company's website:
dtxpharma.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,DTx Pharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
12,Senior Marketing Data Analyst,$58k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Avant is revolutionizing the world of lending by lowering the costs and barriers of borrowing for everyday people. At our core, we are a technology company that builds advanced platforms and uses custom analytics. Today, we help underserved consumers, the majority of whom get fast funding on our online platform without having to talk to anyone. Tomorrow we plan to use our world class technology and underwriting capabilities to launch new products and bank partnerships that improve people’s financial lives.

We are looking for a highly energetic Marketing Analytics Associate to join our Marketing Team as we grow Avant’s digital banking business, loan, credit card, and more. The right candidate possesses a passion for driving Marketing initiatives using analytical techniques and thrive in the complex environment of experimentation design, marketing optimization, and ROI. This position will report to the Head of Marketing Analytics and work with cross-functional teams consisting of Product, Risk, Operations, and Compliance. Do you want to help a rapidly ascending FinTech company drive its next phase of growth? If so, Avant is looking for you.
What you do at Avant:
Own and drive strategic analytical projects and insights to influence and support Avant’s Marketing initiatives
Perform in-depth Marketing funnel analysis to drive insights on attribution, causation, and incremental lift
Choose accurate metrics for tracking, measuring, optimizing, and improving marketing campaigns across traditional and digital channels.
Drive standardization for data collection procedures to generate information that is relevant for building analytic systems
Develop reports and provide insights behind the data to help marketers be effective.
Collaborate with stakeholders to define and operationalize KPIs for short- and long-term measurements that align with company financial goals and marketing strategy.
Implement and analyze A/B or Multivariate Tests to provide measurable insights to the marketing team on the test data.
Present findings to senior management to drive business and marketing decisions.

Why you are a fit for Avant:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in a field that requires quantitative analysis
Advanced SQL, Python or R
Proficiency with Excel or a similar analytical tool (exposure to Looker, Tableau, PowerBi or similar tools is a plus)
Work experience in Marketing Analytics function
Demonstrative management or leadership experience
Experience with Marketing “tech stack” including (not limited to) Google Analytics, Tealium, Heap, Responsys are a huge plus
Understanding of data architecture and how to structure customer and campaign data
Ability to think strategically to understand key stakeholder requests and advocate for data-driven solutions.
An inquisitive, logical mindset with an attention to details- they matter!
Ability to break down complex issues into manageable pieces
Strong written and oral communication skills with both technical and non-technical audiences
Thrives in a fast paced and dynamic environment
Why Avant is a fit for you:

At Avant, we believe our values make a difference:
-We value, support, and help each other grow
-We are committed to active inclusion and diversity
-We are transparent and believe the best idea wins
-We succeed when our customers succeed
-We get sh!t done… responsibly
-And we keep it fun!

We believe that ideas are more important than titles, everything is more fun together, everyone drives change, and everyone is an owner. While we believe the perks and benefits that we offer are terrific, nothing excites us more than having the ability to collaborate with intelligent, highly-motivated and talented people on challenging problems as we work to change the face of online lending.",3.2,"Avant
3.2","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
13,Data Analyst,$42k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"DEPARTMENT: Analytics
POSITION SUMMARY
NewDay USA is a leading nationwide lender focusing on providing financial solutions to American families. Our analytics team is currently seeking a data analyst to join our team on a full-time basis.
POSITION DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Analyzing business data
Summarizing different analysis results and presenting findings
Conducting business studies on demand
Managing existing reporting services as well as creating and automating ad-hoc reports
Operating enterprise-specific software
Troubleshooting regular dataflow functions
Running and optimizing day-to-day business functions
Managing projects and business accounts
POSITION QUALIFICATIONS
Education/Certification:
Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics, or related fields
Experience:
Strong analytical, business and problem solving skills
Experience with MS Office products
Expertise in MS Excel
Attention to detail
Efficient organizational skills and demonstrated follow-through on deliverables
Strong interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills
Prior operations experience within a financial firm is a plus
Experience with MS SQL Server database and/or the SQL language is a plus

Our Values:
Ship, Shipmate, Self
Training for a Career
World-Class Service
Providing Opportunity
Integrity
Resilience
Giving Back
Our Diversity:
We aim to foster a culture where individuals of all backgrounds feel confident in bringing their whole selves to work, feel included and their talents are nurtured, empowering them to contribute fully to our vision and goals. It is the policy of NewDay USA to ensure equal employment opportunity without discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, alienage or citizenship status, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital or domestic/civil partnership status, disability, veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law.
Benefits:
Health Insurance
401K
Competitive Salary
Uncapped Bonuses
Profit Sharing",3.8,"NewDay USA
3.8","Fulton, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
14,"Senior Data Scientist (Palo Alto, CA or Remote US)",-1,"The Opportunity

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered price and promotions. Eversight's proprietary cloud-based SaaS solution brings AI and continuous experimentation to consumer brands and retailers. Our software acts as a coach, enabling market leaders to transform pricing and promotion strategy for the $3.4 trillion spent in consumer goods retail using intelligent, real-time data and insights.

Reporting directly to the Head of Data Science, you will be at the center of what determines Eversight's success as a company. You will analyze the data and develop production code using the newest Data Science and Machine Learning techniques to determine the optimal prices and promotions for major product manufacturers and retailers that sell these products.

Responsibilities
Research, implement and modify modern Data Science techniques. More specifically:
Build Statistical and Machine Learning models that describe the impact of prices and promotions on shopper behavior, including behavioral pricing effects. You'll need to find middle ground between using flexible modern AI methods and proven classical methods.
Develop Optimization and Experiment Design systems, which determine the best prices to set for each product in each store each week. Finding a good balance on the exploration-exploitation tradeoff will be important.
Design and run pricing experiments across hundreds of stores and tens of thousands of products
Create model validation methods to make sure that our models are accurate and to quantify the impact of our solutions on the clients' bottom line
Work with Product Management to generate ideas and quickly turn them into efficient, well-tested, functioning code (we mostly use Python)
Partner with the Engineering team to create highly scalable solutions
Serve as Data Science expert both within Eversight and for our clients
Lead custom analyses and connect them to actionable Business and Product insights
Help prioritize new feature development by assessing potential impact
Be a go-to resource for science-related questions about the product
Behavioral Profile
Analytical, framework thinker
Comfortable in a fast-paced environment
Highly collaborative
Strong at translating Data Science concepts to non-technical audiences
Business focused; measures work in its contributions to business outcomes and prioritizes effort against deliverables accordingly
Minimum Qualifications
5+ years of relevant experience in Data Science and/or Machine Learning with direct impact on business value
B.S., M.S., or PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Machine Learning, Engineering, Economics, Computer Science or relevant quantitative field
Strong understanding of Generalized Linear Models
Ability to write efficient code in Python
Experience with Hypothesis Testing and Maximum Likelihood Estimation
Preferred Qualifications
Team leadership experience strongly preferred
Startup experience strongly preferred
Experience in A/B testing and Design of Experiments
Agile experience
Experience with NumPy and Pandas (or equivalent experience in R)
Strong in math and statistics: Linear Algebra, Bayesian Methods, Regressions, Calculus
Experience in Machine Learning methods: Neural Networks (Deep Learning, Embeddings, Sequence Modeling, CNN), Tree-based methods (GBDT, Random Forest), Regularization Methods (L1/L2 penalties, Feature Selection, Dimensionality Reduction)
Demand Modeling, Pricing, and Causal Inference experience


Location

Palo Alto, CA

About the Company

Eversight is the recognized leader in AI-powered pricing and promotions. Global brands and retailers rely on the Eversight platform to optimize pricing in response to market conditions and to deliver higher ROI on promotional spend. Eversight's Pricing Suite and Offer Innovation Suite solutions are driving strong margin and sales volume improvements for leading companies such as Coca-Cola, General Mills, Raley's, and Rite Aid. Founded in 2013, Eversight is headquartered in Palo Alto, California, with offices in Chicago and New York.",4.2,"Eversight
4.2",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
15,Epitaxy Scientist,$36k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities
Develop, optimize and characterize III-nitride LED epi structures
Improve epi material quality and LED performance
Analyze growth and characterization data and correlate to device performance
Lead epi development projects to improve epi and chip yield
Summarize R&D results and prepare reports
Transfer new developments to production
Make recommendations for new/improved characterization techniques to solve material and device issues
Make suggestions for MOCVD hardware improvements
Other duties as assigned
Minimum Requirements
PhD/MS in Material Science, Electrical Engineering or other related science or engineering discipline
PhD with 2+ years or MS with 5+ years of hands-on experience with MOCVD nitride epitaxy and material characterization techniques (XRD, AFM, SEM, TEM, PL, etc.)
Strong background in semiconductor material science and epitaxial growth
US Citizen or Permanent Resident
Skill Requirements
Strong self initiative and motivation
Must be organized, detailed, and thorough
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Ability to summarize data and prepare reports
EEO Statement

Sensor Electronic Technology, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All applicants will be provided equal consideration without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, genetic information, military status, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or protected veteran status in accordance with applicable federal, state and local laws.

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
SETi
Company's Facebook page:
SETi
Work Remotely:
No",3.1,"Sensor Electronic Technology, Inc
3.1","Columbia, SC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
16,Staff/Lead Data Engineer,$80k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart + $ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2300 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart + $ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

As a Staff Engineer with Freedom Financial Network in its Tempe, AZ or San Mateo, CA office, you will contribute directly to the success of the business and have a meaningful impact on our customers’ lives.

We are looking for seasoned engineers to bring new and innovative ideas and tackle challenges across the full-stack. We believe in building teams that are passionate about solving complex problems and ready to grow and evolve alongside our expanding business and technology footprint.

THE ROLE:

Lead product requirements and advanced analytics requirements gathering efforts, interfacing with Data Engineering, Data Scientists, Analytics, and stakeholder teams •
Work with analytics, data science, and wider engineering teams to help with automating data analysis and visualization needs, advise on transformation processes to populate data models, and explore ways to design and develop data infrastructure
Use technology to solve business problems and drive positive outcomes
Build a scalable technology platform to support a growing business
Deliver high-quality code to production, consistently
Integration with various third-party systems
Play a key role in building out a large scale distributed and event based Data Platform that serves as an underpinning for all of Freedom’s businesses and products

REQUIREMENTS/CHARACTERISTICS:

10 years’ experience building large scale, real-time distributed systems with solid coding, problem-solving, and design skills
Experience working in highly collaborative teams
Ability to demonstrate a team-first attitude towards software development
Hands on Experience with Python, Java, SQL
Experience working with various data stores: SQL, NoSQL, and/or key-value store
Mature engineering practices (CI/CD, testing, secure coding, etc)
Experience with, or willingness to learn:
Event-driven architecture and messaging frameworks (Pub/Sub, Kafka, and/or RabbitMQ)
Cloud infrastructure (Google Cloud Platform, AWS, and/or Azure)

EDUCATION:

Bachelor’s in Computer Science or related field, or relevant experience in software development

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.
Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace a healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted the Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees, most recently #1 in Phoenix for the 2nd year in a row!
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday",3.4,"Freedom Financial Network
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
17,Research Scientist,-1,"ABOUT THE COMPANY*
At Scout Bio (www.scoutbio.co) our mission is to create innovative medicines for companion animals that are more convenient, effective and safe than those currently available.

In collaboration with the Gene Therapy Program at the University of Pennsylvania, we're applying cutting-edge gene therapy technology from the world of human medicine, to companion animal health (dogs and cats).

Our world-class team of human and animal health biotechnology veterans has an enviable track record of success, and now we're looking for a Research Scientist to join our growing, international team.

Join us and play a key role in bringing gene therapy to veterinary medicine, to improve the quality of life for companion animals and their owners.

Our labs are based in the cool, ultra-modern CiC building at 3675 Market Street, Philadelphia (https://cic.com/philadelphia).
ABOUT THE ROLE*
This role within the Research Group of Scout Bio will be responsible for the evaluation and development of novel gene therapy and protein-based therapeutics for companion animals. Reporting to a senior scientist, this role will help lead the progression of projects from discovery to clinical development.

Key duties
Develop and execute experiments to generate preclinical data for product candidates
Develop and optimize purification procedures for therapeutic protein candidates and research reagents
Develop analytical assays to monitor product quality, potency and stability of therapeutic candidates
Provide vital product-development support by performing appropriate analytical assays as required
Participate in scientific meetings with CRO’s and other organizations
Provide technical support for product development activities
Record and organize data for senior scientific staff
Communicate and troubleshoot scientific challenges as they arise
Prepare experimental protocols, scientific reports and SOPs
Communicate data clearly in a variety of contexts, including team meetings, company presentations, writing/publications, and in scientific strategic discussions.
This role will have a close working relationship with all other scientific staff at the company.
ABOUT YOU*
You will have:

_Essential skills knowledge and experience_
A PhD in Biological Sciences with at least 2 years of laboratory experience
Cell culture and aseptic technique
Protein purification at small and medium scale (100ug to 500mg amounts) using HPLC
AAV and antibodies is preferred but not essential
Interpreting Biacore and/or other biosensor data
Analytical assay development
Good communication skills
Good computer skills. Proficiency in the use of Microsoft Office programs
Demonstrated ability to work independently
Excellent attention to detail
Willingness to work as a team
_Desirable skills knowledge and experience_
Formulation and stability protocols
Molecular biology techniques eg cloning, PCR
Immunological techniques
Regulated biotech environments
Writing scientific reports
Excited to work with a diverse, multicultural group of scientists
Ability to adapt to rapidly evolving research environments
Job Type: Full-time

Salary: $55,000.00 - $69,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Laboratory: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.scoutbio.co
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Scout Bio,"Philadelphia, PA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
18,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Machine Learning Engineer*
Are you obsessed with software and machine learning? Looking to work with an awesome team in a modern, successful software company? Geisel Software, based in Worcester, Massachusetts, is a premier software developer that is working with and creating today's hottest software technologies. We are looking for a motivated individual to join our team, learn new technology, and help us build some great software!

Geisel Software develops web, mobile and embedded software, with a focus on robotics, medical devices, and machine learning. We seek a talented individual who is not afraid to work hard, learn something new and get lots of stuff done. We have a helpful staff, but it is also important that you can work independently and solve problems with little outside direction. Your problem-solving skills will be put to the test, whether that means tracking down the answer on Google, or building your own new solution.
Here's what we work with regularly*
TensorFlow and OpenCV
Robotic Simulation with ROS, RVIZ, and Unreal Engine
LAMP - Linux, Apache, MySQL and PHP
iPhone/Android application development
Embedded Development in C/C++ (Arm or x86)
Web Frontend (AngularJS, JavaScript, jQuery, Bootstrap, etc.)
Scripting Languages (Python, BASH, or other)
Web Technologies - HTML5, CSS3, XML, JSON
Linux - As a user at least, but also administration and kernel development
Web Frameworks - Django, Codeigniter
Agile and Waterfall design methodologies
Embedded platforms (Raspberry Pi, BeagleBone, OMAP, etc.)
Here’s what we require*
You're passionate about software development -- it's what you do even in your free time.
1 - ∞ years of experience with C, C++ and/or Python.
Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field (PHD highly preferred).
Willingness and ability to write software as part of a team as well as work on ground-breaking machine learning IP. This role will be a mix of both!
Good software foundational skills: CS theory; clean, well-documented code; collaborative style; solid algorithms understanding; mastery of more than one language.
An aptitude for learning new platforms and technologies on the fly. We’re constantly working on new projects that will push you and keep you always learning new technologies.
Able to take ownership of a project and independently architect, execute and troubleshoot it through completion and customer delivery.
Actively pursuing new knowledge and technologies. If you’re a web frontend guru, are you building your backend skills? If you’re an embedded developer, are you developing apps for Android or iOS?
Already comfortable on Linux. You can be a Windows/Mac pro, but you'll be doing at least 50% of your development on Linux. You should be comfortable with that.
Willing to commute to Worcester, MA (Note: Ability to temporarily work remotely during this trying time of COVID-19).
Looking for full-time employment.
Must be a US Person.
Here’s what we would prefer*
ROS or other robot operating system experience.
An educational focus in Machine Learning and Data Science.
Published work in the field of machine learning.
Robotic simulation and 3D game engine knowledge (Godot, Unreal, Unity, RVIZ, Drake).
Any experience with physical modeling would be a plus.
What you’ll get*
An opportunity to work with the latest technologies across a variety of platforms.
A fun, exciting work environment focused on the results, not the politics.
An experienced team and mentor who can help you grow in your craft and career.
A position with a growing company, offering competitive benefits and salary.
Apply now*
E-mail us at *jobs*@*geisel.software* and *include your resume and a brief cover letter* explaining why you think you'd be a great fit at Geisel Software. We'd love to hear about what you've done with technologies we're using, or other projects you've worked on. What do you think you’re really good at and why? What have you done outside your current job to improve your craft? Why do you think you’d be a great fit?

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.geisel-software.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Geisel Software
5.0","Worcester, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
19,"Data Scientist, Operations",-1,"PicnicHealth is a San Francisco-based, venture-backed health tech startup with the mission of structuring the world's medical data to make it useful. Our business is two-sided: We give patients the first truly useful and complete personal health record by doing all the legwork to collect, digitize, and organize medical records from all of their providers. In addition, patients can support new medical breakthroughs if they choose to contribute their anonymized medical histories to studies PicnicHealth sponsors with leading researchers. Patients get the PicnicHealth service free of charge, life sciences researchers get critical data on how diseases look in the real world, and academic researchers get free access to data sets that drive cutting edge medical research.

It's an exciting time to join the PicnicHealth team - we just announced our Series B raise and are growing quickly in revenue, partnerships, and people. We 3x'd our ARR two years in a row now and on track to continue this trend, building partnerships with over a dozen Life Sciences groups, including 3 of the top 6 Biopharma firms in the US. We're going through a period of hyper-growth - we tripled the size of the team in the last 18 months and we're looking to at least double over the next year. We have a collaborative and engaged team culture that is mission driven and excited about the technology we're building and real solutions we're offering patients.

The Opportunity

At PicnicHealth, data science is at the core of how we cost-effectively retrieve and transform medical records into structured shareable data. Our teams recruit patients to partner's research studies, manage a large workforce of professionals who lend their expertise to the process of extracting clinical information, and build software tools to make these processes efficient. We are looking for a talented data scientist to arm these teams with data-driven insights so they can make informed operational and strategic decisions. This role provides a unique opportunity to work with continuous real-world operations data, to be tightly coupled to the actions taken based on one's analyses, and to drive significant impact within PicnicHealth's core business.

Our ideal team member will have equal parts communication, analytical, and leadership skills. You possess a strong sense of curiosity and a desire to contribute to a business that impacts the daily lives of chronic disease patients, as well as the doctors and scientists helping them. You ask analytical questions and possess the technical know-how to translate models into code, code into numbers, and numbers into operations decisions. You have prior experience analyzing networks, distribution, routing, or other dynamical operations scenarios. You have a strong desire to lead a growing team of data scientists as PicnicHealth scales to meet customer demand. You are a kind, passionate, and collaborative problem-solver who seeks and gives candid feedback.

As a Senior Data Scientist at PicnicHealth you will:
Work with a cross-functional team to model continually-evolving operations scenarios, drive analytical decision, and communicate actionable insights
Become an expert in the data we collect, understanding how to extract timely insights via SQL, and helping evolve our instrumentation to boost insight into company operations
Use PicnicHealth's data to optimize and shape the workflow of professionals tackling a hard problem: collecting and structuring medical histories to empower patients
Take a technical leadership role among a diverse, growing team of data scientists, while helping level up the sophistication of our analyses and processes
Help continue to build a world-class Data Science team, by helping attract, interview, and onboard your future team members during this exciting time of growth
You're a strong candidate if:
You hold a Master's degree with 4 years of industry experience or PhD in a quantitative discipline, such as operations research, applied math, applied statistics, health economics, or a related discipline
You love working with data and have experience exploring it with a critical eye
You are proficient in Python/SQL (or another programming language and are committed to becoming an expert in Python and SQL)
You are an excellent communicator, both oral and written, and can effectively adapt your tone, content, and approach to diverse audiences
You are self-motivated, flexible, proactive, and enjoy coming up with elegant and innovative solutions to challenging problems
You know how to balance attention to detail with execution against tight timelines
You are passionate about our grassroots patient-centric mission to improve healthcare through technology
You are an ideal candidate if you also have experience:
Analyzing efficiency and bottlenecks within real world networks, such as distribution, communications, or transportation networks
Why join PicnicHealth?

At PicnicHealth you get to solve real problems with real solutions, great tech, and great people.

You also get:
Competitive salary
Comprehensive benefits including Health, Dental, Vision
Flexible time off
401k plan
Parental leave
Free PicnicHealth account
Equipment and internet funds while we're working remotely during COVID-19
Due to COVID-19, currently all roles are remote until at least until January 2021. Once in-person work is safe for all team members, this role would be based out of our beautiful office in the Mission District of San Francisco.

Equal Opportunity Statement

PicnicHealth is committed to promoting an inclusive work environment free of discrimination and harassment. We value a diverse and balanced team where everyone can belong.",4.8,"PicnicHealth
4.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
20,Data Analysis Team Lead; Analytics,-1,"We are OANDA:

We are an award-winning global financial services company offering leading currency solutions and online trading platforms for both retail and corporate clients. Our vision is to transform how our clients can meet all of their online trading and currency needs with innovative and award-winning solutions.

Backed by one of the world's largest private equity firms, with significant ambitions to grow the business on the global stage, we are looking for highly motivated, passionate individuals who want to make a mark in a dynamic environment.

About you:
Do you want to work with great people in an energetic and open company culture?
Do you want to make your mark with an Agile team that is re-shaping the future of data and analytics at OANDA?
Do you enjoy collaborating across different disciplines within a company to drive towards a common goal?
Are you passionate about finding efficient solutions to technical problems?
Are you curious about what makes a company succeed?
Is data not just the answer, but the means to asking more questions to you?
If so, we want to hear from you!

In this role you will:
Take responsibility for leading our current team of four independent data analysts based in Krakow
Support and develop your team on a technical basis, helping them devise strategies and best practices to empower them to arm our business partners with the insights they need
Partner with a cross-section of the company including Strategy, Product, Customer Service, Marketing, Sales, Trading, Finance and Compliance, to answer high-level business questions and gain insights from the data you help to collect and manage
Perform data analysis and modeling, create reporting and visualizations and educate the company on your findings
Influence the company's strategic directions by driving data driven decision making across the organisation
Identify and apply statistical and advanced analytical methods with customer teams enabling action-orientated results
Participate in planning sessions with key stakeholders, working with them to understand the business need and then developing actionable insights
Create rapid prototypes with team members leveraging Big Data, traditional database technologies and alternative solutions
Our ideal candidate will:
Be passionate about engineering an efficient solution to a technical problem
Be able to translate complicated business requests into actionable and understandable data insights
Have a Bachelor's/Master's degree in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science or related subjects
Have experience working within Finance or FinTech industries
Have significant experience working in both SQL and Python
Have worked in, and with, Google Cloud/BigQuery/BigData or other cloud technology as an asset
Have worked with enterprise business intelligences platforms such as Tableau, Domo or MicroStrategy, with Domo as an asset
Have experience leading a small team of independent analysts and find it rewarding empowering them towards a common goal that would not have been achievable individually
Our Team:
Is a cross-functional Data team made up of data scientists, data and software architects, software engineers and data analysts spanning the globe
Has ownership over data company-wide, from analytics to global business reporting, compliance reportings and any other data inquiries
Manages the entire data lifecycle from extraction to visualization
Works in the Google Cloud Platform, SQL, Python, Java, C++ and are always prototyping new technologies
We Value Our People:

OANDA Global Corporation is a diverse and global team with offices around the world. We value the unique skills and experiences each individual brings to OANDA. We are committed to creating and sustaining a collegial work environment in which all individuals are treated with dignity and respect and one which reflects the diversity of the community in which we operate. We provide an inclusive and accessible environment for everyone.

Candidates selected for an interview will be contacted directly. If you require accommodation during the recruitment and selection process, please let us know. We will work with you to provide as seamless a recruitment experience as possible.",2.5,"OANDA
2.5",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Brokerage Services,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
21,"Machine Learning - Computer Scientist, Senior",$124k-$210k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking a Senior / Lead Computer Scientist to cultivate and lead highly skilled technical staff to apply machine learning / deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics. As our Computer Scientist you will promote and provide MITRE-unique value across multiple sponsors. Additionally, you will be expected to initiate and contribute to various research projects & efforts across MITRE and in collaboration with academia, industry and sponsors.

Responsibilities include:
Provide thought leadership and collaborate with academia, industry and MITRE Technical Centers, portfolio and program divisions in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science
Work with department leadership to develop and evolve an enduring, adaptive and forward-looking strategy and capability advancing the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to: Adversarial information scenarios, Defining, detecting and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models and algorithms, Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing, Defining, detecting and measuring bias in datasets and information, Information security and privacy, Data generation, and Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and provide technical guidance and quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes, strong leadership and transition of research results to sponsor operations
Provide exemplary leadership, caring mentorship, and collaborative technical advice to staff related to Department domain knowledge or capabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Cybersecurity, Mathematics, Systems Engineering, Software Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or related field
5 + years applicable experience including machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics
Required Qualifications:
Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to possess and maintain a DoD clearance
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Hands on work experience will include tools / packages such as: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, dlib, C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL
Outstanding presentation skills, both development & delivery, are required for both MITRE facing and Sponsor facing communications
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in related field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active US Government clearance are preferred
Proven experience with cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
22,Clinical Lab Scientist - $5000 sign-on bonus for Night Shift **,$21-$33 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"_Sign-On/Retention incentives: up to $2500\* _*
_for evening shift position_*
_Sign-On/Retention incentives: up to $5000\*_*
_for night shift position_*
Independently performs a variety of diagnostic tests in the Clinical Laboratory to obtain data for use in diagnosis and treatment of disease. Performs venipunctures and capillary draws on Inpatients, Emergency Room patients, and Outpatients as needed.

This is a full-time, 40-hour per week, benefitted position. We are offering a $2500 sign-on/retention bonus for evening shift and a $5000 sign-on/retention bonus for the night shift.\*
Responsibilities*: A listing of the key responsibilities:
Demonstrates the knowledge, skills and abilities to perform a variety of laboratory tests in a timely manner yielding accurate and precise results with a low error rate.
Ability to appropriately troubleshoot and resolve problems. Ensures that patient results are not reported until systems are functioning properly. Clearly communicates resolutions or next steps.
Possesses solid knowledge, skills and theory to perform job duties in the clinical laboratory.
Performs and evaluates quality control and instrument functioning checks using established quality control practices to assess the functioning of the test system(s). Identifies when a QC problem exists and is able to troubleshoot and resolve issues in a timely manner.
Operates and maintains laboratory equipment according to established laboratory procedures and/or manufacturers recommendations, including maintaining supplies. Identifies when sample, instrument, and/or procedural problems exist and takes appropriate actions to remedy the issue.
Is able to appropriately troubleshoot problems and communicate resolutions or next steps.
Orients and trains new laboratory staff. Trains bench personnel when new procedures or systems are put into routine use. Trains MLS or MLT/CLT students in bench procedures, basic theory, and advanced skills. Helps develop teaching and training tools.
Actively participates in the D-HH member’s laboratory’s continuing education program.
Assist in outpatient/in-patient phlebotomies, specimen processing, non-patient registration, and requisition checks, as needed. Must demonstrate the knowledge and skills necessary to determine phlebotomy technique appropriate for the age and condition of the patient.
Demonstrates knowledge of and acts in accordance with all hospital safety requirements.
Performs other duties as required or assigned.
\*External hires only and certain conditions apply
Minimum Qualifications: *
· AS degree and minimum of 4 years of Clinical Laboratory experience or Bachelors of Science Degree and a minimum of 2 years of Clinical Laboratory experience.

· Minimum of 2 years of relevant technical experience required.

· Ability to work independently and adhere to deadlines and manage changing volumes. Basic knowledge of computer software systems.
Required Licensure/Certification Skills: *
· Nationally recognized certification within 1 year of date of hire.

· ASCP preferred

· Current BLS certification required within 30 days of hire for the CLS employees located at Community Group Practice laboratory locations.

Dartmouth-Hitchcock is an equal opportunity employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Schedule:
Evening shift
Monday to Friday
Night shift
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,"Dartmouth-Hitchcock
3.8","Lebanon, NH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1893,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
23,Data Engineer,-1,"You can make a salary. Or you can make a difference. Or you can work as a Data Engineer at Herman Miller and make both.

About this Opportunity
As a Data Engineer, you'll move and integrate data across multiple disparate systems. You will clean, normalize, and aggregate Herman Miller corporate reporting and analytics. You'll also provide support to functional areas by acting as expert in tools and methods for accessing, analyzing, and reporting corporate data.

What You'll Do
You'll have opportunities to speak up, solve problems, lead others, and be an owner every day as you...
Assist end users in reporting and analysis tools.
Collaborate with Analytics and Business Teams to improve data models that feed business intelligence tools, increase data accessibility, and foster data-driven decision making across the organization.
Define company data assets (data models).
Design data integrations and data quality framework.
Develop and maintain scalable data pipelines and build out new API integrations to support continuing increases in data volume and complexity.
Implement processes and systems to monitor data quality, ensuring production data is always accurate and available for the key stakeholders and business processes that depend on it.
Perform data analysis to troubleshoot data-related issues and assist in the resolution of data issues.
Work closely with a team of Application Developers, Architects, and Analysts.
Work closely with all Business Units and Software teams to develop strategy for long-term data platform architecture.
Write unit/integration tests and document work.
Perform additional responsibilities as requested to achieve business objectives.
Sound Like You?
You might be just who we’re looking for if you have...
A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related technical field.
Fully proficient retail and online retail data engineering abilities, typically gained through five years of working with Python/Java, SQL, working schema design, and dimensional data modeling.
At least five years of experience, or and equivalent combination of education and experience.
Experience designing, building, and maintaining data processing systems.
Experience working with cloud services and cloud data warehouses.
Experience with Snowflake, Matillion, Tableau, Business Objectives, and Net Suite (desirable).
The ability to manage and communicate data warehouse plans to internal clients.
Expert knowledge of best practices and IT operations in an always-up, always-available service.
Experience with or knowledge of Agile Software Development methodologies.
Advanced problem-solving and troubleshooting skills with the ability to identify and solve complex business needs.
The ability to be process-oriented with great documentation skills.
Excellent oral and written communication skills with a keen sense of customer service.
The ability to perform all essential job functions of the position with or without accommodations.
Who We Are
At Herman Miller, our unique culture represents the collective attitudes, ideas, and experiences of the people who work here. We focus on protecting the environment, impacting our communities, exceeding the expectations of our customers through high quality products, and championing diversity in all areas of the business, and together we are on a journey toward a better world. We support the well-being of our employees in and outside of work by providing a variety of opportunities including award-winning work-life integration resources, development programs, complex health and wellness offerings, and much more.

Herman Miller is a globally recognized provider of furnishings and related technologies and services. Headquartered in West Michigan, we have relied on innovative design for over 100 years to solve problems for people wherever they work, live, learn, and heal.

Herman Miller is committed to diversity and inclusion. We are an equal opportunity employer including veterans and people with disabilities.

Apply Now!",3.8,"Herman Miller
3.8",United States,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1905,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
24,DOD Data Scientist/Engineer,$94k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

Guidehouse is a leading management consulting firm serving the public and commercial markets. We guide our clients forward towards new futures that build trust in society and your professional skills along the journey. Join us at Guidehouse.

Responsibilities

In the position of Data Scientist, the incumbent will support the Naval Air Systems Command (NAVAIR) in a once-in-a-generation digital transformation, driving change and devising how data can be integrated, controlled, distributed, and accessed by programs, business units and operators across the enterprise. Guidehouse is seeking an enthusiastic data scientist with the desire to harness data through the application of data science principles, tools, and methods and to share this knowledge as a mentor and coach for others. The individual will support the NAVAIR Digital Group in establishing practical and applied data science practices at NAVAIR, and in solving complex problems that have data driven solutions. This individual will additionally mentor and instruct employees during this process with the goal or sharing their knowledge and growing the data science skill base in Southern Maryland at Patuxent River.

Qualifications

Security Clearance:

Must have an Active Secret Clearance or above.

Responsibilities

• Work with large, complex data sets. Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed. Conduct end-to-end analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis, ongoing deliverables, and presentations.

• Build and prototype analysis pipelines iteratively to provide insights at scale. Develop comprehensive understanding of data structures and metrics advocating for changes where needed for both products development and sales activity.

• Interact cross-functionally with a wide variety of people and teams. Work closely with engineers to identify opportunities for, design, and assess product improvement.

• Make business recommendations (e.g. cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings at multiple levels of stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information.

Required Skills

2 years of relevant work experience in data analysis or related field. (e.g., as a statistician / data scientist / computational biologist / bioinformatician). Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Python, Julia, MATLAB, pandas) and database languages (e.g., SQL). +Experience with data modelling and analytics
Able to clearly communicate (speaking and writing) technical concepts to a non-technical audience + Experience with data engineering and data security practices
Experience managing, unifying, and automating dataflows from disparate sources

Required Experience

Bachelors Degree. Heavy preference given to Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Information Science, or a similar quantitative field or 7 years related work experience with Bachelors
2 to 4 years of programming experience with the ability to write / maintain scripts in Python (or other scripting languages)
Strong understanding of SQL
Working knowledge of data format conversion
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written.
Ability to work both independently and as part of a team.
Strong problem solving skills.
Ability to maintain a DOD Secret clearance throughout employment is required.

Desired experience

Experience working on agile programs
Experience with agile tools such as JIRA and Confluence
Understanding of cloud architecture + Experience working with NoSQL databases
2 years of relevant work experience in data analysis or related field. (e.g., as a statistician / data scientist / computational biologist / bioinformatician).
Experience with statistical software (e.g., R, Python, Julia, MATLAB, pandas) and database languages (e.g., SQL).

Additional Requirements

The successful candidate must not be subject to employment restrictions from a former employer (such as a non-compete) that would prevent the candidate from performing the job responsibilities as described.

Disclaimer

About Guidehouse

Guidehouse is an Equal Employment Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law, ordinance, or regulation.

Guidehouse will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable law or ordinance including the Fair Chance Ordinance of Los Angeles and San Francisco.

If you have visited our website for information about employment opportunities, or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation, please contact Guidehouse Recruiting at 1-571-633-1711 or via email at RecruitingAccommodation@guidehouse.com. All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.

Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of Guidehouse and Guidehouse will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.

Rewards and Benefits

Guidehouse offers a comprehensive, total rewards package that includes competitive compensation and a flexible benefits package that reflects our commitment to creating a diverse and supportive workplace.

Benefits include:

Medical, Rx, Dental & Vision Insurance

Personal and Family Sick Time & Company Paid Holidays

Parental Leave and Adoption Assistance

401(k) Retirement Plan

Basic Life & Supplemental Life

Health Savings Account, Dental/Vision & Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts

Short-Term & Long-Term Disability

Tuition Reimbursement, Personal Development & Learning Opportunities

Skills Development & Certifications

Employee Referral Program

Corporate Sponsored Events & Community Outreach

Emergency Back-Up Childcare Program",3.6,"Guidehouse
3.6","Patuxent River, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
25,Senior Data Engineer,$95k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"Brain Corp is a San Diego-based AI company creating transformative core technology for the robotics industry. Our diverse engineering teams in Software, Hardware Design, and Embedded Systems are creating comprehensive solutions to support the builders of today's autonomous machines in successfully producing, deploying, and supporting commercial robots across industries and applications. Brain Corp is funded by the SoftBank Vision Fund and Qualcomm Ventures. For more information please visit: https://www.braincorp.com/

Position Summary:

As a member of the Software Engineering team, the Senior Data Engineer owns the definition, execution, and delivery of technical architecture for Brain Corporation's Product Analytics team. Your work will improve the quality, reliability, accuracy, and consistency of our data. You will help build project-specific data pipelines and validation tools. You will have a hands-on role with product specialists and be responsible for working with them to understand data requirements and then implement those requirements in software.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Fully own critical portions of Brain Corporation's product analytics data model.
Collaborate with stakeholders to understand needs, model tables using data warehouse best practices, and develop data pipelines to ensure the timely delivery of high-quality data.
Work with technical and product stakeholders to understand data-oriented project requirements.
Write code that is understandable, simple, and easy to maintain.
Design, implement and ensure the accuracy of validation and related services for data models.
Think and work agile, including automated testing, continuous integration and deployment.
Manage numerous requests concurrently and strategically, prioritizing when necessary.
What you need:
Bachelor's in Computer Science or other related field.
5-8+ years software development experience.
Passionate about data quality and delivering effective data to impact the business.
Experience with sourcing and modeling data from application REST-like APIs.
MPP/Cloud data warehouse solutions (Snowflake, etc).
Proficiency in SQL, experience writing ETLs.
Proficiency in JavaScript/Node.js, Python, or willingness to translate experience in equivalent language.
Things that make a difference:
Master's in Computer Science or other related field.
Experience with Kafka, AMQP or other message bus.
OpenAPI/Swagger.
Express.js, NestJS.
SAML, OKTA.
Azure experience is a plus.
Being comfortable outside of your comfort zone - explore new tech, make your own tool, or find a new way to address an old problem.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Essential functions may require maintaining the physical condition necessary for sitting, walking or standing for periods of time; operating a computer and keyboard; talk and hear at normal room levels; using hands to finger, grasp, and feel; repetitive motion; close visual acuity to prepare and analyze data and figures; transcribing; viewing a computer terminal; extensive reading; lift, push, carry, or pull up to 10 pounds.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate. Employee is exposed to the typical office environment with computers, printers and telephones.",3.6,"Brain Corp
3.6","San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
26,Data Scientist/ Data Automation Engineer,$110k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"JSR is a global leader in material sciences and chemical engineering committed to contributing to social good by supplying materials to serve future generations and providing new value today for our customers and society in the areas of digital solutions, life sciences, elastomers, and next generation solutions.
We value Innovation, Quality, Customers, and People!  JSR combines a deep Japanese heritage of materials innovation, with speed propelled by our strong customer partnerships with premier tech & life sciences companies.  Are you interested in taking JSR and your career to the next stage?
The Opportunity
The role of the successful candidate is to accelerate the technology and product development cycles through focused automation initiatives. This engineer will lead cross functional teams to develop tools and applications to manage data from multiple chemical manufacturing sites as well as quality and development data to enable proactive process management and system troubleshooting.
Collaborates with the Manufacturing teams and Digital Transformation Office to develop product roadmaps in the digital space.
Works closely with technology development, product design teams and IT teams to rapidly establish the data science infrastructure necessary to meet the above goals
Communication of project updates including status, needs, and risks throughout the management chain.
Establish Way-of-Working guidelines and deliver communication and training sessions to ensure seamless implementation of the automation framework.
About You
7+ years plus B.S. or 5+ years with M.S. desired
B.S. degree in Engineering, Data Science, Material Science, or equivalent. M.S. a plus
Experience in chemical processing, organic chemistry, and analytical chemistry a plus
Proficiency and experience with Solution Focused Thinking - evaluating current problem patterns and devising a workable plan/process/solution
Experience working in an Agile environment.
Excellent data analysis proficiency required. Ability to do data manipulation via basic scripting techniques, macros or programming languages (i.e., Python) is preferred.
Knowledge of chemical processes and basic chemical structures, reactions and interactions needed to tie data into current troubleshooting or experimental work.
Proficiency and experience with Statistical Process Control (SPC) needed.
Strong computer skills essential – JMP, Access, Excel, PowerPoint, database and statistical software experience highly desired.
Detail-oriented and strong organizational skills. Quick problem-solving skills, able to communicate in-depth to customers, internal and external.
Experience in working within a cross-functional team is necessary.
Here's More of What You'll Be Doing
Work safely by observing safety rules, policies and procedures. Identify unsafe conditions or actions to the immediate supervisor.
Perform analyses and report results with minimal supervision.
Identify and execute improvements to existing quality procedures for data analytics, following guidelines on accuracy and validation
Act as Product Owner for development of digital solutions that assist in more efficient and effective issue resolution.
Do deep, wide and detailed data analysis using existing across a variety of platforms (databases, LIMS, other operational flows).
Work on and resolve various issues with data sets, including standardization of values, units and naming conventions, as well as bigger problems with current calculation methods and any underlying assumptions behind the calculations.
Initiate and perform a variety of analyses and recommend statistically designed experiments to address customer issues with general instructions.
Maintain and verify reliability of calculation methods, language or programming behind current macros or other scripts for data analysis.
Create reports and group presentations using Excel, Access, JMP and PowerPoint, to communicate data to other teams – Production, Quality Control, R&D, Sales and Management.
Independently design experiments using statistical methods (Does) towards developing and optimizing new test methods for products and raw materials and facilitate the implementation of these procedures by educating and assisting other members of the Data Automation Team.
Work in a team environment, especially the cross-departmental Data Automation Team (Cleans Engineering, Quality Control, Production, Litho Engineering, Sales, Logistics and Materials).
Make suggestions to management for improving this position or improving work processes

JSR is an Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender perception or identity, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, or disability status.
**Recruitment agencies/Headhunter do not submit resumes/CVs through our Web site or directly to managers. JSR will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with JSR. JSR do not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. **",3.8,"JSR Micro
3.8","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1990,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
27,Geospatial Programmer/Data Scientist,$79k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Maxar is looking for a Geospatial Programmer/Data Scientist join our team in Northern VA. We use quick iteration and regular feedback to the prototype for our government customers before ultimately discovering the perfect fit. We embed our Geospatial Programmers with analytic teams in order to create custom-tailored web apps.

Life with Us
Project: Were improving upon models that use Artificial Intelligence / Machine Learning (AI/ML) to search for and identify objects. You would be the leader in this effort to design a scalable cloud-based solution and turn it into a real-world solution.

Career: Were very serious about professional development and continuing education. We offer everyone the opportunity to define their own career trajectory. Our group has some amazing resources at its disposal specifically for this purpose. You will work with your direct supervisor, and/or a mentor, to set appropriate goals and design a plan to help you make consistent progress.

Day-to-day with your colleagues:
Youll be developing and enhancing a geospatial app and the supporting infrastructure. This app is used to facilitate greater workforce performance by:

Building and training Deep Learning models to accurately identify specified objects.

Accessing large and various data sets

Working with multiple mission partners to identify and evaluate data sources.

We work in a very Lean-Agile environment without the overhead associated with traditional Scrum. Weve eliminated unnecessary development meetings and we love it!

We work together with our govt. stakeholders in their spaces in a very free-flowing and technology-forward environment.

Minimum Requirements:
Must be a US Citizen with a current/active TS/SCI clearance with Polygraph

Bachelor's degree in a related field, e.g. Computer Science, Systems Engineering, etc.

8 years of relevant experience

Recent experience with some of the following technologies:
AWS: EC2, S3, RDS, Lambda, Cloudfront

Programming and Data Science Tools: Python or Java & experience using PyTorch, TensorFlow, or similar Machine Learning packages

Experience building and training ML computer vision models, classification or object detection

Understanding of methods for labeling training data for Machine Learning models

Experience in data engineering and methods to handle large quantities of data for Machine Learning

Linux Terminal

Preferred Skills:
Willingness to learn new tasks and tools

Experience in Continuous Integration/Continuous Delivery (CI/CD) Pipeline techniques and tools

Experience in building and publishing anaconda packages

Experience performing AI/ML projects in a cloud environment

Experience in model deployment for enterprise applications

Experience leading other developers

Strong interpersonal skills.

Exposure to GIS technologies, e.g. PostGIS, Esri ArcGIS Enterprise

#cjpost",3.4,"Maxar Technologies
3.4","Chantilly, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
28,Data Warehouse Developer,$82k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"The *Data Warehouse Engineer* is responsible for the maintenance, improvement, and movement of data in the Enterprise Data Warehouse, Operational and Analytics databases. The Data Engineer works with software engineers, other data engineers, data analysts, and data scientists in order to understand and aid in the implementation of database requirements, performance tuning, and resolving issues.
The Data Engineer: *
must be an expert in SQL development, database design, data flow and analysis activities
using SSIS, defines and builds data pipelines that will enable faster, better, data-informed decision-making within the business
creates Business Intelligence solutions using Microsoft SQL Server BI Stack
must have a delivery first mentality and a firm grasp of Agile Development methodology
must demonstrate the ability to work as a team member
Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities: *
Manages his position by maintaining databases optimized for performance, implementing schema changes, and maintaining data architecture standards across all of the business's databases.
Tasked with designing and developing scalable ETL packages from the business source systems and the development of ETL routines in order to populate databases from sources and also to create aggregates.
Leads innovation through exploration, benchmarking, making recommendations, and implementing data technologies.
Responsible for performing thorough testing and validation in order to support the accuracy of data transformations and data verification. The Data Engineer strives to ensure proper data governance and quality across the Data and Analytics organization and the business as a whole.
Support analytics where he/she performs ad-hoc analyses of data stored in source and Data Warehouse databases. Further, he/she writes SQL scripts, stored procedures, functions, and views.
Will troubleshoot data issues and present solutions to these issues. He/she proactively analyzes and evaluates the databases in order to identify and recommend improvements and optimization.
Will analyze complex data elements and systems, data flow, dependencies, and relationships in order to contribute to conceptual physical and logical data models.
Perform other duties as assigned
Education and/or Experience: *
Required to have a bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Engineering, or any other technology related field. An equivalent of the same in working experience is also accepted for the position.
A candidate for the position will have as at least 5 years of working experience as a database engineering support personnel or a database engineering administrator within a fast-paced a complex business setting.
The candidate must demonstrate experience working with large and complex data sets
A suitable candidate will also have had experience in the creation and debugging of database applications critical to the business's mission.
The candidate will have strong working and conceptual knowledge of building and maintaining physical and logical data models and experience with business intelligence tools.
Skills/Specialized Knowledge: *
Experienced in design, implementation and maintenance of SQL Server databases
Experienced in design, deployment and maintenance of complex ETL processes using SSIS
Adept at providing ongoing maintenance support through SQL query tuning and optimization
Ability to maintain and enhance OLAP cube artifacts using SSAS
Experienced in design and deployment of complex reports using SSRS
Well versed in working in a Visual Studio in source-controlled development environment
Excellent customer service and interpersonal skills; ability to relate to and get along with others
Professional verbal and written communication skills
Strong organizational and time-management skills
Ability to multi-task and maintain flexibility and creativity in a variety of situations
Ability to analyze and resolve problems
Ability to set and meet goals and consistently meet deadlines
Ability to maintain confidentiality
Other Requirements: *
Must maintain professional appearance.
Ability to be at work on a regular and consistent basis; Overtime may be required for this position.
Physical and Mental Demands: *
This position will spend long hours sitting and using office equipment and computers.
The position may also entail light lifting of supplies and materials occasionally, up to and including 20 pounds in addition to reaching, stooping, standing, and walking.
This position requires the ability to talk, hear, compare, compute, compile, copy, analyze, coordinate, synthesize, negotiate and communicate.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential job functions.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Database engineer: 5 years (Required)
SSIS: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Dallas, TX 75201 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
https://careers.invitationhomes.com/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.2,"Invitation Homes
3.2","Dallas, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
29,Data Analyst II,$41k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"We know why you are reading about this opportunity. You are driven to achieve goals. You are looking to make a direct impact. You want to work in a culture where your co-workers work as part of a diverse team, communicate across departments, and have a positive attitude. If we had to guess, you are innovative with great ideas, want to bring efficiencies to processes, and are looking to grow your career. Are we right? If so, let’s talk about who we are.

Who We Are

Greenphire is a leading provider of clinical payment and communication solutions. We provide software as a service (SaaS) to reduce costs, increase participant retention, and produce quantifiable results for our clients in the clinical trial industry. Our vibrant culture focuses on four key values: All In, As a Team, For a Purpose, Solving Problems.

We are a multi-year recipient of the Philadelphia Business Journal’s Best Places to Work award, and love to give shout-outs and awards to our employees. Our For A Purpose committee champions philanthropic activities throughout the year so employees can give back to our community. We have a diversity committee that focuses on breaking down barriers, recognizing that our uniqueness is what makes us so successful!

To Join Our Team

You must love numbers and manipulating large sets of data. You also must be analytical with experience extracting and uploading data into a system - paying special attention to detail and taking pride in accuracy. At the same time, you have to be able to excel in a fast-paced environment and love ever-changing and advancing work. If automating and making things efficient is your thing, look no further!

How You Will Contribute
Build internal relationships and deliver data science solutions to meet their needs
Extract and manipulate large amounts of data using SQL, Excel and visualization analytics software
Present analytics and data visualizations for stakeholders, with actionable insights
Provide ad hoc queries, and develop reports that provide insights and access to key performance metrics
Integrate data from multiple sources into reports for internal and external sources
Conduct quality control and auditing to ensure accuracy and appropriateness of data and configurations
Work cross-functionally with Operations and Technology to improve data quality and reporting
For Consideration You Will Have
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, data science, finance or equivalent work experience
SQL and advanced Excel experience
Prior coding experience (a plus)
Proficiency with visual analytics software; MS Power BI, MS SQL Server Analysis is a plus!
Proven analytical, evaluative, and problem-solving abilities
Passion for sharing your skills and data knowledge with others
Demonstration of high degree of productivity while handling multiple tasks simultaneously, and easily adaptable to urgent matters when required
Strong written and verbal communication, and research skills
Strong relationship building skills for collaboration",3.6,"Greenphire
3.6","King of Prussia, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
30,Sr. Data Scientist,$99k-$159k (Glassdoor Est.),"Search by Keyword
More Options

Search by Location

Clear

Loading...

Department

All

State

All

×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert

form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days

Share this Job

AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest

Apply now »



Sr. Data Scientist

Date:

Sep 18, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,400 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

The Abiomed Applied Research group is a team of scientists and engineers building a new generation of Impella “Smart Pump” devices. We are currently hiring a Data Scientist to contribute to the design and implementation of advanced analytics and innovative machine learning algorithms that guide treatment decisions and improve patient outcomes. These algorithms will play a central role in the pursuit of Abiomed’s mission of recovering hearts and saving lives. We are looking for a creative self-starter who thrives in a continuously-growing data environment and enjoys a fast-paced, dynamic research group. If this sounds like you, please read on:

Responsibilities
Responsible for end-to-end development of analytics queries and machine learning algorithms
Design new statistical and physiological features for time-series data
Evaluate algorithm performance in offline (in silico) and live (in vitro, in vivo) environments
Collaborate with software teams to implement algorithms in cloud or on embedded hardware
Maintain concise descriptions of algorithm design specifications and performance evaluations
Perform variability analyses for model optimization
Quantitatively and qualitatively evaluate new ML/AI techniques and integrate into algorithm design
Communicate algorithm designs and performance results to cross-functional stakeholders
Attend scientific conferences and act as a data science ambassador for the organization
Required Education & Experience
Advanced Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, or directly-related discipline required; PhD strongly preferred
5+ years Data Science experience involving the development of time-series and real-time data analysis
Advanced analytics (e.g. descriptive, diagnostic, predictive, prescriptive) and
Data visualization
Machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, sequence generation, forecasting, reinforcement learning, Markov modeling, or Bayesian statistics)
Python proficiency.
Experience w/one or more development package (Sklearn, Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Theano)
Expertise with advanced SQL queries (integrating multiple disparate data sources)
Distributed computing tools (e.g., Hadoop or Spark)
Willingness to travel 5-10% of the time (meet customers to gather user needs and assess product performance, attend scientific conferences)
Preferred: APIs & cloud computing platforms experience (e.g., Microsoft Azure or AWS)
Preferred: Embedded software experience (C/C++ or equivalent)
Preferred: Medical devices and / or electronic health record data experience
General Requirements
Superb communication and collaboration skills – comfortable operating within and outside a core team and presenting progress to company leadership
Demonstrated excellence of analytical thinking in one or more technical fields
Self-motivated and good team player
Willing to learn and explore new technologies
Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »

Find similar jobs:
Engineering & R&D

Apply now »



Sr. Data Scientist

Date:

Sep 18, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,400 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

The Abiomed Applied Research group is a team of scientists and engineers building a new generation of Impella “Smart Pump” devices. We are currently hiring a Data Scientist to contribute to the design and implementation of advanced analytics and innovative machine learning algorithms that guide treatment decisions and improve patient outcomes. These algorithms will play a central role in the pursuit of Abiomed’s mission of recovering hearts and saving lives. We are looking for a creative self-starter who thrives in a continuously-growing data environment and enjoys a fast-paced, dynamic research group. If this sounds like you, please read on:

Responsibilities
Responsible for end-to-end development of analytics queries and machine learning algorithms
Design new statistical and physiological features for time-series data
Evaluate algorithm performance in offline (in silico) and live (in vitro, in vivo) environments
Collaborate with software teams to implement algorithms in cloud or on embedded hardware
Maintain concise descriptions of algorithm design specifications and performance evaluations
Perform variability analyses for model optimization
Quantitatively and qualitatively evaluate new ML/AI techniques and integrate into algorithm design
Communicate algorithm designs and performance results to cross-functional stakeholders
Attend scientific conferences and act as a data science ambassador for the organization
Required Education & Experience
Advanced Degree in Computer Science, Data Science, or directly-related discipline required; PhD strongly preferred
5+ years Data Science experience involving the development of time-series and real-time data analysis
Advanced analytics (e.g. descriptive, diagnostic, predictive, prescriptive) and
Data visualization
Machine learning techniques (e.g. classification, regression, clustering, sequence generation, forecasting, reinforcement learning, Markov modeling, or Bayesian statistics)
Python proficiency.
Experience w/one or more development package (Sklearn, Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, or Theano)
Expertise with advanced SQL queries (integrating multiple disparate data sources)
Distributed computing tools (e.g., Hadoop or Spark)
Willingness to travel 5-10% of the time (meet customers to gather user needs and assess product performance, attend scientific conferences)
Preferred: APIs & cloud computing platforms experience (e.g., Microsoft Azure or AWS)
Preferred: Embedded software experience (C/C++ or equivalent)
Preferred: Medical devices and / or electronic health record data experience
General Requirements
Superb communication and collaboration skills – comfortable operating within and outside a core team and presenting progress to company leadership
Demonstrated excellence of analytical thinking in one or more technical fields
Self-motivated and good team player
Willing to learn and explore new technologies
Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »",3.7,"ABIOMED
3.7","Danvers, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
31,Quantitative Analyst,$99k-$192k (Glassdoor Est.),"Quantitative Analyst

Are you ready to explore a world of possibilities?

Join our DTCC family, and you’ll grow your expertise and become the best version of you. As you embark on a new journey, you’ll tackle challenges with flexibility and grace, learning new skills and advancing your career while having the time of your life.

Why You’ll Love This Job:

Being a member of our Risk Management team, you’ll work to protect the safety and soundness of our systems and are responsible for identifying, managing, measuring and mitigating a spectrum of key risk types including credit, market, liquidity, systemic, operational and technology in all existing and new products, activities, processes and systems.

Responsibilities:

The candidate is primarily responsible for designing, developing, testing, and maintaining stress test models or tools and performing Stress Test related analyses and reporting.
Design and implement stress testing scenarios
Perform analytical analysis such as attribution analysis to explain stress testing risk metrics results
Conduct quality assurances and controls on data
Maintain stress testing related functions in QRM's Production System, including setting up scheduled jobs to perform stress testing calcuations
Aligns risk and control processes into day to day responsibilities to monitor and mitigate risk; escalates appropriately
**NOTE: Responsibilities of this role are not limited to the details above. **

Talents needed for success:
1+ years of hands-on experience in quantitative analysis, preferable in credit risk or market risk modeling
Minimum 6 years of related work experience
Excellent communication skills, both oral and written.
Must have excellent interpersonal skills
Self-motivated and able to work independently.
Have a general knowledge about the financial market, products, risk management (such as VaR modeling) and risk metrics (such as back testing).
Solid programming skills in data processing language such as SQL, Python. R, Matlab are pluses.
Must have a Ph. D or a Master’s degree in a quantitative field, preferably in applied economics, econometries, statistics or financial engineering.",3.8,"DTCC
3.8","Dallas, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Brokerage Services,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
32,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"The world's largest and fastest-growing companies such as Accenture, Adobe, DocuSign, and Salesforce rely on Demandbase to drive their Account-Based Marketing strategy and maximize their B2B marketing performance. We pioneered the ABM category nearly a decade ago, and today we lead the category as an indispensable part of the B2B MarTech stack. Our achievements and innovation would not be possible without the driven and collaborative teams here at Demandbase. As a company, we're as committed to growing careers as we are to building world-class technology. We invest heavily in people, our culture, and the community around us, and have continuously been recognized as one of the best places to work in the Bay Area.

Our success depends on our ability to create a diverse, equitable and inclusive environment. We're committed to attracting, developing, retaining and promoting a diverse workforce. By ensuring that every Demandbase employee is able to bring a diversity of talents to work, we're increasingly capable of living out our mission and providing real insight from our products to support our customers. We encourage people from underrepresented backgrounds and all walks of life to apply. Come grow with us at Demandbase!

Here's What Data Scientists do at Demandbase:

You will be a member of Demandbase's Central Data Science team that drives product innovation and is responsible for all ML/AI initiatives and projects. We build and apply ML models at every stage of the B2B buyer's journey. Starting from the top of the funnel, Data Scientists build account rank models to score tens of millions of companies and also recommend companies that aren't yet in their CRM. Our Data Scientists apply cutting edge natural language processing algorithms and deep learning models to predict whether a company is interested in our clients product even before they visit their site. Once ML generated account lists are built, we launch campaigns to generate awareness and traffic to target sites.

Our Data Scientists build pacing, pricing, click-through rate, and engagement models using tens of billions of auctions daily to optimize campaign performance. We build reinforcement learning algorithms to optimize the user experience when potential prospects click on ads/banners and visit our customers' websites.

Our Data Scientists build real-time intent using time series analysis to trigger an alert for sales after potential prospects share their contact information, to contact prospects when there's an intent surge. ML models are a significant differentiator for each of our offerings in the ABM platform, Targeting, Conversion, and Intent products. Our Data Scientists not only build ML models, but are also substantially involved in productizing the models, and working closely and cross-functionally with data engineering, application, product, and UX design teams to deliver the world's best account-based marketing and advertising product.

The Data Science team is currently looking for Senior Data Scientists to fill in one of the three available positions:
Identification and account intelligence: map billions of IPs and cookies to companies
Rank accounts in B2B buying journey
Advertising: campaign optimization including but not limited to pacing, pricing, inventory, forecasting, click through rate, conversion
Please note that due to the COVID-19 pandemic, the Demandbase offices will be closed for the foreseeable future and all positions are remote until further notice.

What you'll be doing:
Develop Machine Learning algorithms that optimize and make an immediate business impact on KPIs.
Build, test, and deploy custom ML/AI models and algorithms on large datasets, and develop processes for monitoring and analyzing their performance on production environments.
Communicate algorithms, complex data science methods, and statistical results with technical and non-technical audiences.
Stay current with the latest technology/research and drive innovation.
What we're looking for:
4+ years of data science experience
Background in Statistics, Computer Science, Machine Learning, Mathematics, Computational Psychology, Operational Research, Physics or relevant field
Driven more than one greenfield project from concept to production release
Proficiency with analytical and database tools (e.g. Jupyter notebooks, Hive, SQL, No-SQL)
Demonstrated ability to write clean and performant code in Python
Depending on the project you work on, experience with 1 or more of these AI/ML technologies: TensorFlow, scikit-learn, Spark MLlib, Bigquery Machine Learning, large-scale data sets, Natural Language Processing and Graph algorithms.
Nice to have skills:
Experience leading teams and projects
Experience with Google Cloud or AWS
Prior experience in Martech/Adtech space
Nice to have qualities:
You are highly self-motivated and able to operate with significant autonomy
You are able to break down complex problems and come up with simple innovative solutions
You are able to focus on the goals without getting lost in the details
Data is your thing, you love metrics and use metrics to drive projects
You are willing to build end-to-end and own the machine learning products you build or help build
Benefits:

Our benefits include 100% paid for Medical, Dental and Vision for you and your entire family, short-term/long-term disability, life insurance, flexible vacation policy and 401K. Due to the COVID pandemic the Demandbase offices are closed for the foreseeable future. When the office reopens, we also offer commuter benefits, free snacks, catered lunch every Friday, chair massages, weekly yoga and much more!

About Demandbase:

Demandbase is the leader in Account-Based Marketing (ABM) and an indispensable part of the B2B tech stack. The company offers the only end-to-end ABM platform that helps B2B marketers identify, win and grow the accounts that matter most. The biggest and fastest growing companies in the world, such as Accenture, Adobe, DocuSign, GE, Salesforce and others rely on Demandbase to drive their ABM strategy and maximize their marketing performance. The company has been named to the JMP Securities list ""The Hot 100: The Best Privately Held Software Companies,"" the Deloitte Fast 500 and named a Gartner Cool Vendor for Tech Go-To Market. In 2019, Demandbase executives authored the definitive book on ABM, Account-Based Marketing: How to Target and Engage the Companies That Will Grow Your Revenue. For more information, please visit www.demandbase.com or follow the company on Twitter @Demandbase.",4.4,"Demandbase
4.4",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
33,Sr. Product Data Scientist II,-1,"Job Title: Sr. Product Data Scientist II
Location: Menlo Park, CA
Duration: 8 months

Requirements and Responsibilities

Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our employees interact with our internal products.

Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities.

Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions and product launches.

The Data Scientist Analytics role has work across the following four areas:

Product Operation: forecasting and setting product team goals, designing and evaluating experiments, monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics, building and analyzing dashboards and reports, building key data sets to empower operational and exploratory analysis, evaluating and defining metrics.

Exploratory Analysis: proposing what to build in the next roadmap, understanding ecosystems, user behaviors, and long-term trends, identifying new levers to help move key metrics, building models of user behaviors for analysis or to power production systems.

Product Leadership: influencing product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations, communicating state of business, experiment results, etc. to product teams, spreading best practices to analytics and product teams.

Data Infrastructure: working in Hadoop and Hive primarily, sometimes MySQL, Oracle, and Vertica, automating analyses and authoring pipelines via SQL and Python based ETL framework

Minimum Qualifications

4+ years' experience doing quantitative analysis within a large-scale company or similar fast-paced environment.

BA/BS in Computer Science, Economics, Econometrics, Applied Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical fields.

Experience in SQL or other programming languages.

Development experience in any scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)

Experience in communicating the results of analyses with product and leadership teams to influence the strategy of the product.

Knowledge of statistics (e.g. hypothesis testing, regressions)
Experience manipulating data sets through statistical software (e.g. R, SAS) or other
methods.

Preferred Qualifications

Advanced degrees

Experience with distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop)

Experience working within the tech sector preferred

Education
Relavant Experience (Applied Stats, Economics, Econometrics, Behavioral Economics, Data science, Appliied Math or similar degree). MS degree preferred.

IND123",4.5,"Ursus
4.5","Menlo Park, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
34,"Senior Scientist, AAV Plasmid and Vector Platform Development",$86k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Scientist, AAV Plasmid and Vector Platform Development
Location: Bedford, MA
Homology Medicines is seeking an outstanding Senior Scientist to assist in the advancement of viral gene therapy production processes for novel adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The individual in this role will be a highly-skilled, talented and motivated researcher who will lead the work to develop and characterize next generation plasmids for large scale manufacturing of AAV vectors. We seek candidates with proven ability to work independently and collaboratively who are driven to pursue cutting edge science and develop next generation therapies to transform the lives of patients.
Essential Functions and Duties
Design, development, and characterization of novel plasmids for AAV production using molecular and cell-based assays
Analyze vector specific characteristics including packaging efficiency and product quality, as impacted by packaging and inverted terminal repeat (ITR) plasmid and integrity
Advance technical understanding and development of critical parameters in mammalian cell culture production systems for AAV vectors
Collaborate closely with analytical characterization team to evaluate critical vector attributes and process performance parameters for AAV vector production
Lead a team of research associate and scientist completing assigned tasks and serve as scientific mentor to overseeing laboratory experimentation and data analysis
Author technical reports and technology transfer documents as needed
Skills and Experience
PhD or MS in molecular biology, virology, or related fields with 4+ (PhD) or 6+ (MS) years industry experience in viral vector production
Expertise in molecular cloning techniques preferably with AAV/ITR experience
Thorough understanding of virus characterization methods including nucleic acid and protein-based approaches
Familiarity with using lab-scale production platforms including adherent cell systems, shake flasks, and bioreactors for live virus or viral vector production
Adept at conducting routine testing and limited troubleshooting of multiple methods
Independently motivated, detail oriented, and good problem-solving ability
Excellent interpersonal written and oral communication skills
Interested candidates should forward a cover letter and Resume / CV to careers@homologymedicines.com or on line: www.homologymedicines.com
Homology Medicines, Inc. (HMI) has built foundational intellectual property on gene editing and gene therapy vectors derived from naturally occurring human adeno-associated viruses (AAVs). The Company's technology is precise, on-target and highly efficient for in vivo editing of genetic mutations. This transformative platform technology, combined with an elite leadership team of biopharmaceutical industry veterans, create a significant opportunity for HMI to rapidly advance a diverse pipeline of new medicines that address and potentially cure the underlying cause of genetic diseases.",4.4,"Homology Medicines
4.4","New Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
35,Scientist - In Vitro Assays and Drug Discovery,-1,"At Visikol, our mission is to accelerate the discovery and development of therapeutics through transforming tissues into quantitative data sets that we mine for actionable insights. We do this through leveraging our imaging, image analysis and advanced in vitro services that are based on a suite of proprietary software and cutting-edge research. As a company, we operate as a contract research organization and conduct contract research for the world's leading pharmaceutical companies. We are currently looking for a Scientist to join our team that will be responsible for the execution of research projects for our Clients and designing novel drug discovery assays. Specifically, we are looking for a Scientist who will lead complex in vitro assay services as well as developing novel cell based assays. This will be a unique opportunity to work side-by-side with our team of Scientists to develop novel drug discovery technologies for use with our pharmaceutical Clients. We are looking for a Scientist and are open to broad backgrounds within the imaging, cell culture and image analysis spaces. Specifically, we are looking for Scientists that have the following skills and background.
Great project management skills and the ability to manage several complex research projects simultaneously.
An ability to troubleshoot complex assays and develop novel solutions for problems.
Excellent presentations skills and the ability to communicate complex scientific findings with diverse audiences.
A thorough understanding and demonstrated track record of designing, implementing and reporting on assays to address specific research questions.
Substantial wet lab experience running and interpreting assay results.
BS + 5 years of experience, MS + 3 years of experience, PhD + 0-2 years of experience
The candidate should have a strong background in several of the below fields.
Fluorescent microscopy - confocal microscopy a plus.
Routine mammalian cell culture - 3D cell culture a plus.
Execution of in vitro assays.
Experience immunolabeling and optimizing fluorescent labeling.
Traditional histology - grossing, embedding, sectioning, staining.
Image analysis experience using ImageJ or other software tools.
Details: *
Position is located in Hampton, NJ

Compensation will be commensurate with experience

In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification form upon hire.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday",-1,Visikol Inc.,"Hampton, NJ",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
36,Data Engineer,$86k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Data Engineer to provide data flows and transformations to automate, script, visualize, and modeling subnational wealth. Day to day technical tasks include meeting with the customer to understand and refine the requirements. The candidate will use Nifi and Python to create data flows and transformations and understand the workflow of the project. They will work with the customer to implement any requested updates, move data storage to RDS, and work with security to ensure the entire system is compliant. They will compile security controls and artifacts and contribute to the Standard Operating Procedures and other related documents.

Skills Requirements:
The successful candidate should have experience with scripting in Python and using Nifi. Some knowledge of geospatial software such as ArcGIS, QGIS is preferred or willingness to learn.
Knowledge of best practices for data standards, data management, data quality.
Experience with SQL, PostGreSQL/PostGIS. Ability to communicate analysis to experts and lay persons alike.
Years of Experience: Minimum of 3 years experience.

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's degree in computer science, geography, or related field.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems
4.5","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
37,Data Scientist - BI Developer,$56k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Scientist - Business Intelligence Developer (DSBID) is responsible for planning, developing, implementing, and maintaining HFB’s data warehouse and business intelligence platform. The DSBID will plan solutions for existing problems. The DSBID is also responsible for building and maintaining connections to both on premise and online data sources, coding, testing, designing, and debugging. They will work with the Data team and users to identify and consume all data in the HFB environment.

Education/Experience

Bachelor’s degree or an equivalent combination of education, training, and experience. Experience with MS SQL BI Development and Administration. Experience with JavaScript and application engineering. Experience with R, Python, T-SQL, or other ETL scripting languages. Experience using Git for source control and CI/CD.

Skills/Abilities

Expert on Microsoft SQL Server and Business Intelligence Stack (SSRS, SSIS, SSAS and Power BI). Proficient designing and developing Relational and Dimensional data models. Proficient using T-SQL and DAX. Expert writing and troubleshooting store procedures and triggers. Strong interpersonal and communications skills. Capable of writing proposals or papers, acting as a vendor liaison and making presentations to professional peers",3.6,"Houston Food Bank
3.6","Houston, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1982,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
38,Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer (Level II),$34k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Looking to join a growing organization? Ocean State Job Lot is currently seeking a Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer (Level II)! To apply, visit our website at oceanstatejoblot.com/careers
POSITION SUMMARY:
The Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer (Level II) is responsible for developing and managing Business Intelligence solutions for the organization. This role is a contributing member of the Business Intelligence & Analytics team and works closely with, and has full exposure to, all areas and levels of the business. The Business Intelligence Analyst/Developer performs a variety of duties, without limitation, to identify the most impactful way for data and analytics to drive decision making and accelerate profitable growth.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Develop and manage Business Intelligence solutions utilized throughout all corporate offices, the distribution center, and retail stores
Collaborate and effectively communicate directly with internal stakeholders on a daily basis
Solve problems and independently develop high quality solutions by combining knowledge of programming, data modeling and statistics with skillful communication, analytical thinking, presentation and relationship building
Actively participate in the Business Intelligence workstream planning process including inception, technical design, development, testing, and delivery of solutions
Perform analysis for a wide range of requests using data in different formats and from various platforms
Create and maintain documentation including requirements, design, and user manuals
Develop policies and procedures for data collection and analysis
Participate in the deployment of data to the data warehouse
Follow IT processes and best practices for successful implementation and maintenance of Business Intelligence solutions
EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s degree in Information Systems, Computer Science, Mathematics, or a related field required
3-5 years of Business Intelligence or related technical experience required
1-3 years of professional experience in retail or related industry preferred
Experience with Business Intelligence solutions (Qlik, MicroStrategy, PowerBI, Tableau, etc.) required
Experience with Data Warehouse and ETL solutions (Cloud-Based a plus) required
Experience with programming / scripting (SQL, Python, R, etc.) required
Experience with full Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC) methodologies preferred
Experience with Google Cloud Platform (BigQuery, Storage, Dataprep, Dataflow, etc.) preferred
Proficient in Google platform (i.e. sites, slides, drive, docs, sheets)",3.7,"Ocean State Job Lot
3.7","North Kingstown, RI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,General Merchandise & Superstores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
39,Data Analyst,$59k-$73k (Employer Est.),"Who is Comprehensive Healthcare?
Comprehensive Healthcare provides innovative behavioral health and integrated healthcare services to clients of all ages. We take pride in our creative and collaborative work environment and in delivering clinically excellent, trauma-informed, recovery-oriented services.

What are we looking for in a Data Analyst?
As a member of the Information Services department, the Data Analyst supports Comprehensive’s technology and business initiatives by coordinating the collection, storage, and utilization of essential data. This position will work closely with leadership and other staff to determine data needs for specific projects or ad hoc requests, and then gather, interpret, and present the information to the team. The work of the Data Analyst will impact day-to-day clinic operations as well as business decisions, so a high degree of accuracy, thoroughness, and timeliness are essential. Previous experience performing data analytics in the healthcare field is required. The Data Analyst will work on-site in our Yakima office.

Data Analyst duties may include:

integrating data from internal & external sources and performing extract, transform, and load operations to data in various applications
analyzing data to identify and interpret patterns or trends in data sets
performing data audits to identify problem areas & implementing strategies to optimize data integrity and process improvements
assisting with the design & implementation of database warehouse structure and developing standards for the design of data elements
supporting the implementation, testing, and validation of data & software systems
assisting with ongoing data architecture processes & governance
providing Tier II technical support to employees
documenting all work as it is completed

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in computer science, data analytics, or related field
Three years of experience with data analysis within the healthcare industry

What Comprehensive Healthcare Can Offer You
Training and Development

A variety of career opportunities in a wide range of settings with room for mobility and promotion
Regular training opportunities including support, supervision, and consultation in implementing evidence-based services and programs

Innovative Program & Services

A strong reputation for providing quality, evidence-based services within a collaborative multi-disciplinary team environment
Innovative, forward-looking leadership that seeks to thrive in an ever-changing healthcare environment
Joint Commission-accredited organization committed to continuous quality improvement
Established partnerships with major research universities and other community and healthcare providers to implement cutting-edge treatment programs and services

Excellent Benefits

Competitive salaries within our communities and industry
Healthcare coverage for employee and qualified family members
Generous vacation, paid holiday and sick leave policies
Access to Employee Assistance Program services
Agency-funded retirement plan with contributions equal to 5% of compensation
Additional retirement investment opportunities with a 50% investment match of up to 4% of compensation
Agency-funded life and disability insurance program

Comprehensive Healthcare is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, sex, age, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other basis prohibited by federal, state, or local law. We value the diverse perspectives and strengths that our employees bring to the workplace and we encourage individuals from underrepresented groups to apply for our positions. The Human Resources department offers accommodations and assistance for the application and interview process; please contact us at (509) 575-4084 to make arrangements.",3.6,"Comprehensive Healthcare
3.6","Yakima, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1971,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
40,Senior Outreach Data Scientist,$104k-$169k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description:

Are you looking for a new and exciting career opportunity?

Join our award-winning organization and work with some of the most talented minds within our Enterprise Technology and Innovation teams. As a Salient CRGT employee, you get to be part of a best performing team supporting our nation’s most critical missions.

Why Salient CRGT?

We’re passionate about the inspirational missions of our customers and we entrust our employees and teams to deliver exceptional performance to enable the safety, security, health and well-being of our nation. We provide the tools and resources to help you be successful, and our culture fosters an environment in which idea sharing and collaboration is essential. Are you ready to make a difference?

We are seeking a senior level Outreach Data Scientist.

This role fullfills the following responsibilites:

implements a continuous review process to evaluate the effectiveness of processes and standards for identifying process improvements to drive improved efficiency and quality
evaluates quality issues, inefficient processes, product quality, customer feedback, and analyst recommendations to identify process and product improvements
identifies opportunities to eliminate duplication of effort, improve analyst effectiveness and efficiency, eliminate backlog, reduce accuracy issues, and improve general operations
conducts briefings on improvement recommendations, gaining approval for implementation, and coordinating implementation improvements
implementation of tools, scripts, algorithms, and techniques assesses the effectiveness of the improvements
assesses and reports on metrics

#cjpost

Required Qualifications:

The following are minimum requirements for the role:

10+ years of experience
MA/MS degree
Experience continuous process improvement (CPI) researcher and facilitator
Experience working in NCTC screening and vetting using NCTC IC databases
Analytical and critical thinking skills
Knowledge of SOPs and Government watchlisting and screening and vetting guidelines
Advanced communication skills including documentation and briefings
Knowledge of ODNI, NCTC, and IC mission, roles, and responsibilities
TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance

#cjpost #super6

#muncyreqs

#crgt456 #jpreqs

Desired Qualifications:
Recognized expert in specific field

Salient CRGT is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other factor prohibited by applicable anti-discrimination laws.",3.5,"Salient CRGT, Inc
3.5","McLean, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
41,ML Platform and Data Engineering Lead - DAB,$104k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Enterprise Data Backbone

Enterprise Data Backbone - The Enterprise Data Backbone provides the most user-friendly real-time data for all our internal and external stakeholders, accessible through self-service tools.

We will transform the way we gather and use insights by integrating completely new types of data to better support our patient and others in the healthcare system. We will build capabilities to gather real world data outside of clinical trials in ways we have not been able to do so far.

We will make data more easily accessible across Takeda and find a way to share it so that we don’t keep re-inventing the wheel. We will push ourselves to think beyond our normal constructs of clinical trials or today's supply chains.

We will explore a future where we get data from all corners of the world – digital communities, wearable devices, social media, surveys, for a, consumer data combined with hospital, pharmacy and EMR data. We will unlock innovation across the development life cycle supporting accelerated clinical development, reducing clinical trial costs, etc.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

The Head of ML Platform and Data Engineering is the backbone of the data program at Takeda and will oversee and drive the strategic innovation and design of data, consisting of data engineering, data science and AI within Takeda and with a strong impact on the IT Organization. Is a seasoned leader in technical, innovative, transformational aligned strategy and will participate in and influence leaderships debates and teams around the organization on the effect and effectiveness of data program whilst articulating the impact on IT.

Drive and lead the overall transformative data strategy combining existing sub-function strategies to accelerate the enterprise effectiveness, focused on data engineering, data science and AI solutions and drive the change within the IT organization, all focused on how data can shape the future of Takeda and the technical pathway to do so.
Shape and lead the design do data productized, re-usable and scalable solutions within Takeda into a technical portfolio and drive the further development of IT as a change enabler; guide and orchestrated an aligned IT approach and implementation from Cloud, Architecture, Service Delivery to other IT functions.
Proactively aligns with the business, from R&D, PDT, Manufacturing, Commercial, Corporate functions to understand current and future data opportunities and collaborates with business and IT leaders to identify, design, plan and prioritize a data strategy, roadmap and technical product portfolio on data engineering and science to solve identifies issues.
Drive, lead and prioritize the technical data program agenda for the business within the whole of Takeda and IT. Lead the identification of large business opportunities and orchestrate technical IT plans end efforts to completion on time and repeatable business solutions.
Oversee the development of scalable IT solutions, time to market and data innovation through terms of service strategy, data architecture and service delivery.
Lead the development of data skill set and aligned competencies within Takeda to ensure the organization is ready for the next data era and new experts can support the implementation of repeatable data engineering, science and AI-solutions.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Drive and lead the design a multi-year data strategy to create new data products and drive measurable competitive advantage for Takeda. Determine the investments necessary in terms of people and technology to achieve these objectives
Explore data engineering, data science and AI developments and translate these to the data strategy to keep Takeda on the cutting edge of data optimization.
Orchestrate all data efforts within IT and the business and align the business to the IT agenda aligned with new capabilities and methods.
Lead the design of a data engineering, data science and AI organization around data domain expertise and data science specializations to drive the effective leverage of methodologies, tools, and talent on business problems
Promote identification of new internal and external data sources; approve selection and integration
Explore the ecosystem (internal, external) and inject new insights for data into IT and the business and use specific designed used cases and lead the sharing of research findings broadly within Takeda.
Drive and articulate the broader need of data engineering and data science and aligned re-usable and scalable tooling for implementations; deploy world-class data and AI capabilities
Lead the design of performance determinations and requirements for data programs and project and act as the business owner on data engineering, science and AI.
Partner within Takeda and IT to orchestrate and align the data agenda to drive data program standardizations, data adoption and effective data implementations.
Advise business leadership team on data and AI opportunities to utilize and to collaborate, thus shaping Takeda’s data story and collaborate with business leaders develop a consolidated data portfolio and projects aligned with overall IT and Takeda strategic roadmaps and with a strong focus on scaling up projects.
Build and manage a strong network internally and externally with strategic and data experts and data technology partners with strong cloud, digital, architecture AI, cyber security and analytics capabilities.
Explore and utilize strategic partnerships, evaluate business opportunities and elevate used cases to drive data drive business changes and optimization
Oversee the different re-usable and scalable data model functions design for different scope and organization complexity and identify and address issues through model and implementation drift.
In consolidating the data program, data portfolio of data projects continuously to evolve the data agenda and implementations for Takeda towards a top industry data standard. Own the lifecycle of data engineering and data science services required by various business organizations across Takeda
Manage spend and value targets for data program implementations and track the monthly performance and report progress.
Lead the development of a Data Enablement team to drive delivery, implementation and adoption of data engineering, science and AI solutions
Ensure effective and overall data strategy in collaboration and alignment with business and IT leaders
Oversee model data delivery with a sense of business urgency utilizing a product management mentality; identifying and delivering capabilities that can be built once, but deployed in markets/scenarios
Lead the identification of synergies across the data implementations across Takeda and develop appropriate capabilities to reduce cost
Lead the standardization and codification of AI&D approaches and methods for developing and maintaining algorithms codified
Approve new policies and standards, and promote their maintenance, dissemination, and utilization across the organization
Stimulate and promotes new data and AI capabilities to upskill the current workforce of experts and implementation specialist in close collaboration with our IT leadership.
Support recruitment and onboard top talent within or to Takeda to build pool of practitioners

DIMENSIONS AND ASPECTS

Technical/Functional (Line) Expertise

Broad technology skills in data, AI/ML and ability to translate knowledge into solutions which transform the customer’s experience.
Experience socializing and serving as a liaison between the EDPP and business partners to demonstrate the value proposition of the service delivery framework to leadership
Leadership (Vision, strategy and business alignment, people management, communication, influencing others, managing change)
Experience of designing, and evaluating organizational transformations and delivering large scale change that adds value from data and information
Proven experience of providing strategic and technical leadership to large complex organizations
Knowledge of the contemporary digital landscape of organizations and experience of bringing leading technology and process optimization practices to an organization to drive sustainable improvements in business performance
Experience leading agile teams leveraging scrum methodology

Decision-making and Autonomy

Proven track record of driving change in processes and organizations, while maintaining working relationships with key business customers.
Versed in Risk management possessing ability to identify, analyze, track, manage and resolve risks issues that impact project

Interaction

Demonstrated success in the areas of IT Business Partnership & Relationship Management, Value Realization, IT Vendor Management/Governance
IT Project/Program Management, IT Service Management
Collaborating and Influencing
Negotiates with a genuine give-and-take approach, where both act as true peers and decisions are shared.
Spends time identifying all stakeholders necessary and meets or connects with all of them, neglecting no one to shape a collective consensus.
Identifies opportunities to build relationships that will help others achieve their objectives and reaches out to those people or new people.

Leading People

Collaborates and openly debates with the team to manage projects, solve problems, discuss challenging
issues, or learn more about critical issues as a group.
Delegates roles thoughtfully to free self to work at a more strategic level.
Collaborates with each employee to establish clear, challenging performance goals and metrics for the year.
Designs a performance management process to monitor projects and deliver results that exceed expectations.
Periodically reviews team progress against plans, focuses attention beyond the project to the full year

Innovation

Leverage digital technologies to drive business results
Captures voice of the customer and provides operating model which optimizes and socializes service delivery

Complexity

Leads, transforms and deliver functions – finance, resourcing, operations , training, change management etc.
Able to operate in an environment of ambiguity and uncertainty, while continuing to advance goals and objectives based on available information.
Acts to surpass goals, seizing opportunities to push the envelope.
Sets continually higher goals that are ambitious but realistic for self and team, geared to overall organizational objectives.
Focuses on new business opportunities that enable business development targets to be exceeded.
This leader’s primary objective is to unify a talented team of data and data scientists and engineers and focus their efforts on the delivery of productized AI use cases prioritized by critical business needs and the creation of enterprise value. This will be measured by improved business focus, exponentially increased output and specialization, and the creation of natural business demand for shared data and AI capabilities.
Creation of a customer-focused, central hub and service organization for all data science activities, enabling Takeda to leverage its scale and reach.
Establish the cultural footprint for a team that must play a growing and sustainable role in the continued success of Takeda.
Develop and communicate the data science strategy for Takeda, including a vision for tools, processes and technology, self-service capabilities, the productization of analytical tools and services.
Established a functioning environment that allows various Takeda users to embed data and data science capabilities

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Essential

Bachelor’s Degree in computer science, mathematics or engineering is required;, graduate degree in relevant field is desired.
10+ years of data and analytics leadership experience
Technical experience across a variety of analytics functions and capacities
Experience with advanced data techniques including advanced qualitative and quantitative data mining, complex predictive modeling and other real-time pattern detection methods. In-depth exposure to machine learning, algorithms, statistics, visualization, data engineering, natural language processing, data platforms and engineering.
Experience working in globally matrixed organizations
Team leadership of more than 50 employees
A demonstrated ability to unify and lead teams within a matrixed organization.
Standardization of disparate approaches to Data and AI/Data Science
Established partnerships with top academic institutions or industry/domain leaders
Previous healthcare / life science / pharmaceutical industry experience preferred
Reference-able leadership, management, or key influencer experiences required
Previous experience managing large programs and budgets preferred
Ability to think outside the box for creative strategies
Tenacity, perseverance, and courage
Experienced within Agile methods and leading Scrum teams

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
42,Quality Control Scientist,-1,"Position Summary:

The Quality Control Scientist will provide oversight of contract analytical labs and manufacturers. This includes, review of analytical data from release and stability studies and review of method validation protocols and reports. The candidate should have a strong understanding of cGMPs and relevant ICH and FDA regulatory guidelines. Prior hand-on experience working in a QC lab and thorough understanding of root cause analysis for investigations is required. This position will interact and work closely with cross-functional teams, including, manufacturing, quality assurance and regulatory.

Responsibilities:
Review analytical data packages generated during GMP release/stability testing of drug substance and drug product at the contract manufacturing sites
Assist in investigations and formulate a plan to identify/confirm root cause for anomalous results
Write and/or review method validation and transfer protocols and reports
Write and/or review protocols and reports related to stability studies as well as prepare tables summarizing results from stability studies
Track and trend release and stability data for batch analysis and shelf life establishment
Initiate change control for internal specifications and regulatory documents
Evaluate and perform risk assessment for change control documents provided by the contract manufacturing sites
Manage reference standard program for drug substance, impurities and degradants
Qualifications:
B.S. or M.S in analytical chemistry or related scientific disciplines with 5+ years of experience in analytical development with minimum of 3+ years of experience in quality control
Skills, Knowledge & Abilities:
Hands-on proficiency and problem-solving skills with chromatographic techniques e.g. HPLC, UPLC and GC. Familiarity with mass and UV/VIS spectroscopic techniques is an advantage
Prior experience in interacting with contract labs and manufacturing sites is a plus
Hands-on experience with method validations and transfers in support of pharmaceutical manufacturing
Proficiency in performing root cause analysis for investigation
Experience with iStability software is a plus
Passion for learning, creating, relating, communicating, and leading cross functional teams
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience in a start-up environment preferred
Must be pro-active team player, flexible, and open to change
Working Conditions: Will work from the Company's San Francisco Bay Area office, with additional travel as required to oversee the virtual development and manufacturing network (estimated at 25%).

Physical Demands and Work Environment:

This is largely a sedentary role; however, some filing is required. This would require the ability to lift files, open filing cabinets and bend or stand on a stool as necessary.

This job operates in a professional office environment and routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines.

Benefits and Perks:

Apellis offers a great benefit package which includes: health insurance with full premium coverage, 401K with company match, paid time off (PTO), long- term disability insurance, life insurance and more! Visit http://apellis.com/careerbenefits.html to learn more.

Company Background:

We are a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company focused on the development of novel therapeutic compounds to treat disease through the inhibition of the complement system, which is an integral component of the immune system, at the level of C3, the central protein in the complement cascade. We believe that this approach can result in broad inhibition of the principal pathways of the complement system and has the potential to effectively control a broad array of complement-dependent autoimmune and inflammatory diseases.

Visit http://apellis.com/about.html to learn more.

EEO Statement:

Apellis is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state and local fair employment practices laws. Apellis strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against employees, applicants or any other covered persons because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex (including pregnancy), gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender or transsexual individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current or prospective service in the uniformed services, genetic information, marital status, AIDS/HIV status, smoker/nonsmoker, and occupational pneumocononiosis or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state or local law.

Other Duties:

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

#LI-BE1",3.5,"Apellis
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
43,Data Science Manager,$101k-$167k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Science Manager will manage a team of statisticians in research and development of new predictive models and new analytical techniques related to insurance pure premiums, customer life time value, customer buying behaviors and related topics using internal and external data. You will start your Data Science Manager role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Provide analytics for setting price, underwriting and products strategies.Implement analysis and modeling tests.
Develop and enhance models used in a variety of contexts within the product management structure.
Advance modeling capabilities.
Work with colleagues in various departments to facilitate the application of models developed considering the regulatory and competitive contexts.
Ensure models are understood, implications are appropriately assessed, implementation plans are defined,validation of results are undertaken and adjustments are made.
Qualifications and Education
Master's degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Engineering or related field (willing to accept foreign education equivalent) and a minimum of seven (7) years’ experience in managerial role supervising predictive/advanced analytics.
Alternatively, will accept Ph.D. and five years’ experience in managerial role supervising predictive/advanced analytics.
Demonstrated expertise in SAS.
Demonstrated expertise in Bayesian statistics.
Demonstrated experience in developing multivariate predictive models in an insurance environment.
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
44,Psychometrics and Quantitative Research Consultants,$33k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Language Assessment Division of the Center for Applied Linguistics has occasional need for qualified consultants to work with the Psychometrics and Quantatitive Research team. We accept CVs from professionals with Master’s degrees in statistics or other fields with strong quantitative content, or with PhDs in educational measurement. We also accept CVs from PhD candidates.

Consultants may be tasked with completing analyses, replicating analyses for quality control purposes, or supporting the production of technical reports.

Essential skills include experience producing analyses in a professional setting using SPSS and R. Desired skills also include experience with Rasch analysis and DIF analysis. Experience with language assessment is also a plus.

Application Process
Email a CV and cover letter indicating your experience with the skills listed above to jobs@cal.org, with the subject line: Psychometrics and Quantitative Research Consulting.
CAL will add your information to our files and contact you as consulting opportunities arise that meet your qualifications.

For any additional questions or comments, please contact us at jobs@cal.org.",2.8,"Center for Applied Linguistics
2.8","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
45,Data Engineer,-1,"Data Engineer Northern, VA

Data Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Data Engineers to design and implement distributed, cloud-native data pipelines, storage systems, and query support. These capabilities will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on enabling machine learning and automation. Teams will be working in an Agile development environment and expected to identify and mitigate risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Architect, design, and implement updates and enhancements to data repositories and indices to support data ingest, enrichment, analysis, visualization, and dissemination
Perform database engineering and management activities associated with designing, developing, maintaining, and enhancing Big Data analytic systems using an Agile DevSecOps model
Integrate data from multiple sources in batches and real-time
Review, design, and develop data quality management processes and automated procedures intended to produce high levels of data integrity
Research and recommend solutions to complex problems
Oversee code reviews and delivering feedback regarding designs/code
Perform research and development and provide technical support to identify and integrate new and emerging technologies into the data environment
Design and implement storage and indexing strategies to provide efficient storage and retrieval to support visualizations such as graph-based and geospatial indices
Support design and development of data access APIs that allow enterprise access (as appropriate) to data
Develop or provide input to engineering artifacts associated with the data repositories
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 3 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Experience with SQL databases
Data transformation experience with scripting (Python, Java, Perl, PL/SQL) or platforms such as Spark, Talend, Knime, or Pentaho
Strong problem-solving skills
Good written and oral communications skills
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
Familiarity with SQL query engines, preferably PrestoDB or SparkSQL
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Experience integrating open API based data access and processing
DOD8570 IAT Level 1 or 2 certified (A+, Security+, etc. certification)
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Data Engineer",4.5,"NuWave Solutions
4.5",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
46,R & D Scientist,$83k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"R&D Scientists apply the scientific method in one or more disciplines (e.g., Photogrammetry, Geodesy, Computer Science, Mathematics, Image Science, Human Terrain Analysis) to advance Geospatial Science and enhance Agency tradecraft. They conduct and develop novel scientific research projects and facilitate interdisciplinary collaboration to further scientific inquiry and application. They provide technical guidance and oversight, report results, and advise management on new and evolving technology. They address a variety of complex data-related analytical problems by applying quantitative and qualitative analytic methods.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Selected candidate will execute innovative research on automated exploitation of airborne, commercial, civil and other sources of radar data including but not limited to synthetic aperture radar (SAR) complex data related to NGA future radar processing and exploitation acquisition efforts. This position calls for extensive R&D experience in automation/machine learning using SAR data, RF Systems, Moving Target Indicator (MTI), and cross-sensor integration, which is key to the Agency achieving its strategic goals and mission imperatives. Duties also include a wide variety of cross-agency collaborations and Community leadership in radar R&D. Other duties may include: \* Lead a Radar research team in completing multiple projects \* Determine and define project scope and objectives, involving all relevant stakeholders and ensuring technical feasibility. Manage execution of program/project cost/schedule/budget. \* Conceive of new start R&D activities and/or seedling concepts and seek internal/external funding sources. \* Maintain awareness of the state-of-the-art in radar technologies and communicate to leadership. \* Support requirements development, system verification, and concept of operations (CONOPS) development as well as working with system and mission analysts to ensure capabilities meet mission requirements \* Develop briefings and/or written reports that present complex issues and/or relevant analytic findings in an easily understandable way to a wide variety of audiences. \* Build and maintain professional relationships with other NGA offices and external partners to collaborate on effective GEOINT capabilities. \* Disseminate research findings to the broader DoD/IC communities. \* Possess the ability to think tactically and strategically and operate in a dynamic, fast-paced environment. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Demonstrated experience as a subject matter expert in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and or Machine Learning (ML) (such as in Automatic Target Recognition (ATR) for radar applications, RF systems, RF in contested environments, and/or Moving Target Indictor (AMTI or GMTI) 2. Demonstrated experience in seedling new start R&D efforts (including idea conception, authoring and/or pitching proposals, and/or proposal execution utilizing the Heilmeier criteria) 3. Demonstrated experience in program management and execution (such as planning, resource allocation, risk identification & mitigation, and/or identifying transition partners) 4. Demonstrated experience in building and fostering strategic relationships between the IC, DOD, civil agencies, and academia (such as to coordinate integration of research technologies) EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Engineering, Mathematics, Physical Science, Computer Science, or a related discipline that includes 24 semester (36 quarter) hours in Mathematics, Science and/or a related Engineering Science such as Dynamics, Electronics, Mechanics, and Properties of Materials. Such coursework includes, but is not limited to, Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, Programming, Data Mining, Cybersecurity, Geographic Information Systems, Remote Sensing, or Statistics. Although not mandatory, coursework in differential and integral calculus is preferred. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 24 semester (36 quarter) hours of coursework as listed in option A, plus experience that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals to 4 years.

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Doctoral degree in STEM 2. 15+ years' experience in the mandatory requirements 3. 10+ years' experience in a fast-paced R&D environment supporting contracts and programs of size, scope, and complexity similar to those at NGA Research 4. Experience in High Performance/Cloud Computing

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 05 $142,701 - $170,800 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $142,701.00 - $170,800.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
47,Senior Data Scientist 3 Artificial Intelligence,$70k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311094

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 5 years of experience, Masters with 3 years of experience or PHD with 1 year of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",4.0,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
48,AI/ML Data Scientist,-1,"Now Hiring an AI/ML Data Scientist

As an AI/ML Data Scientist, you will be applying new and innovative methods to address some of our most important intelligence problems. This is a remote position.
Knowledge and experience in designing and implanting AI apps and agents that use the Microsoft Azure Cognitive Services, Azure Bot Service, Azure Cognitive Search, and data storage options
Analyzing requirements for AI solutions
Experience with NoSQL databases
Experience with applying Data Science techniques to overhead imagery (computer vision, object detection)
Experience in understanding of programming language such as Python
Ability to work autonomously and collaboratively as part of a team to both teach and learn every day
Continuously looking for opportunities to learn, build skills and share learning.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Profile of Success
5 years of relevant experience with Data Science and Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning
Desirable Skills
Experience with NoSQL databases
Ability to provide subject matter guidance
Ability to Manager personal project priorities and deliverables
About AIS

AIS, Dedicated to Our People

AIS employees can spend their entire career at AIS doing challenging, rewarding work and reach their desired level of achievement and responsibility. We offer the opportunity to move up, without the obligation to move out of a position where one excels. We are committed to our employee's success; however, they define it.

It's our dedication to our employees that inspired our leadership to invest in our future and become partially employee-owned through an Employee Stock Ownership Program (ESOP).

Our employees are our greatest strength, and we do all that we can to serve them. We invest in technology as early adopters, allowing us to create transformative and innovative solutions for our customers while exposing our team to cutting edge technology.

We hire outstanding individuals who are committed to curiosity, passionate about emerging technology, and who are excited to find innovative solutions for the biggest tech challenges facing international brands and government agencies today.

We Invest in Individuals Committed to Innovation

AIS is seeking professionals of a certain character and level of excellence. People that we can learn from and that we can help grow to achieve their personal career goals. We are looking for:
Smart people with a passion for technology
Strong technical capabilities with a consultancy mindset
Close involvement with local technical communities
A willingness to think outside of the box to provide innovative solutions to clients
Ability to solve challenging technical business problems
Self-directed professionals
Our Core Values
Client Success
Continued Learning and Technical Excellence
Strong Client Relationships
Citizenship and Community
AIS is an Equal Opportunity Employer

Applied Information Sciences is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, religion, color, gender, sexual orientation, age, disability, protected veteran status or any other basis covered by law. Employment decisions are based solely on qualifications merit, and business need.",4.5,"Applied Information Sciences
4.5",Virginia,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
49,"Scientist, Autoimmunity",$74k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rubius Therapeutics is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company developing a new class of medicines called Red Cell Therapeutics™. Our proprietary RED PLATFORM® was designed to genetically engineer and culture Red Cell Therapeutics™ that are selective, potent and off-the-shelf allogeneic cellular therapies for the potential treatment of several diseases across multiple therapeutic areas. Our therapies can potentially be used to kill tumors in cancer and to regulate the immune system for the treatment of autoimmune diseases. We are currently enrolling patients in a Phase 1/2 clinical trial of RTX-240, an allogeneic cellular therapy for the treatment of patients with relapsed/refractory or locally advanced solid tumors or relapsed/refractory acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Additionally, we plan to file an IND for RTX-321 for the treatment of HPV-positive tumors by year-end.
We are proud of our passionate, high-performance culture – one based on a set of values that are the cornerstone of who we are and how we hold ourselves accountable. Founded in 2013, we are headquartered in Cambridge, MA, and our manufacturing facility in Smithfield, RI was named 2020 Top 5 Best Places to Work in Rhode Island among medium-sized companies by Providence Business News. We are currently expanding across all functions within the organization. Red blood cells are no longer just for carrying oxygen. Check us out at www.rubiustx.com, or follow us on Twitter and LinkedIn or like us on Facebook.

Summary
We are looking for a Scientist to join our Autoimmune group to help drive key autoimmune programs. The candidate must be independent, goal oriented, technically competent and able to efficiently work across multiple projects. We are searching for enthusiastic, innovative, and highly motivated individuals, with deep scientific background in immunology, preferably autoimmune diseases, who are comfortable working in a fast-paced entrepreneurial environment.
Responsibilities
Work closely with a team of scientists in the Discovery teams to drive key autoimmune projects.
Design and execute experiments for non-routine in vitro immune assays, in vivo studies, and ex vivo assays.
Phenotyping immune populations, sample preparation for in vivo studies, sample analysis.
Independent data analysis and proper electronic notebook record keeping.
Communication of experimental plans and data to multiple cross-functional scientific teams.
Support the continued protection, creation, and expansion of company’s intellectual property.
Assist in maintaining a strong, entrepreneurial and creative culture with a clear sense of urgency and focus on providing transformational therapies to patients.
Qualifications & Education
Ph.D. degree in biology, immunology, biochemistry, bioengineering or related discipline and 2+ years of relevant laboratory experience, pharmaceutical or biotechnology industry preferred.
Deep knowledge of immunology, preferably DC and T cell biology, and systematic approach to understanding inflammatory and tolerance molecular mechanisms.
Research background in autoimmune disease.
Strong experimental skills, including tissue culture, isolation and culture of primary immune cells, primary immune cell assays, flow cytometry, ELISA, and in vivo model development.
Passionate about working at the bench to independently contribute to research directions and solve challenging issues.
Detail oriented, self-motivated, and comfortable working with highly technical projects and personnel.
Ability to work on multiple projects simultaneously and deliver conclusive results.
Highly adaptable and responsive to delivering for challenging commitments.
Effective written and oral communication skills.
Team oriented with strong work ethic.
EEO Statement: Rubius Therapeutics is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.
Recruitment & staffing agencies: Rubius Therapeutics does not accept agency resumes unless contacted directly by internal Rubius Talent Acquisition. Please do not forward resumes to our careers@rubiustx.com account, Rubius employees or any other company location; Rubius Therapeutics is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.7,"Rubius Therapeutics
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
50,Data Scientist/Future Pricing Strategy,$88k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are

Our vision is to create technology that makes life better for everyone, everywhere every person, every organization, and every community around the globe. This motivates us inspires us to do what we do. To make what we make. To invent, and to reinvent. To engineer experiences that amaze. We wont stop pushing ahead, because you wont stop pushing ahead. Youre reinventing how you work. How you play. How you live. With our technology, youll reinvent your world

What we offer
Exciting experience with data sciences and analytics hottest topics: HPs Analytics team is covering a wide range of exciting, fast-growing and business critical areas such as: Big data SKU level pricing (in a space of millions of transactions), SEM/Display optimization in the worlds leading channels platforms (e.g. Google, Amazon, JD) and predictive analytics in the area of sales management (which accounts to target, with what offer )
Career building platform- HPs analytics team has a large and global footprint across the world offering many possibilities to advance ones career
International, collaborative and dynamic team - We are a very dynamic, highly skilled and diverse global team consisting of economists, consultants, marketers, statisticians, engineers, scientists or even musicians united by the passion to create impact using technology
Position overview

In this position you would get the chance to
Shape HPs future of how we price and introduce new products
Develop and apply statistical methods and experimentation to analyze the effect of pricing and sales decisions on business performance
Collaborate and work closely with our internal business teams to drive action
Present results and recommendations to relevant stakeholders, including senior leadership
About you:
You have deep interests in pricing, business strategy, and consumer behaviour
You are passionate about unveiling answers to most difficult questions using data and models
You feel accomplished seeing your recommendations being implemented while shopping for yourself
You cant stop thinking about learning something new every day and enjoy being surrounded by highly talented people
Requirements:

Must-haves:
At least 2 years working experience in data science in a business setting
Experience interacting with stakeholders and translating business questions to models
Ability to deploy, interpret, and troubleshoot linear regression models
Working understanding of causal inference methods
Proficiency with R and/or Python
Excellent written and verbal communication for technical and non-technical audiences
Ability to think creatively and invent original solutions to business and modelling challenges
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel and Microsoft PowerPoint
Bonus points for:
Understanding of finance and product economics
Experience in deploying data science in a retail environment
Experience in designing, deploying, and analyzing in-market experiments and/or AB tests
Master's or PhD degree in Quantitative Marketing, Business, Statistics, Economics, Psychology, or other relevant quantitative discipline",4.1,"HP Inc.
4.1","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
51,Data Scientist,$80k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Capsule


The Data Scientist analyzes complex and unstructured data using state-of-the-art data science methods for data driven decision making. This role uses knowledge of data science methods and applies analytics to solve real world problems. The Data Scientist will work with customers to collect and understand data, perform wrangling, develop applications and collaborate actively across the organization and with senior management to accomplish various objectives.

Job Duties/Roles
Apply advanced data science concepts to deliver data driven digital offerings and insights
Be able to write independent source code, validate and test for model quality assessment and improvement
Experience with Data Visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau or Spotfire
Use machine learning and artificial intelligence methods, classification, regression algorithms
Comfortable working independently on data engineering, pre-processing and data preparation tasks to prepare data for further analysis
Generate Intellectual Property for the company
Stay current in the field of advanced analytics and take initiative to apply new technologies
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required (KSAR)
Python - Numpy, Pandas, lamdas, keras, Tensorflow, MS Cognitive AI, Matlab, R, SQL
OOP(Object Oriented Programming)
ANN, RNN, Classification, Clustering, CNN, Regression tools
Exposure to building RestFul APis for data science modelling is a plus
Practical experience using predictive analytics, multiple approaches, to ID abnormalities and failures using time series and unstructured data sources.
Knowledge of data architectures and systems is a plus
Minimum years of Experience


Minimum 3 years of relevant experience in data / analytics.

Country Requirements


Must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident (US Person) and able to work on Government Data with ITAR classification

Required/Preferred Education Requirements


BS degree required in Data Science or Computer Science or Engineering or another relevant field",3.5,"American Bureau of Shipping
3.5","Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1862,Other Organization,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
52,Senior Data Scientist 4 Artificial Intelligence,$74k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311095

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing & Analytics

Group: Data Sciences & Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and artificial intelligence research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to AI assurance, remote sensing and geo-spatial analytics, human language technologies, computer vision, and other related fields.

+ The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as natural language processing, remote-sensing and geo-spatial intelligence, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery (e.g., publication in conferences such as NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred)

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 7 years of experience, Masters with 5 years of experience or PHD with 3 years of experience
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",4.0,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
53,2021 Data Science Fellowship,$89k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"2021 Data Science Fellowship
Department


Human Resources

Location


Alexandria, VA

Closing Date

1/29/21

Apply Now

Overview

The Institute for Defense Analyses (IDA) is a not-for-profit corporation that operates three Federally Funded Research Centers (FFRDCs). IDA’s Systems and Analyses Center is located in Alexandria, Virginia and is comprised of eight research divisions providing objective analyses of national security issues, particularly those requiring scientific and technical expertise, and conducts related research on other national challenges.

The IDA Data Science Fellowship provides recent graduates a unique opportunity to develop and apply data science skills to important issues in national security. Data Science Fellows will investigate the ways machine learning, artificial intelligence, statistics, and big data methodologies contribute to national security and gain experience developing advanced data science tools They will use their critical thinking and analytic skills to work on challenging real-world national security issues. In a collaborative team environment, Fellows perform data manipulation and statistical, econometric, predictive, descriptive, and other quantitative analyses to answer national security-related research questions. Fellows should expect to learn while creatively contributing to interdisciplinary project teams.

Fellows will have an opportunity to work research questions in areas such as:
Appraisal of current DoD investments in a broad range of areas: from human factors to autonomous systems, from materials science to nuclear weapons effects, from social behaviors to quantum computing;
Analyze and research questions on DoD personnel, military readiness and efficacy, and organizational efficiency topics.
Assessment of federal agency information and computing architectures that support data science applications (i.e., large, distributed data sets and computational assets);
Application of data exploration, text analytics, forecasting, statistical inference, simulation to areas of military personnel, manpower, and acquisition of DOD weapon systems.
Over the course of the three-year program, fellowship experiences will include:
Involvement in workshops and discussions on relevant topics
Mentorship from members of the IDA research staff
Training on specific analytical methods and tools
Attendance and presentation at select professional society meetings
Qualifications
This is a full time position and is only open to recent recipients of a bachelor’s or master’s degree. Candidates with degrees higher than a master’s degree will not be considered.
Candidate with recent Bachelor’s degree or Masters’ degree in economics, statistics, operations research, mathematics, physics, computer science, data science, or related disciplines with a strong foundation in statistics and/or applied mathematics are encouraged to apply.
Candidates must demonstrate experience with one or more programming language or statistical software used in research (e.g., Python, R, Julia, Stata, MATLAB, C, Java, etc.)
Candidates must demonstrate strong written and oral communication skills. Ideal candidates are able to contribute to and support team efforts.
Additional preferred skills include:
Training and/or experience in quantitative or qualitative information collection, data normalization, and text analytics
Experience as a research assistant in an academic or policy research setting
Experience or coursework in Bayesian statistics, machine learning, predictive analytics, and/or geospatial analyses
Experience with GPU, high-throughput, and/or distributed computing
U.S. citizenship is required.
In addition to the application, applicants at later stages in the process will be required to submit the following documents:
Personal Statement— explain in 1,000 words or less why you want to work in the area of data science and analytics in defense and national security and how your background/experience will contribute to IDA’s work
Writing Sample—5,000 word maximum
Transcripts - unofficial transcript is acceptable for consideration, but an official transcript is needed before any offer of employment will be made
Two Letters of Academic Recommendation—letters must be signed by the individual rendering the reference and delivered as PDF files.
U.S. Citizenship is required
Ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance is required
Equal Opportunity Employer",4.1,"Institute for Defense Analyses
4.1","Alexandria, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1956,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
54,Population Health Outcomes- Data Scientist (Remote/ Virtual),$66k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"We Are Hiring

Looking for an opportunity to use your applied predictive analysisis, Python, SQL and AI expertise? Apply to this REMOTE opportunity to join the growing Ascension Data Science Institute!

The Ascension Data Sciences Institute (ADSI) was created in July 2019 with the mission of supporting Ascension in achieving its Quadruple Aim with uniquely skilled, high-performing associates who develop analyses, models and applications to enable Ascension in providing higher value healthcare and making strategic decisions. ADSI is comprised of 6 domains addressing 1) Clinical quality and patient safety; 2) Health Economics and Clinical Outcomes; 3) Strategic Operations and Financial Analytics; 4) Actuarial and Managed Care Analytics; 5) Registry Abstraction Healthcare Solutions; and 6) Healthcare Data Intelligence. We recognize that the healthcare environment is a complex ecosystem of rapidly evolving clinical and economic practices that affect patient and provider experience and demands increasingly sophisticated and complex measurement. Our objective is for advanced analytics and data science to play a critical and foundational role in the transformation of care delivery, quality and financial outcomes to enable our organization’s competitive advantage.

We are hiring a Data Scientist on the Health Economics and Clinical Outcomes team to support Ascension’s Population Health Management and Value Based Care Strategy. In this position, you will be involved in predicting clinical and cost outcomes to identify cohorts of the population that represent opportunities for clinical intervention. You will be expected to develop a deep understanding of the business and design advanced analytics products that support the objectives of our stakeholders. In order for your work to drive action and directly impact population health outcomes, you will need to collaborate closely with IT, clinical and operational teams to implement patient identification tools.

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with Ascension, you will have the opportunity to develops predictive and prescriptive analytics models, creating efficient algorithms, and innovating use of data.

Responsibilities:
Validate the performance and generalizability of predictive models and risk scores available in vendor tools identifying gaps and prioritizing model development based on business needs.
Become the subject matter expert on available risk scores and consult with local analytic teams and business leaders on the tools appropriate for their use cases.
Leverage external research and internal clinical expertise to identify key predictors to capture and include in models.
Work with data management teams to develop standardized datasets used for predictive modelling.
Use EMR, adjudicated medical and pharmacy claims, health risk assessments and other data sources available to develop a suite of models that align with strategic initiatives.
Develop models that are applicable to our value based contracts including Medicaid, Medicare, Medicare Advantage, and commercial populations.
Clearly communicate the value to the organization of leveraging advanced analytics to drive health outcomes and success in value-based care.
What You Will Need

Education:
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required.
Masters in Healthcare Data Science, Computer Science, Math, Statistics, or other analytical related fields strongly preferred.
Work Experience:
3 years of related experience preferred.
At least 2 years of previous experience in applied predictive analytics preferably within healthcare preferred.
Experience applying leading machine learning methods (forecasting, neural networks, deep learning, optimization etc) to drive measurable improvements in health outcomes preferred.
Experience with Python and SQL required. Working knowledge of Google Cloud Platform (GCP) AI and ML tools a plus.
Experience working with EMR and adjudicated claims data a plus.
Business consultation experience required demonstrating communication and presentation skills.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

This employer participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify links below for more information.

eVerify

Right to Work",3.4,"Ascension
3.4","Nashville, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
55,"Data Scientist II, Product Analytics",$145k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Opportunity


At Livongo, data is at the heart of our culture of innovation. We're looking for a Data Science analytics team member to collaborate with Product Management and Marketing as we work toward optimizing our UX and messaging.

As a Data Scientist, Product Analytics your main focus will be to measure member experience and guide product decisions, ultimately making Livongo's products more valuable, delightful and intuitive to our Members. We're looking for someone with at least 2 years of experience in Data Analytics. In addition to technical data science skills, core competencies such as collaboration, decision-making, communication and flexibility will be key to your success.

This role offers the challenge and excitement of converting data analysis into real-life benefits. Come help us break new ground, while measurably improving lives and saving millions in healthcare costs.

Responsibilities
Provide insights about our products and member experience to inform Product teams for roadmap and feature decisions
Conduct exploratory analysis and develop statistical models to answer key product usage and engagement questions
Help Product and Marketing teams use experimentation (A/B testing) and cohorting to test assumptions and launch new marketing campaigns, features and product releases
Partner with Product teams to define and benchmark metrics for new features launches and initiatives and help create a culture of measurement
Candidate Profile
2+ years of work experience in product/data analytics or a related discipline
Data science experience (SQL, Python, R) and familiarity with managing large data sets
A general knowledge of machine learning approaches is a plus.
The ability to collaborate and communicate with Product Managers and help them craft hypotheses, and define and measure KPIs
Confidence working with ambiguity, unknown variables, and missing context (and the ability to find ways to bridge those gaps when necessary)
A self-starter approach, with strong motivation and drive for excellence
BS degree in Engineering, Computer Science or a related filed in lieu of degree, relevant work experience and/or trade school
Why Join Livongo?


The Transformative Name in Healthcare: The transformative industry forces in Community, Content and Commerce are now household names. As Amazon is to Commerce, Livongo is to Healthcare. With our Applied Health Signals engine, AI+AI, we've transformed how care is delivered.

Our Work Truly Matters: Livongo's proprietary, consumer-first technology is revolutionizing the experience of living with a chronic health condition. Our data-driven digital health engine enables our Members to seamlessly manage multiple health conditions on one empowering platform. We use smart, connected devices, personalized digital guidance, and 24x7x365 access to health professionals to make it easier for people to stay healthier.

Make an Impact: Do you want to accomplish something meaningful? To create results that matter? Livongo's innovative solution produces industry-leading member satisfaction, measurable clinical outcomes and proven healthcare costs savings. Here you can truly improve lives.

The Largest Digital Health IPO in History: We are at a milestone period in our history. On July 25, 2019 we took our company public, in order to elevate and expand the way the industry views us, thus ushering us into a whole new set of mission-critical conversations that will help us accomplish the work still to be done. As we reach new levels of achievement, we accelerate our ability to deliver life-changing services.

Focus on PEOPLE: Livongo has been voted one of the Best Places to Work in healthcare, by Fortune Magazine and Best Place to Work! Talented, passionate individuals make the difference, in this fast-moving, collaborative and inspiring environment.

Diversity and Inclusion: At Livongo we believe that personal and professional diversity is the key to innovation. We hire based solely on your strengths and qualifications, and the way in which those strengths can directly contribute to your success in your new position.

Growth and Innovation: We've already made healthcare history, yet we remain on the threshold of very big things. Leading the industry with our Applied Health Signals category, we have cracked the code to transforming healthcare. Come grow with us and support our mission to make a tangible difference in the lives of our Members.

See photos, watch videos and learn more about Livongo: follow us on Glassdoor.

#LivongoIPO #appliedhealthsignals

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we never have and never will discriminate against any job candidate or employee due to age, race, religion, color, ethnicity, national origin, gender, gender identity/expression, sexual orientation, membership in an employee organization, medical condition, family history, genetic information, veteran status, marital status, parental status or pregnancy (including breastfeeding we have a mother's room in both our offices). In our innovative and inclusive workplace, we prohibit discrimination and harassment of any kind.",4.8,"Livongo
4.8","Mountain View, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
56,Senior Data Engineer,$67k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta has an immediate need for a Senior Data Engineer to join a fast-paced program in support of a government customer with a very critical national security mission. This is a multi-year program, where the successful candidate will work on an interdisciplinary project team of more than 30 highly qualified individuals with a wide array of skills that include client (reactjs), server (spring java), QA Automation Engineers, UI/UX Designers, and DevOps engineers. The team is responsible for building a next generation Mission Information System and is performing greenfield Software Development using modern technologies via an Agile DevOps approach.

This Senior Data Engineer will play a vital role collaborating as part of this cross-functional Agile team to create and enhance data ingestion pipelines and address big data challenges. The Senior Data Engineer will work closely with the Chief Architect, systems engineers, software engineers, and data scientists on the following key tasks:
Provide Extraction, Transformation, and Load (ETL) experience coupled with enterprise search capabilities to solve Big Data challenges
Design and implement high-volume data ingestion and streaming pipelines using Open Source frameworks like Apache Spark, Flink, Nifi, and Kafka on AWS Cloud
Leverage strategic and analytical skills to understand and solve customer and business centric questions
Create prototypes and proofs of concept for iterative development
Learn new technologies and apply the knowledge in production systems
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the enterprise data pipelines and the data lake
Partner with various teams to define and execute data acquisition, transformation, processing and make data actionable for operational and analytics initiatives

Required Qualifications / Experience:

BS in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or a related technical field or equivalent experience with at least 8+ years in systems engineering or administration (6+ years with a MS/MIS Degree).
Must have an active Top Secret security clearance and able to obtain a TS/SCI with Polygraph.
3 years of experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, NiFi.
3 years of experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python (preferred) and/or Java.
3 years of experience with and managing data across relational SQL and NoSQL databases like MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, HDFS, Redis, and Elasticsearch.
3 years of experience working in a Linux environment.
2 years of experience working with and designing REST APIs.
Experience in designing/developing platform components like caching, messaging, event processing, automation, transformation and tooling frameworks.
Experience developing data ingest workflows with stream-processing systems: Spark-Streaming, Kafka Streams and/or Flink.
Experience transforming data in various formats, including JSON, XML, CSV, and zipped files.
Experience with performance tuning of ETL jobs.
Experience developing flexible ontologies to fit data from multiple sources and implementing the ontology in the form of database mappings / schemas.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills necessary to work effectively with customers and other team members.

Preferred Qualifications / Experience:

Data engineering experience in the Intelligence Community or other government agencies.
Experience with Microservices architecture components, including Docker and Kubernetes.
Experience developing microservices to fit data cleansing, transformation and enrichment needs.
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Athena and/or Glue.
Experience with Jira, Confluence and extensive experience with Agile methodologies.
Knowledge about security and best practices.
Experience developing flexible data ingest and enrichment pipelines, to easily accommodate new and existing data sources.
Experience with software configuration management tools such as Git/Gitlab, Salt, Confluence, etc.
Experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines and their enabling tools such as Jenkins, Nexus, etc.
Detailed oriented/self-motivated with the ability to learn and deploy new technology quickly.

Clearance Level: TS/SCI with Poly

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
57,Senior Research Associate/Scientist I - Flow Cytometry,-1,"Abveris is an antibody discovery biotech organization providing contract research services for biopharma companies of various sizes. We provide high quality, rapid antibody discovery services for critical reagent development and therapeutics discovery.

We are seeking an experienced and motivated individual to join our team to facilitate flow cytometry screening for new and ongoing projects.
Key Responsibilities*
Perform flow cytometry screening for both internal research and Partner projects, assist in the design and analysis of flow cytometry experimentation using ForeCyt or FlowJo software.
Maintenance and troubleshooting of iQue flow cytometer, including daily startup, QC, and shutdown.
Interpret and summarize experimental data and prepare data reports for Partners.
Understand a variety of cell-based methods with a strong understanding of tissue culture, cell biology, and general laboratory techniques.
Help train at least one additional user on all aspects of flow cytometry (planning and running experiments, data acquisition, and analysis).
Key Qualifications: · *
A bachelor’s degree in Biology, Biotechnology, or a related scientific discipline.
Understanding of flow cytometry fundamentals, working knowledge of flow cytometry software.
At least one year of experience running flow cytometry experiments, experience with iQue preferred but not required.
At least three years of general biology laboratory experience.
Ability to diagnose and troubleshoot issues on flow cytometry instrument and software, as well as manage instrument maintenance.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, and the ability to work constructively with colleagues throughout all laboratory departments.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Biology Laboratory: 3 years (Required)
Flow Cytometry: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Canton, MA 02021 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.abveris.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Abveris Antibody,"Canton, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
58,AI/ML Engineer/Scientist,-1,"Job? - *No this is more than a job it is an opportunity for a great career!*
Santa Cruz Sciences is supporting our nation’s most critical missions.
Why **Santa Cruz Sciences**?*
You will be part of our family and not a number

We offer a *12% 401k plan* and other incredible benfits.

Qualified staff for this position can earn from *$125,000 to $300,000 a year! *

We could write a lot of fancy words about why Santa Cruz is the place for you. But we want to hire smart people and that would be a waste of our time and yours. We offer the following:
GREAT WORK - FANTASTIC PAY - INCREDIBLE BENEFITS - PLUS* we want you to be active in our company - part of an exciting and growing team. If you are looking for a job you will not find it here! This is a place for leaders and people that make it happen!
AI/ML Engineer/Data Scientists are responsible for leading enterprise data analysis across a large complex intelligence program using tools and IT capabilities for improving the use and production of data and results. This role requires both IC analytic experience and familiarization with a broad range of data analysis tools and techniques. This role leads complex projects requiring data analysis, interpretation, and communication to support decision-makers and customers. This individual develops innovative approaches to analyze and exploit the customer data holdings for rapid data correlation and data processing in support IC mission requirements. This role collaborates with the customer to understand, support, and anticipate changing needs and requirements and offers recommendations for solutions.
Required Qualifications:
1) BS degree in a technical field, such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science
2) 3+ years of applicable IC experience in data science and/or analysis
3) Proficiency with Python or R
4) Expertise in AI/ML techniques
5) Program level leadership experience directing complex data science and analytic projects
6) Experience/knowledge of computer science concepts including programming, statistics, data architecture, data analytics, data science, data mining, and visualization techniques
7) Experience using analytic tools (e.g., Tableau) for performing data manipulation, situational awareness, and data visualization
8) Experience/knowledge of social network and link analysis tools (e.g., Palantir, i2 Analyst’s Notebook)
9) Experience with quantitative and qualitative content analytics
10) Oversight of analysis on a variety of data types and sources including unstructured data and social media (e.g., Twitter, Facebook, YouTube)
11) Ability to effectively communicate complex technical findings to non-technical audiences in both written and verbal formats
12) Experience identifying, recommending, and implementing continuous improvement approaches within teams, processes, or technology
13) Communicating direction, approaches, and results to teams, leadership, and customers
14) Collaborating with projects and programs on data science communities of interest
15) ISSA or TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance is required

Santa Cruz Science hires qualified applicants we could care less about how you look or what you believe in - as long as you're qualified and can do the job. Doing the job means not only capability but punctuality! We are - as all employers are in the USA an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other factor prohibited by applicable anti-discrimination laws. *If you are from another planet and purple with six eyes we don't care - as long as you're qualified WE WANT YOU!*

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $125,000.00 - $300,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
AI, ML Data Science: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Santa Cruz Sciences
4.0","Tysons Corner, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,School / School District,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
59,Business Intelligence Analyst I,$54k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rational is growing, and we need amazing talent to join our team. If you have an entrepreneurial attitude with a deep spirit of service and killer subject expertise, we want to talk to you. We are always looking for the next great consultant to raise the bar and push Rational to be better than we were yesterday. Staying hungry, curious, and looking forward to what’s next is part of our DNA.

As an integral member of our client's report delivery team, the Business Intelligence (BI) Analyst role identifies business intelligence, reporting, and data analysis needs. They work closely with clients and COE teams to turn data into critical information and knowledge that can be used to make sound business decisions. It is essential that the BI Analyst builds an understanding of the business at a level of detail that enables them to identify and address critical issues. They must provide data that is accurate, congruent and reliable, as well as ensure the information is easily available to users for direct consumption or integration with other systems.

The BI Analyst works with clients to determine business requirements, priorities, define key performance indicators (KPI), and develop BI and data warehouse (DW) strategy. This includes working with business and development teams to design and document dashboards, alerts, and reports.

This BI Analyst must have an in-depth understanding of the business environment and an interest in going beyond the obvious, delving into the source, the definition, philosophy, and foundational roots of a data element in order to create information.

This is a full time position within Rational's Technology Practice. This position is not available for Visa sponsorship or C2C work.

What You Will Do:
Working with cross-functional teams, you will participate in requirement gathering, documenting, and development of reports and dashboards to meet business needs.
Responsible for translating business requirements into specifications that will be used to implement the required reports and dashboards, created from potentially multiple data sources
Translate business requirements into specifications that will be used to implement the required reports and dashboards, created from potentially multiple data sources
Be accountable for providing leadership and independent initiatives in facilitating information gathering, structured documentation and presentation of findings to all levels of management.
Conduct analyses of functional business processes and requirements and participate in the development of business cases in the support of process changes and/or projects.
Be an ambassador within our client for data and reporting capabilities
Be responsible for creation and support of mission critical reports and dashboards
Provide technical assistance and cross training to other team members.
Provide assistance to users for generation of ad-hoc reports
Educate and train clients to use the data in an analytical tool, displaying the information in new forms and content for the purpose of analysis and exploration.
Participate with other developers to convert legacy reports (primarily SSRS) to SpotFire or other BI solutions as directed.
Must be able to perform duties with moderate to low supervision
Ability to manage multiple priorities, and assess and adjust quickly to changing priorities
What You Will Bring:
Minimum of 2-3 years of report development required
At least 3 years of experience with PowerBI
BI certifications desirable, preferably related PowerBI
Experience in biotechnology / pharmaceutical environment or similar industry preferred, but not required
Demonstrable proficiency with PowerBI, including a high degree of skill in the DAX language and competence in the M language
Knowledge of logical and physical data structures (relational and dimensional)
Programming / scripting experience and knowledge of software development life cycle is preferred.
Requires strong analytical, conceptual and problem-solving abilities
Experience in developing and maintain validated reports and dashboards preferred
Ability to work in a team environment with both technical and business members.
Attention to detail in issue resolution, demonstrated ability to diagnose and resolve issues proactively in a fast-paced environment.
Who You Are:
Data Lover. You know your numbers and value the metrics behind the buyer story.
Collaborative to the Core. Demonstrated ability to work in a team environment, as a leader and member.
Well-rounded Professional. You have amazing communication and organizational skills along with high EQ.
Proactive. You are always thinking ahead about what is best for the Client.
Adaptable. Change happens at lightning speed; you are flexible, enjoy challenge, and get behind new ideas
Rational is a customer experience (CX) solutions firm that pairs the capabilities of a strategic consultancy with the creativity of a full-service digital agency. We design and activate compelling experiences that create strong connections between people and brands. We put humans at the center of business and partner with our clients to deliver meaningful experiences that help their customers while driving business success. Customer satisfaction at every level is our ultimate metric, and it's what drives our mindset, skillset, and company culture.

Incredible people are our non-negotiable. Our experienced team of consultants spans the globe. We love what we do, and who we do it with – let’s begin our next chapter together.

Rational is committed to ensuring all candidates have an equal opportunity to be considered for employment. Please let us know if you need any reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process.",2.7,"Rational
2.7","Bellevue, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
60,Staff Scientist/Sr. Staff Scientist,$95k-$191k (Glassdoor Est.),"Headquartered in Brisbane, Calif., CareDx, Inc. is a leading precision medicine solutions company focused on the discovery, development and commercialization of clinically differentiated, high-value healthcare solutions for transplant patients and caregivers. CareDx offers products, testing services and digital healthcare solutions along the pre- and post-transplant patient journey, and is the leading provider of genomics-based information for transplant patients.

Staff Scientist/Sr. Staff Scientist

We are seeking a highly motivated, critical, and creative Staff Scientist/Sr. Staff Scientist to join the CareDx R&D group. This is an exciting opportunity to be part of a growing, dynamic, and collaborative R&D team innovating cutting-edge technology. The primary function of this position will be to drive development of innovative diagnostic solutions for transplant recipients. The ideal candidate will be able to lead assay development and validation projects, have experience interfacing with cross functional teams including bioinformatics, biostatistics, data science, clinical and lab operations; and have experience in molecular biology methods for nucleic acid characterization and applications.

Responsibilities as follows, but not necessarily limited to:
Lead the initiation, design and execution of experiments to develop novel high-value diagnostic tests
Use molecular biology approaches to independently develop and optimize molecular diagnostics assays based on gene expression
Independently perform basic analysis of high-dimensional data
Coordinate with statistics and bioinformatics teams for high-level data analysis and gene expression signature development
Provide expert support, guidance and mentorship for experiment design, data analysis and results communication to the broader scientific team
Interface with staff in multiple departments and clearly communicate results with colleagues and R&D management, as well as externally at scientific meetings and conferences
Lead project through development, validation and launch
Qualifications:

Ph.D. in genomics, molecular biology or a related discipline with 10+ years of experience and at least 5 years of industry experience.
Strong background in molecular biology
Expert in nucleic acid sample preparation
Experience in development or optimization of nucleic acid technologies related to measuring gene expression, e.g. qPCR, dPCR and multiplex PCR
Ability to collect requirements, plan activities and prioritize activities/assignments to supporting team members.
Able to identify risk and provide recommendations for risk mitigation in area of responsibility and at project level.
Excellent interdisciplinary communication skills required
Bioinformatics skills such as programming and data mining are a plus
Good organizational skills, and detail oriented
Additional Details:


Every individual at CareDx has a direct impact on our collective mission to improve the lives of organ transplant patients worldwide. We believe in taking great care of our people, so they take even greater care of our patients.

Our competitive Total Rewards package includes:
Competitive base salary and incentive compensation
Health and welfare benefits including a gym reimbursement program
401(k) savings plan match
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
Pre-tax commuter benefits
And more!
In addition, we have a Living Donor Employee Recovery Policy that allows up to 30 days of paid leave annually to a full-time employee who makes the selfless act of donating an organ or bone marrow.

With products that are making a difference in the lives of transplant patients today and a promising pipeline for the future, its an exciting time to be part of the CareDx team. Join us in partnering with transplant patients to transform our future together.

CareDx, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer and participate in E-Verify program.
******* We do not accept resumes from headhunters, placement agencies, or other suppliers that have not signed a formal agreement with us.",2.4,"CareDx
2.4","Brisbane, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
61,Data Engineer,$74k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Group O is seeking a strong candidate with advanced analytics experience to fill an exciting Data Engineer role for an AI partner to Fortune 500 companies. In this role, you will be a valuable in managing large amounts of data and implement loading disparate data sets while managing the technical communication between the team and client.

Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, preprocessing using Hive and Pig.
Manage the technical communication between the team and client
Work with big data team to deliver cutting edge solutions

2-5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Ideally, this would include work on the following technologies:
Proficiency in at least one of the following: R, C++ or Python (preferred). Scala knowledge a strong advantage.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc..
Hands-on experience with Apache Spark and its components (Streaming, SQL, MLLib) is a strong advantage.
Operating knowledge of cloud computing platforms (AWS, especially EMR, EC2, S3, SWF services and the AWS CLI)
Experience working within a Linux computing environment, and use of command line tools including knowledge of shell/Python scripting for automating common tasks
In addition, the ideal candidate would have great problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners.
Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related technical degree",3.1,"Group O
3.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
62,Healthcare Provider Data Analyst,$42k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us:

NYSTEC is a non-profit technology consulting company, advising agencies, organizations, institutions, and businesses since 1996. Were independent and vendor-neutral so we have our clients best interests at heart. At NYSTEC, we know that we succeed when individuals and teams flourish personally and professionally, so our benefits and perks support this mindset. Are you ready to contribute to our engaged workforce and deliver the NYSTEC Experience?

About the Role:

As a Healthcare Data Analyst in the Population Health Strategy practice, you will collaborate with team members to conceptualize, deliver, and support our clients through todays ever-changing healthcare landscape. NYSTEC is considered a trusted program advisor, providing subject matter expertise, and connecting the dots for our clients. Over the last five years, NYSTEC has consulted on some of the largest Medicaid initiatives and served in various roles across a multitude of New York State healthcare technology systems.

Serving as a Healthcare ProviderData Analyst, you will be supporting healthcare technology initiatives for our clients, partners and stakeholders by providing analytical expertise to evaluate provider data across New York State.

About You:

Required Qualifications
Experience in health informatics
Experience writing ad hoc queries in SQL
Strong critical thinking, problem solving, and analytical skills
Proficiency with translating complex analytic ideas into actionable insights for varied levels of audience.
Ability to develop relationships with stakeholders and understand their needs through excellent listening and effective written and verbal communication.
Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite, with strong skills in Excel
Preferred/Desired Qualifications
Experience using SAS
Experience using provider data and/or payer data to inform decision making
Experience with data quality analysis
Masters degree in health informatics, public health, statistics, computer science, or a related discipline
Education and Experience
A minimum of a Bachelor's degree with at least 3 years of related experience is required. An equivalent combination of advanced education, training, and experience will be considered.
If youre an effective communicator who enjoys working in complex and collaborative environments, utilizing your critical thinking and research skills to develop solutions for clients, providing support to customers, and have the required education, experience and skills, we want to hear from you.

It is NYSTEC's policy to provide equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all individuals, regardless of actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions), gender identity or gender expression (including transgender status), age, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, protected medical condition as defined by applicable state or local law, genetic information, military service and veteran status, sexual orientation, marital status, , or any other characteristic protected by local, state, or federal law and ordinances. NYSTEC is strongly committed to this policy and believes in the concept and spirit of the law.

Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States without the need for visa sponsorship now or in the future.",3.9,"NYSTEC
3.9","Albany, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
63,Intern - Data Analyst or Business Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst or Business
Analyst Intern
2021 Paid Summer Intern

Zions
Bancorporation’s Enterprise Technology and Operations (ETO) team is transforming
what it means to work for a financial institution. We operate in a fast-paced,
information-driven environment, which means we need people who bring diverse
experiences, perspectives, and expertise to meet the ever-changing demands of a
technology-driven world. We are grounded in the belief that “improving the work
is the work” as we drive to create simple, easy, and fast solutions for our
customers. Your ability to adapt, learn, and innovate helps increase revenue,
reduce operational costs, and mitigates risk.

ETO
provides opportunities for you to own your career growth through Diversity,
Equity, and Inclusion, Women in Technology, and Workforce of the Future
initiatives that allow you to network across the organization, volunteer in our
community, and build your technical and soft skills. Together we are building a
culture that values diversity and creates a space of belonging for all our team
members. We believe that investing in your success is an investment in our
customers and our business. Our people are what sets us apart and make us
great.

Members of the FutureCore team
are building the next generation of banking technology at Zions Bancorporation.
By joining our team, you can make a difference in the lives of our customers
and help us develop innovative banking solutions for them.

We are currently seeking a
highly-motivated Data Analyst or Business Analyst Intern to join our team. In
this exciting role, you will work with a team of dedicated individuals
committed to deliver results and support program objectives. You’ll also have
opportunities to collaborate with others to develop creative solutions for
challenges.

You will be an excellent fit
for this position if you have the desire, skills, and experience to:
Review,
analyze, and evaluate functional aspects and data requirements of an
application or system to develop solutions for system interfaces.
Actively
participate in requirements, design, development, and quality assurance (QA)
processes of the project.
Perform
data analysis and research activities.
Assist
in producing project documentation and specifications.
Identify
opportunities for process automation and implement solutions.
Track
project performance against key performance metrics
Create
and distribute status reports and other project communications.
Qualifications:

Must
be working toward Bachelor's (taking upper division courses) or Masters degree
in Information Systems, Data Analytics or other related field.
Strong
analytical, organizational, and problem-solving skills.
Well-developed
communication skills (both written and verbal).
Ability
to work and contribute in a collaborative team environment.
Strong
interpersonal skills and the ability to work with management, peers, and
technical staff.
Adapts
well to change and is comfortable with the dynamics of a fast-paced environment
Ability
to take initiative and ownership to see assignments and projects through to completion
High-level
of proficiency using Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio and SQL.
Experience
using scripted languages to develop automated solutions is desired
Analysis
skills to use data to make recommendations",3.3,"Zions Bancorporation
3.3","West Valley City, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
64,Sr or Principal Data Scientist,$104k-$167k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are hiring Data Scientists at these levels:
Senior
Lead (Staff or Sr. Staff)
Principal

WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart/$ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2000 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart/$ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

The Sr. or Principal Data Scientist will be heavily involved in executing data analysis and modeling tasks for Freedom Financial Asset Management, the lending division of the Freedom Financial Network. The overarching mandate for the Sr. or Principal Data Scientist is to execute on analytic delivery and to develop new analytic capabilities for the company’s mortgage initiative. The position will essentially be to partner with the mortgage division to execute a new analytic vision. Additionally, he/she may collaborate with other team members to assess and develop new analytic opportunities. This role will provide the candidate exposure and visibility into a strategic initiative for the company, and as such, will be a high impact role within the organization.

THE ROLE:

Some of the key responsibilities for the Analytic Scientist will include:

Drive better understanding of FFN customers and prospects. Optimize customer experience and FFN value proposition by leveraging of GLM, supervised and unsupervised ML modeling solutions.
Utilize your technical and analytical skills, while also gaining in-depth exposure to business strategy.
Act as consultant to cross functional teams, advise how to best leverage predictive modeling and data in general.
Responsibility:
Design, build, optimize and maintain customer LTV / lifecycle modeling platforms.
Identify opportunities to apply data science solutions to improve customer experience and FFN value proposition.
Consult with business partners to develop data science strategy to address and influence customer LTV.
Analyze data, build models and assess their quality
Design experiments and evaluate the results
Monitor model performance and make recommendations
Ad-hoc Statistical requests
Communicating results and recommendations to senior management
Identify and apply best practices and innovative solutions for optimization of customer life cycle.
Skillset and Requirements:
Expert knowledge of logistic regression, decision trees, survival analysis, design of experiment and other statistical techniques
Expert knowledge of supervised and unsupervised ML modeling techniques
Communicating clearly and concisely to individuals from various backgrounds
Influencing others in both verbal and written mediums
Leverage data and advanced statistical and machine learning techniques to develop comprehensive customer experience strategy
Qualifications and Experience
Masters or PhD in Statistics or similar quantitative field of study (Math, Economics, Financial Engineering, Physics, Chemical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Operations Research, etc.)
Hands on expertise in statistical modeling and analysis
Experience with use of credit bureau data for statistical modeling
Experience working with relational databases
Expert SAS/R/Python knowledge
Experience with cloud-based modeling (AI) platforms
0 - 7+ years of total experience. Financial services or mortgage experience, is not required, but is preferred.
Demonstrated experience in statistical modeling and analysis. Expert level skills in Python or R.
Proficiency in qualitative and quantitative data analysis and reporting.
Aptitude working with relational databases and manipulating data from databases for statistical modeling.
Familiarity with UNIX/LINUX environments and BASH/shell scripting is desired.
Very strong analytical skills, combined with an ability to tie analytic results to business implications.
A can do attitude for problem solving.
A keen eye to spot opportunities to automate and streamline analytic processes.
High level of comfort working within the financial services industry, as well as working within a rapidly growing environment in which change is a constant.
An ability to work independently with limited direction but with the judgment to do so within appropriate limits of authority.
Initiative to constructively, but passionately, challenge existing analytic processes.

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.
Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted a Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees, most recently #1 in Phoenix for the 2nd year in a row!
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday

This is your opportunity to be part of a growing company where dedicated professionals strive to help customers and each other succeed every day. If that sounds exciting to you, we want to talk to you. Apply today!

Attention Agencies & Search Firms: We do not accept unsolicited candidate resumes or profiles. Please do not reach out to anyone within Freedom Financial Network (FFN) to market your services or candidates. All inquiries should be directed to Talent Acquisition only. We reserve the right to hire any candidates sent unsolicited and will not pay any fees without a contract signed by FFN’s Talent Acquisition leader. Thank you for your consideration.",3.4,"Freedom Financial Network
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
65,Data Scientist,$90k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary*
Nutrisystem is seeking a Data Scientist to join our growing Analytics community. This role will develop, manage, and deliver analytical solutions to solve complex business challenges. The Data Scientist will closely interact with Marketing, Finance, Product Development, Information Technology, and our Call Center to influence key business decisions through fact-driven insights. The ideal candidate will possess excellent analytical and communication skills and have a history of thriving in fast-paced business environments.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities*:
Use complex data and algorithms to solve known and unknown business challenges.
Designs analytic plans, translating business problems/opportunities into analytic approaches. Engages with project sponsors and stakeholders to understand each business question. Probes for hidden questions and goals. Brings structure to each request and translates requirements into the appropriate analytic approach.
Develops queries and performs extensive programming to access, transform and prepare data for statistical modeling and analysis.
Designs and develops models to target marketing offers. Responsible for model validation, implementation, and documentation.
Performs deep-dive descriptive and predictive analytics for customer behavioral segmentation related to customer acquisition and retention.
Analyzes data to describe customer behavior and preferences, understand marketing channel usage, diagnose customer experience problems, size marketing opportunity, and measure the impact of marketing initiatives.
Prepares and delivers insight presentations and recommendations. Communicates complex material in digestible terms appropriate for each audience. Educates company executives and the broader marketing team on analytical findings and implications using storytelling and data visualization techniques.
Provides statistical consultation services within the organization. Serves as the analytics expert on cross-functional teams for large strategic initiatives.
Work with Marketing and business partners to design valid tests with results that are reliable and actionable.
Develops and applies domain knowledge of Nutrisystem’s business and data to shape the analytic road map.
Contributes to the growth of the broader analytics community at NTRI.
Participates in special projects and performs other duties as required.
Qualifications (Include Education and Specific Experience)*
Bachelor degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, Analytics, Operations Research, Economics, or other quantitative field required. Masters preferred.
Minimum 5 years of experience with progressively more complex data science, applied statistics, and machine learning projects.
Experience utilizing statistical and machine learning methods: data imputation, propensity models, regression (logistic, linear), clustering (k-nearest neighbors, hierarchical), decision trees (CHAID, CART), random forest, uplift modeling, optimization, simulation, time series, hazard function and survival analysis, Bayesian methods, principal component analysis, support vector machines, association rules, ensemble methods, forecasting, model validation, design of experiments.
Domain experience in marketing analytics: customer acquisition, digital marketing, response modeling, clustering, forward looking customer lifetime value, next best offer.
Expert level skills in the data science tool stack: R, Python, SQL, data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau,
Company Info*:
Tivity Health: *
Tivity Health®, Inc. (tivityhealth.com) is a leading provider of health improvement, nutrition, fitness, and social engagement solutions at scale to improve clinical outcomes, reduce healthcare costs and create opportunities to feel better, work better, and live better. With decades of clinical and operational expertise, the company touches millions of consumers through its integrated portfolio of brands and works directly with hundreds of healthcare practitioners and many of the nation’s largest payers and employers. Tens of millions of Americans are currently eligible for Tivity Health’s SilverSneakers®, Prime® Fitness, WholeHealth Living™, and flip50™ programs and millions of people have lost weight with Nutrisystem®, South Beach Diet® and DNA BodyBlueprint™. As part of its commitment to tackling social isolation and loneliness, in 2017, Tivity Health launched a rural aging initiative to address challenges unique to older adults in rural communities.
Our Purpose: *
We empower older adults to live their best lives – with vitality, dignity, and purpose. We enable healthy aging – both in place and in the community.
Our Vision: *
We will transform the aging experience – reducing the burden of chronic conditions among older adults, enabling these to be their best years, and inspiring the next generation that the best is yet to come.
EEO/AA*
Tivity Health. Inc. is an equal employment opportunity employer and is committed to a proactive program of diversity development. Tivity Health, Inc. will continue to recruit, hire, train, and promote into all job levels without regard to race, religion, gender, marital status, familial status, national origin, age, mental or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, source of income, or veteran status.
SQF Standards*
All staff shall be informed of their responsibility to report food safety and quality issues to personnel with authority to initiate action.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $95,000.00 - $125,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We will be working from home until the end of the year (2020). While we plan to be back in the office soon, that date is not determined.

Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
tivityhealth.com
Company's Facebook page:
tivityhealth.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.0,"Nutrisystem
3.0","Fort Washington, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
66,"Associate Director, Oncology R&D – Clinical Scientist",$51-$89 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Join a Legacy of Innovation 110 Years and Counting!

Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical therapies to improve standards of care and address diversified, unmet medical needs of people globally by leveraging our world-class science and technology. With more than 100 years of scientific expertise and a presence in more than 20 countries, Daiichi Sankyo and its 15,000 employees around the world draw upon a rich legacy of innovation and a robust pipeline of promising new medicines to help people. In addition to a strong portfolio of medicines for cardiovascular diseases, under the Group’s 2025 Vision to become a “Global Pharma Innovator with Competitive Advantage in Oncology,” Daiichi Sankyo is primarily focused on providing novel therapies in oncology, as well as other research areas centered around rare diseases and immune disorders.

Job Summary:

Oversees typically a single non-pivotal trial (small size, standard complexity in design and geographic scope). Prepares clinical section of regulatory document. Collaborates as team member with AROs/CROs. Drafts development plans, protocol profiles, and sections of submission documents under guidance of higher level. Reviews and oversee completion of clinical trial protocols. Provides medical and/or scientific direction to Clinical Operations. Represents Clinical Development on Project Teams.

Responsibilities:

Study Strategy: Provides the strategic direction to Biostats Data Mgmt & Data Ops for EDC, edit checks, data quality listings, SAP, Data Mgmt plan; Reviews patient population and protocol compliance for consistency with study strategy; Develops biomarker strategy in collaboration with Translational Medicine/Clin Pharm; May act as Clinical study leader (CSL).

Study Planning and Execution: Provides input on major milestones of trial, clinical trial plan and contingency planning; Analyzes and updates management on potential risks to study deliverables; Provides input on ICF creation; Oversees recruitment and retention; establishes and implements contingency plans for shortfalls; Consults & recruits members for DSMB and/or adjudication committee setup.

Study outputs: Draft responses to IRBs and Health Authorities; Collaborates with Translational Medicine and Clinical Pharmacology to ensure appropriate biomarker, PK / PD measurements; Reviews emerging clinical data regularly; Leads dose-escalation meetings; Performs quality assessment with Delivery Lead e.g. review Tables/Listings/Graphs before database lock and quality check of data; Works with BD&O to ensure SAP update.

External collaboration: Consults with internal experts and external KOLs, Ad Boards for protocol development; Provides input on CRO / ARO Statement of Work and Budget; Establishes effective communication between CRO / vendors / ARO.

Additional non-study related activities: Occasional senior management interactions at FIHC, WDC; Initiates contact w/KOL and prepares material for KOL interactions on a program based need; Involvement with in-licensing and acquisitions on individual due diligence activities

Qualifications: Successful candidates will be able to meet the qualifications below with or without a reasonable accommodation.

Education/Experience:

Master’s degree; PharmD, PhD, or equivalent; Postgraduate training in TA or related specialty, or equivalent, desirable

4+ years with PharmD, PhD and relevant clinical experience
7+ years with Master’s degree and relevant clinical experience

Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.2,"Daiichi Sankyo, Inc.
3.2","Basking Ridge, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1899,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
67,Senior Data Analyst,$85k-$115k (Employer Est.),"About Sysco Labs

Sysco LABS is a technology-focused division within Sysco, dedicated to reimagining foodservice through innovation. An extension of Sysco’s commitment to deliver exceptional products and services to the foodservice industry, Sysco LABS uses customer and market intelligence, data-driven insights and agile technology development to rethink the entire foodservice ecosystem.
Our innovation will improve everything from the ordering process, inventory, pricing and automation to the in-restaurant customer experience. Operating with the mindset of a startup and backed by the authoritative expertise of an industry leader, Sysco LABS’ mission is to improve the Sysco customer experience and consistently deliver cost savings and new innovations through technology.

About the Role

As a Senior Data Analyst at Sysco Labs, you will be responsible for driving strategies and tactics to optimize Sysco products using quantitative data, find answers to broad questions, identify patterns and trends, and make informed decisions to influence product strategy and direction.

Responsibilities
Utilize a combination of exploratory and descriptive analytics to inform product strategy and roadmap, and provide ad-hoc analyses that uncover root cause of recent business trends.
Understand data infrastructure and coordinate with Data Engineering to deliver data models and structures to meet business demands.
Design relevant data models, including outlining dimensions and measures needed, for answering business questions.
Establish and implement product data standards and best practices in order to optimize the data collection, fidelity and accuracy. Develop product measurement plans and dashboards to monitor metrics and KPIs.
Ensure optimization and validations initiatives are implemented, tracked and reviewed postproduction.
Shape, explore and publish data for business analysis or stakeholder initiatives using core Business Intelligence (BI) tools.
Maintain a presence in the broader data and analytics community.
Shape, explore and publish data for business analysis or stakeholder initiatives using core Business Intelligence (BI) tools, such as Tableau and Redash.
Other duties as assigned.
About You

Minimum Qualifications:
6 years’ experience in using data and analytics to drive decisions and insights.
Experience with SQL.
Experience with MixPanel or Google Analytics.
Experience with digital marketing tools such as Google Search Console, Adwords, Marin, Google DoubleClick stack, Tealium, or similar.
Experience with Tableau
Experience with JavaScript tag management.
Experience with Python Analytics/Viz packages.
Experience with R-Studio.
Experience with Data Mining tools such as RapidMiner, Opera, ProM, or similar.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science or related field.
Experience with programmatic media.
Experience with structured and semi-structured data.
Perks at Sysco LABS:
Competitive base & bonus packages
Fun, casual, fast-paced work environment filled with talented colleagues
Brand-new high-tech office space located in the heart of East 6th St, (walking distance to the MetroRail)
Generous PTO policy
Flexible work environment that encourages work/life balance
Fully stocked break room & weekly catered lunch
Excellent medical, dental and vision benefits and company 401(k) program
At Sysco LABS you will be part of a team that values trust, learning, and working together to solve problems. Your efforts will help to build groundbreaking experiences for our customers. Come join us!
We embrace diversity and equal opportunity in a serious way. We are committed to building a team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. The more inclusive we are, the better our work will be.",4.1,"Sysco Labs
4.1","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
68,Azure Databricks Data Engineer,$56k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Collaborate with business stakeholders to identify and meet data requirements
Management of data workflows and pipelines
Responsible for collecting, moving, storing, and preparation of data infrastructure
Manage and secure the flow of structured and unstructured data from multiple sources like ingest, egress , and transform data
Manage, monitor, and ensure the security and privacy of data to satisfy business needs
Other duties as assigned

5 +yrs of Azure experience
Experience with PySpark, Spark SQL, Databricks (notebooks), and Azure Synapse.
** BRMi will not sponsor applicants for work visas for this position.**
**This is a W2 opportunity only**
EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disabled
We are an equal opportunity employer that values diversity and commitment at all levels. All individuals, regardless of personal characteristics, are encouraged to apply. Employment policies and decisions on employment and promotion are based on merit, qualifications, performance, and business needs. The decisions and criteria governing the employment relationship with all employees are made in a nondiscriminatory manner, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, physical or mental disability, medical condition, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.",4.3,"BRMi
4.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
69,"Assistant Director, Data Stewardship",$34k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Requisition Number 20-0025
Post Date 9/22/2020
Title Assistant Director, Data Stewardship
City Washington
State DC
Description Title: Assistant Director, Data Stewardship
Position Type: Full-Time (Two-Year Term)
Location: Washington, DC

What we do and offer our team

AGU is a global community of 118,000 Earth and space scientists, advocates and experts. As the Assistant Director, Data Stewardship, you will be part of a dynamic association that publishes peer-reviewed journals and scientific books and convenes the largest Earth and space science meeting in the world. Through our initiatives, such as mentoring, professional development and awards, AGU upholds and fosters an inclusive and diverse scientific community.

AGU offers our employees great benefits, including flexible work schedules, retirement savings options, as well as health, dental, life and disability insurance. AGU also provides exciting opportunities for professional development and tuition support.

AGU’s Workplace Values

We believe in accountability and ownership of work, by taking responsibility for decisions and results. We believe in member and customer service, and that they come first through providing high quality service.

We believe in excellence and giving it our all, through striving to be outstanding. We believe in integrity by doing the right thing, we achieve this by being honest and fair.

Our teams believe that with teamwork together we achieve more, we achieve this through collaboration. We believe in respect, that you earn it and give it, by open communication and collaboration.

What the Assistant Director, Data Stewardship does

AGU’s data and software policies associated with publications have evolved over the last few years to now require that data and software supporting the research in the paper are preserved in an appropriate repository, described in the availability statement and cited in the references. AGU’s editors and publication team are implementing the new policy with good results.

The Assistant Director, Data Stewardship position is part of the AGU’s Data Leadership program supporting AGU publications, editors, reviewers, authors, and the broader Earth and space science community with support to ensure that data and software supporting AGU publications, specifically those funded by the National Science Foundation EAR grants are preserved in an appropriate repository, included in the availability statement, and cited in the references of the papers.

The incumbent in this role will help to further develop best practices and to serve as a resource to the editors, reviewers, authors, and AGU publications team to support the full implementation of AGU’s data and software publication policies and the broader culture change around data and software sharing.
This is a two-year term position.

• Supports AGU authors in identifying repositories that are aligned with the FAIR guiding principles for data and software before, or at the time of, manuscript submission and ideally identified in the Data Management Plan for the research.
• Ensures that researchers include an availability statement and cite their data and software properly, in references for AGU journals.
• Ensures that AGU Journals tag the data and software citations properly and sends these to Crossref, CHORUS, and other downstream services.
• Develops best practices for the broad journal community, shares those practices, conducts outreach through AGU Data FAIR, Data Help Desk, AGU’s communication channels, and our partners.
• Supports AGU data and software sharing efforts for the purpose of making data and software open and FAIR as a common practice.
• Works with researchers to improve their awareness and understanding of research data management skills that better prepare them to make their data open and FAIR.
• Works with AGU publications staff, providing training and support to those working with editors, reviewers, and authors across all the journals.
• Reviews submitted papers (with priority to NSF-EAR funded research), assesses the viability of the author’s data and software products, determines if any data or software has been used but not included in the availability statements, and recommends improvements to data and software availability statements and citations.
• Supports authors by facilitating their understanding of what is required for their data and software to prepared for publication.
• Supports AGU’s Data FAIR and the Data Help Desk.
• Coordinates with the COPDESS community (https://COPDESS.org) and partners such as ESIP (https://esipfed.org), CHORUS (https://www.chorusaccess.org), Dryad (https://datadryad.org), and others.
• Develops and shares leading practices with the broad community around open and FAIR data and software.
• Supports content management on AGU and partner websites to make information easily available.
• Keeps abreast of new trends and needs through interaction with industry professionals; travels for outreach activities as needed.
• Other duties as assigned.

What the Assistant Director, Data Stewardship brings to the team
• Post-graduate study in the natural sciences or related field; Ph.D. is strongly preferred.
• Minimum of five years of experience with scientific data best practices to include: creation, analysis, management, curation, and preservation.
• Minimum of five years of experience with scholarly publishing process, knowledge of and experience with Earth, space, or environmental science related journals preferred.
• Broad awareness of data practices in the sciences and leading efforts to improve them.
• Breadth of knowledge in industry best practices and related data management technologies.
• Excellent oral and written communication skills.
• Ability to present content in webinars, videos, and other channels using tools such as PowerPoint.
• Ability to coordinate and manage video meetings, webinars, and other online and in person outreach activities.
• Must be capable of dealing calmly and professionally with numerous different personalities from diverse cultures at various levels within and outside of the organization.
• Excellent analytical skills, mathematical and organizational skills required.
• Strong attention to detail.
• Ability to execute responsibilities with minimal supervision required.
• Must be able to perform responsibilities with composure under the stress of deadlines; requirements for accuracy and quality and/or fast pace required.
• Ability to understand the complexity of the factors needed to produce successful meeting programs.
• Ability to travel.

To Apply:

For consideration, please submit your cover letter and resume to
https://rew12.ultipro.com/AME1056/jobboard/NewCandidateExt.aspx?__JobID=407

The successful candidate for this position will be subject to a pre-employment background check.

AGU proudly offers a casual work environment, excellent compensation, generous work-life opportunities, and an outstanding benefits package.

AGU is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities are encouraged to apply.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP
here.
The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor's legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.6,"American Geophysical Union
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1919,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
70,Data Analyst,$34k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Onsite work only - Franklin, Tennessee

Are you looking for a career with a purpose? Do you want the opportunity to be part of a company that’s changing millions of lives for the better? Well, you’ve come to the right place. Ramsey Solutions exists to provide biblically based, commonsense education and empowerment that give HOPE to everyone in every walk of life. Our mission to change the world isn’t easy. We face resistance every day because what we believe is absolutely countercultural. We’re weird. We hate debt. And we actually cut up our credit cards . . . like, for real. We don’t use them in our entire business. Bottom line: We don’t use debt—period. Some of us are still fighting our way out of it, but we aren’t going back in.

Our Analytics and Insights Team has been one of the fastest-growing technology teams at Ramsey Solutions—they’re rocking it! They partner with our 15 digital product areas to help create data-driven solutions for our business problems so we can keep doing work that matters to change more lives. Performing mathematical analysis and using technology to put it into action, this team helps all of us at Ramsey perform at our highest level.

This is where you come in. We need your help to generate data-driven solutions to our business problems. We need a hardcore math nerd—someone who understands mathematical analysis and knows how to use technology to implement it. You’re someone who’s always itching to solve the problem, complete the puzzle, and answer the question. You’re never satisfied with a fluffy answer. You want the facts. You always back up your position with data.

Our data tells a story, and we need you to help us read it. You’ll help us pull back the curtain, notice trends, and apply data to drive change in our business models so we can help more people. If that sounds exciting to you, keep reading.

Skills Needed to Win:
3+ years of experience driving analytics initiatives to impact a business
Solid mathematical or statistics background
Experience with SQL (you’ll use it every day to get the data you need)
Experience with scripting languages like Python and R
Experience building and maintaining dashboards and reporting systems
Ability to translate data into actionable insights
Supporting business decisions through ad hoc analysis
Extraordinary passion to solve problems (you’re not satisfied until it’s solved and backed by data)
Nice-to-Haves:
Experience with data visualization tools like Tableau
Experience utilizing web analytics and Google Analytics tool set
Experience with optimization testing
About Ramsey Solutions:
We’re a debt-free company that was founded in 1992 by Dave Ramsey.
We have over 900 team members who are 100% dedicated to our mission.
We believe collaboration, innovation and a shared sense of mission come from being present with each other. That’s why all of our team members work together under one roof at our headquarters in Franklin, Tennessee.
Ramsey Solutions was recognized by Inc. Magazine as a Best Workplace in the nation for 2020.
And by the way, we're not stuffy or corporate around here. Here are some of the perks and benefits at Ramsey Solutions:
A 401(k) match of 4% after one year as a team member (you can still contribute in the first year)
Health insurance on day one with a $500 HSA match every year
One fully paid workweek of ministry time after one year to volunteer for your favorite charity or nonprofit
Generous PTO and paid sick time off
We prioritize work-life balance and rarely exceed a 40-hour work week
Weekly devotionals with world-renowned speakers, pastors and authors
$300/year to put toward achieving your fitness goals
Casual dress and work environment
It’s a calling, and we’re on a mission to change lives. Join the crusade! Apply now.

EEO/M/F/Veteran/Disabled",3.2,"Ramsey Solutions
3.2","Franklin, TN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
71,Data Scientist - Intermediate,$62k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist, Intermediate level, St. Louis, MO

**No C2C or sponsorship, must be our W2 employee**

Required Qualifications:
PhD in Statistics, Biostatistics, Data Science, Applied Mathematics, or another highly quantitative discipline; or Masters degree plus two years of post-graduate experience.
Demonstrated ability to apply advanced statistical methodology and data science solutions to real-world problems
Strong proficiency in Python
Strong analytical and quantitative problem solving ability, with demonstrated ability to build, test, and iterate on a variety of model forms
Demonstrated ability to work in cross-functional environment
Preferred Qualifications:
Applied experience with agricultural science and/or agricultural datasets
At least 1 year of work experience applying statistics and data science to real-world problems
Machine learning experience
Experience in SQL, PySpark, or SparklyR/Spark
Ability to translate complex technical concepts to collaborations, decision makers, and non-technical audiences
Strong drive to learn new topics and skills and to develop innovative products for our customers
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
72,DATA ANALYST/PROVISIONING,$40k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Oshkosh Defense, an Oshkosh company

Oshkosh Defense stands behind those who dedicate their lives to protecting others. As an industry-leading tactical vehicle manufacturer, every day we strive to meet or exceed our customers' ever-changing needs with next generation defense technologies and advanced systems. We operate with unparalleled commitment to those who depend on our products and services worldwide to perform their missions.

JOB SUMMARY

Develop or supervise logistics support subcontractor development of all ILS contract deliverables for provisioning, associated parts lists, associated support documentation, computer programs and parts catalogs. Interface with the customer to deliver, review, and sell these contract deliverables.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES
Completely understand and use ILS military specifications and associated computer programs.
Understand and implement all contract variations to the basic provisioning and parts catalog specifications and associated computer programs.
Obtain a complex set of source materials required for the development of all ILS deliverables from all vendors, Oshkosh engineering, and Oshkosh purchasing to include supplier cost information.
Supervise or computer load and process all materials developed and maintain complex customer based computer program through Oshkosh-based ILS computer programs, meeting with the customer to resolve problems.
Maintain all data current with changes and record all change in program configuration control document.
Review data against repair and overhaul manuals, drawing packages, and hardware to assure consistency of all ILS contract deliverables.
Identify and cost ILS impact for all changes affecting provisioning, computer program outputs, and parts catalogs.
Maintain JDE 7.3 item master, bills of materials, cross reference and branch plants.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors degree in mathematics, statistics or like field.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS

· Proficient with Microsoft Excel

· Advanced database software knowledge (ie: Access, Maple)

· Numeric Data Entry Experience

· FEDLOG, Logicom and Logistic Information Warehouse (LIW) a plus
OSK100
LI-TLD1
Oshkosh is committed to working with and offering reasonable accommodation to job applicants with disabilities. If you need assistance or an accommodation due to disability for any part of the employment process, please contact us at: 920-502-3009 or corporatetalentacquisition@oshkoshcorp.com.

Oshkosh Corporation is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. This company will provide equal opportunity to all individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status. Information collected regarding categories as provided by law will in no way affect the decision regarding an employment application.

Oshkosh Corporation will not discharge or in any manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with Oshkosh Corporation's legal duty to furnish information.

Certain positions with Oshkosh Corporation require access to controlled goods and technologies subject to the International Traffic in Arms Regulations or the Export Administration Regulations. Applicants for these positions may need to be ""U.S. Persons,"" as defined in these regulations. Generally, a ""U.S. Person"" is a U.S. citizen, lawful permanent resident, or an individual who has been admitted as a refugee or granted asylum.",4.2,"Oshkosh Corporation
4.2","Oshkosh, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
73,Energetics Engineer (Research Scientist),$62k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Battelles founding mission to translate scientific discovery and technology advances into societal benefit is as relevant today as when we opened our doors over 90 years ago. Our science and technology enhance society's well-being and create critical innovations that drive scientific advances for the future. We conduct groundbreaking research and development, design and manufacture leading-edge products, and deliver critical services for commercial and government customers. Our work meets the needs of the nation when it matters most, and Battelle is committed to driving innovation today and for generations to come.
JOB SUMMARY
Battelle’s National Security Business Unit is currently seeking candidates for a full time, permanent position as an Energetics Engineer (Research Scientist) to provide support to government and commercial programs focused on the development, testing, evaluation, and implementation of materials, devices, and techniques designed to detect, provide protection against, and mitigate the effects of explosives.
MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES
Execution, data analysis, documentation, and client communication assistance on various projects involving munitions/explosives/small arms testing and evaluation.
Assistance in the resolution/troubleshooting of technical difficulties and safety hazards involving munitions/explosives/small arms testing and evaluation.
Assist in the design and planning of projects, potentially including technical leadership of small teams of multidisciplinary scientists and technical support staff in the performance of selected tasks/projects within time and budget constraints.
Drafting of documentation of laboratory findings and results, including progress reports, final reports, and presentations.
Assistance with posters, articles, and presentations for technical conferences.
Assist with business development efforts, including cost estimation and preparation of white papers and proposals.
Oversee, mentor and train lower-level staff.
Domestic travel of approximately 10% of the time, with some travel events lasting 1-2 weeks.
THE FOLLOWING IS REQUIRED
Bachelor’s degree in chemistry, chemical engineering, mechanical engineering, or a related discipline.
Approximately 5 years of experience with munitions/explosives research, development, and/or test and evaluation
Excellent oral and written communication skills.
Sole US citizenship, with the ability to obtain and maintain required government security clearances as a condition of employment.
Sufficient medical fitness to work in the laboratory and in the field to perform assigned duties, including working in test chambers, test ranges, munitions bunkers, and field environments.
The ability to work in a team environment.
THE FOLLOWING IS DESIRED
Experience with modeling and simulation of explosive/energetic events
Safe handling practices for munitions and ordnance
Small arms handling, modification, armoring, gunsmithing
Experience with instrumentation for characterizing properties of energetic materials (e.g., DSC/TGA, bomb calorimetry, etc.)
Experience with flash X-ray and high-rate data capture (video, audio, pressure, electrical)
Experience with leading DOD contracted efforts including DFARS, IDIQ, and OTA contracted research
Explosives formulation, synthesis, handling, and passivation, including military, commercial, and improvised explosives
Experience with aerosol generation/measurement, sampling, characterization, air pollution analysis, and/or spray systems.
LEGAL DISCLAIMER
The above statements are intended to describe the nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, activities and skills required of staff members. No statement herein is intended to imply any authorities to commit Battelle unless special written permission is granted by Battelle’s Legal Department.

BENEFITS

Battelles competitive benefits program includes comprehensive medical and dental care, matching 401K, paid time off, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, and other benefits that help provide financial protection for you and your family.

Battelle provides employment and opportunities for advancement, compensation, training, and growth according to individual merit, without regard to race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, age, genetic information, disability, veteran-status, or any other characteristic protected under applicable Federal, state, or local law. Our goal is for each staff member to have the opportunity to grow to the limits of their abilities and to achieve personal and organizational objectives. We will support positive programs for equal treatment of all staff and full utilization of all qualified employees at all levels within Battelle.

For more information about our other openings, please visit www.battelle.org/careers",3.3,"Battelle
3.3","West Jefferson, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1929,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
74,Scientist III or higher,$37k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"SEKISUI XenoTech, LLC is currently looking to add a Scientist III or higher (based on experience and/or education) to the Analytical Services department. The Analytical Services department is a contract service and support department focused on providing analytical support for SEKISUI XenoTech’s products and services. This department also provides services in method validation, metabolite identification and Bioanalysis.

Essential duties and responsibilities include, but are not limited to the following:
Operates the LCMS systems with no supervision. Processes and reviews analytical data.
Ensures maintenance of laboratories and equipment. Troubleshoot problems with laboratory instruments and software.
Maintains appropriate logs, records and studies notebooks.
Participates in administrative and scientific meetings as requested.
Keeps accurate administrative records (e.g., purchase requisitions, timesheets, expense reports)
Trains employees at or below the specified level.
Serves as Lead Scientist or Study Director, as needed. Prepares, or assists in the preparation of reports requiring specialized scientific knowledge
Adheres to Good Laboratory Practice regulations and SEKISEI XenoTech safety policies and procedures
Serves as a reviewer or owner of Standard Operating Procedures. Writes and/or reviews Standard Operating Procedures.
Conducts routine laboratory functions including diluting, labeling and dispensing of biological samples, reagent solution preparation, equipment repair, laboratory upkeep, maintains inventory of supplies, and various other responsibilities.
Conducts research and development for new method development with minimal supervision. Independently develops and validate new methods and procedures
Participates in company’s research and development effort by staying abreast of developments in specific research fields, suggesting areas of new R&D and conducting experiments as directed

QUALIFICATIONS: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Doctoral degree (Ph.D.); Masters (M.S./M.A.) degree and three years related laboratory experience; or Bachelor’s degree (B.S./B.A.) from five-year college or university plus four or more years related laboratory experience preferred
Must have an understanding of basic techniques and equipment of a biochemistry laboratory. Must have relevant experience in the use of centrifuges, spectrophotometer, incubators, balances, pH meters, HPLC/UPLC systems, mass spectrometer systems (HRMS and Triple quads) and other routine equipment. Good understanding of elementary chemical principles. Knowledge or familiarity with scientific terminology.
Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.
Ability to write routine reports, notes-to-file, and correspondence.
Literate and proficient in the use of personal computers and peripheral equipment (e.g., printers, etc.).Proficient in software programs such as word processing, spreadsheet, graphics, statistical analysis, imaging and slide maker, and enzyme kinetics. Ability to learn new software programs, as needed.
High attention to detail and detail-oriented record keeping.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to stand; display finger dexterity, handle, or feel; and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to walk, sit, stoop, kneel, crouch, crawl, talk, hear; taste and/or smell. The employee must frequently lift and/or move up to 10 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

WORK ENVIRONMENT: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently exposed to fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. The employee is occasionally exposed to moving mechanical parts, risk of electrical shock, biohazards, flammable liquids, risk of radiation, and vibration. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. At times, the noise level can be louder and hearing protection may be required.

Those interested may apply via the online link. No phone calls please.

SEKISUI XenoTech is an EEO employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",3.2,"Sekisui XenoTech, LLC
3.2","Kansas City, KS",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
75,Fire Safety Specialist / Staff Scientist I - Healthcare,$71k-$85k (Employer Est.),"EH&E, the Company:
EH&E is an employee owned company that provides businesses, agencies and institutions with innovative and cost saving solutions for their health and safety, environmental and engineering needs. We protect hospitals, higher education institutions, biotech/ pharmaceutical companies and governmental agencies against pollutants/contaminants such as mold, ensuring safety in the workplace. Headquartered in our aesthetically beautiful, remodeled office in Newton, Massachusetts; EH&E is a trusted, recognized partner engaged with international governmental agencies, large scale enterprises, and leading education and healthcare facilities. www.eheinc.com

Job Description:
As a representative of EH&E's Healthcare team, a Fire Safety Specialist /Staff Scientist I, is an experienced environmental health and safety professional who will work with one of our healthcare clients in Boston, MA. This role educates, trains, and provides support to hospital operations in the development and execution of consistent fire and life safety programs. This role will provide the environmental health and safety department depth and knowledge in building code and emergency egress compliance, ILSM program elements, construction safety, fire drills, permitting, investigations, fire and life safety inspections with regulatory agencies, and the capability of leading recurring meetings. This role will participate in other various environmental health and safety programs consisting of but not limited to indoor air quality, environmental investigations and sampling, emergency response, risk assessment, accident investigation, developing and tracking fire and life safety incident trends, and developing and managing programs for improving performance primarily related to fire and life safety. As a member of the environmental health and safety department, this role shares responsibility in ensuring compliance with all safety and environmental programs. This role leads an important safety component within the department, which the client views as critical to its values and mission in providing a safe and compliant work environment enabling the hospital to provide best in class healthcare. This role assists in leading a proactive safety and environmental program and improves the quality of safety and environmental management processes following established regulations, policies, standards, and practices. The successful applicant will be supported by a team of industry experts who will nurture and develop your career. This position reports directly to the Project Manager. We offer competitive salary packages and excellent benefits. If you are interested in this opportunity, we would be delighted to hear from you
Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Sales & Client Relations:
Responsible for maintaining the integrity of the business by presenting a positive, professional, and respectful image to our clients
Identify potential opportunities to senior staff
Deliver services on projects that meet or exceed client expectations
Regularly consults with members of the Facilities department and fire and compliance specialist personnel on inspection findings and provide appropriate recommendations based on regulatory compliance and best practice guidance.
QA/QC:
Participates in and may lead fire and life safety specific recurring meetings
Conducts and oversees the hospital fire drill program with internal qualified personnel within the department in accordance with federal, state, and local government regulations and agencies’ policies;
Collect quality data as well as field data by other project staff
Coordinates and implements programs aimed at mitigation and/or control strategies of fire and life safety vulnerabilities.
Training/Mentoring:
Willingness and openness to professional development
Prepares and delivers classroom-based and online EH&S training programs focused primarily in fire and life safety, and may be called upon to deliver training content in other safety-related areas as needed.. Updates written materials with code compliance changes as needed
Conducts follow-up with various stakeholders as needed.
Customer Satisfaction:
Represent respectful professional image
Interact with client’s staff to execute work
Contribute to client satisfaction as a valuable team member.
Technical Expertise:
Ability to apply basic scientific principles to EH&E’s work while developing observational ability and functional analytical skills in discipline
Has familiarity with TJC, CMS, and NFPA standards, and has desire to expand knowledgebase in each
Performs code compliance risk assessments for work that may alter, buildout or remove portions of healthcare buildings
Conducts environmental monitoring related to leaks and floods to mitigate risk to patient care
Participates as an after-hours emergency responder; has the ability to respond to chemical, biological, and other after-hour emergencies
Utilizes mobile devices to collect inspection information.
Communication and reports:
Written and verbal communication skills are essential as you will be contributing to reports
Clearly communicate technical concepts while maintaining context and understanding the audience.
Financial Management:
Be able to work within timelines and report any deviations to this to management
Achieve project profitability goals.
Key Skills:
NFPA knowledge and experience, preferably in a healthcare of closely related environment
Excellent interpersonal, written and communication skills
Driver’s license, occasional travel required
The ability to work well under pressure
Teamworking skills
Good analytical skills
Ability to work independently when required
Proficient in MS Word, Excel, and Access
The ability to cope with shift work and unsocial hours, which are at times required
Experience with standard office equipment (computers, phones, and photocopiers).
Education / Training:
Bachelor of Science (BS), with fire and life safety experience as a responsibility in past roles. Experience in a fire and life safety focused role in a healthcare environment; or, at least experience working in a healthcare environment for a facilities or safety department with an understanding and familiarity of the importance of this role. Background working with TJC and NFPA standards, specifically related to building code compliance.

Professional Certifications & Memberships Preferred:
HAZWOPER certification; DOT/RCRA certification
Experience / Background / Knowledge:
Must have at least 2-5 years of experience in an EH&S department, preferably in a healthcare environment or closely related field with a strong background in fire and life safety code.
EH&E, an employee-owned company, offers a competitive salary, excellent growth potential, and a robust benefits package including profit sharing, Employee Stock Ownership Plan, tuition assistance, and 401(k).
Environmental Health & Engineering is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). Qualified applicants are considered for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, disability or veteran status.
Please send résumé and salary expectations to HumanResources@eheinc.com",3.7,"Environmental Health
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
76,"Manager, Data Science - Data Analytics (Phoenix, AZ)",$76k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Science Manager

Location: PHL or PHX (preferred)

General Summary:

Provides leadership, people management, and tactical input on the planning and execution of data science initiatives that drive business results. Establishes performance standards, operations planning and budgets while overseeing project and vendor management.

Responsibilities

Primary Responsibilities:

Responsible for strategic design, implementation, integration, testing, validation, documentation, review, maintenance and accessibility of resources which enable effective and reliable data science, data visualization and business intelligence.
Applies knowledge of general business functions and systems to develop strategies, operational plans and standards to support achievement of department, business and corporate goals.
Maintains effective team by recruiting, selecting, orienting, and training employees; maintaining a safe, secure, and legal work environment; and developing employees’ professional growth opportunities.
Achieves staff results by communicating job expectations; planning, monitoring, and appraising job results; coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees; developing, coordinating, and enforcing systems, policies, procedures, and productivity standards.
Manages people, projects, and products supporting department goals to improve company efficiency, compliance, profitability and stakeholder satisfaction.

Core Responsibilities:

Plans and manages detailed project timelines; provides reporting on status to key stakeholders.
Provides line management to direct reports, including training, performance management, professional development and coaching.
Proactively raises data science concerns, risks and issues that may delay/ impact the submission and presents risk mitigation strategy.
Keeps abreast of data science requirements to ensure compliance and client success.
Knowledge of machine learning and predictive modeling. • Knowledge of relational databases, scripting languages, and statistical computing packages. • Knowledge of applied statistics, including regression models.
Basic knowledge of company people management policies and procedures, including hiring, performance management, corrective action and compensation administration. • Basic people management skills including coaching, interviewing, and providing feedback and recognition. • Excellent written and oral communication skills. • Ability to manage team resources to ensure attainment of department objectives
Qualifications

Qualifications:

Master’s degree or international equivalent preferred
6 years’ relevant experience including 2 years in a leadership capacity
Equivalent combination of education, training, and relevant experience may be considered in place of the education and experience stated above. All employees must read, write and speak fluent English and host country language.
This job description is intended to present the general content and requirements for the performance of this job. The description is not to be construed as an exhaustive statement of duties, responsibilities or requirements.
Technical Skillset:

Oracle
Coding - navigating coding is key
Hadoop
SAS Data Sets
WPS
Looking for people that know how to code - Python, etc.

Patient Data, Prescription Data, Claims Data, Medical Payers,

PRA is an EEO/AA employer and is committed to providing opportunities to minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities.

Options
Apply for this job onlineApply
Share
Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment. Please refresh the page and try again later.
Share on your newsfeed
Connect With Us!",3.8,"PRA Health Sciences
3.8","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
77,Grants Manager/Data Analyst,-1,"Responsibilities

• Management of grant-funded projects

• Administrative tasks in support of grant applications

• Develop and implement systems for generating project reports

• Generate grant reports and ensure timely submission

• Develop project evaluation components

• Generate data dashboards

• Analyze data and generate data-driven reports

Duties

• Supervise the development of policies or procedures for specific grants received

• Collaborate with local organizations and agencies

• Provide guidance and monitoring regardomg the performance of grant activities

• Assist the CEO and CFO in complying with grant requirements, including providing reports, billing, and other data as required by funders.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Grants Management: 2 years (Required)
Project Management: 2 years (Required)
Data Analysis: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Language:
Spanish (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.cwwilliams.org
Company's Facebook page:
@CWWCHC
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",1.0,"C. W. Williams Community Health Center, Inc.
1.0","Charlotte, NC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
78,Data Scientist,$80k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"E.W. Scripps is a company rich in media history focused on the future. We are one of the nation's largest independent TV station owners with 60 stations nationwide, and we are working to stay ahead of the ways in which people use technology to find news and information. Our commitment to the future means that discovery is commonplace, the status quo is challenged, iteration and collaboration are the norm and new ideas are welcome. Join a team of top performers and help shape the future of the most strategic and well positioned media company – E. W. Scripps. This position will be located in Cincinnati, OH or Washington, DC.

At Scripps, you’ll:
Have a complete modern data science/analytics software stack at your disposal.
Enjoy a broad scope of responsibility – with projects and questions from every part of the business and new businesses under consideration.
Know that your work will have an impact on key strategic decisions – changing and shaping the way we do business. This is why we are so selective in our hiring process.
Grow your talent with constant learning – with substantial investments in on-site and hands-on training and eLearning formats used to fill in the gaps.
Work on projects that are important and interesting to you – with focus on modern media and marketing strategies
Expand your horizons by attending and giving talks at conferences and professional networking opportunities with senior analytics professionals.
Become a leading expert in applied data science for media.
We are looking for someone who knows how to use the latest data analytics tools, will thrive in our fast-paced innovative environment, will deliver results and has the following experience and credentials.

Primary purpose:

The Data Scientist blends the skills of a business thinker with those of a data analyst: asking questions, turning data into knowledge, forming conclusions, and making recommendations that enable the company to innovate, differentiate itself from its competitors, work smarter, make better decisions, and enhance profitability. This individual will partner with the analytics team, analytics products and services director, business leaders and end users to be a change agent - teasing out the questions that are important to our business, and then use statistical analysis and data mining techniques to inform the answers and communicate conclusions both visually and in writing, along with recommendations and next steps. The Data Scientist will also participate in the creation and measurement of new business processes, tools, and products.

Key responsibilities:
Influence the course of the business as a trusted advisor to business leaders, users and clients, using data and analytics as a basis for better, more informed decision making
Creation of analytics and measurement roadmaps
Identify impactful choices or courses of action that drive value for the organization
Evaluate the big picture and solve business problems in addition to focusing on metrics
Influence the direction of the business by effectively communicating conclusions to cross-functional groups
Create automation applications to replace tasks for critical revenue generating teams decreasing time dedicated to non-revenue generating
Mine large amounts of data and perform data analysis to extract useful business insights for a wide range of topics including product development and performance, market dynamics, consumer and audience knowledge, internal operations, and external research
Initial study design, acquisition of data, prototyping and production roll out
Ongoing tracking, monitoring, and periodic follow-up studies
Support the design and implement of reporting dashboards that track key business metrics and provide actionable insights
Use software and other tools to develop analyses that identify patterns, influences, correlations, relationships, predictive factors, risk factors, and that provide better situational awareness
Creation of models, simulations, and optimization routines
Develop of data flows and acquisition strategies to facilitate the capture and sharing of data and analytics within the organization
Support the development of Scripps analytics products and services by providing input into product roadmaps
Be a positive force to cultivate a culture that is passionate about developing analytics as a business competency
Drive accountability for value recognition and business results
Create and contribute to a quality work environment that motivates team members to perform at their highest levels and positively affects employee and business partner relationships
Be a publicly visible presence, including creating communications and leading training sessions, advocating for the benefits of analytics in Scripps and the products/services of the analytics team
Education / work experience:
Bachelor's required, Masters preferred. Applied statistics, Computer Science, business analytics or a related field.
Minimum 3 years, 5+ years preferred, experience in solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches apply to this requirement.
Experience and demonstrated success presenting complex analyses and final recommendations to business leaders and external clients.
Statistical method experience:
Analysis techniques such as marketing mix modeling, scenario modeling, pattern detection, A/B testing, nearest neighbor, cluster analysis, sentiment analysis, decision trees, optimization, simulation, regression analysis, agent-based modeling, ensemble models, collaborative filtering and other types of analysis
Software Proficiency:
Python, RapidMiner, R
Database skills (Snowflake, MySQL) experience preferred
Tableau
About Scripps:

The E.W. Scripps Company (NASDAQ: SSP) advances understanding of the world through journalism. As the nation’s fourth-largest independent TV station owner, Scripps operates 60 television stations in 42 markets. Scripps empowers the next generation of news consumers with its multiplatform news network Newsy and reaches growing audiences through broadcast networks including Bounce and Court TV. Scripps runs an award-winning investigative reporting newsroom in Washington, D.C., and is the longtime steward of the Scripps National Spelling Bee. Founded in 1878, Scripps has held for decades to the motto, “Give light and the people will find their own way.”

As an equal employment opportunity employer, The E.W. Scripps Company and its affiliates do not discriminate in its employment decisions on the basis on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender, color, religion, age, genetic information, medical condition, disability, marital status, citizenship or national origin, and military membership or veteran status, or on any other basis which would be in violation of any applicable federal, state or local law. Furthermore, the company will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities unless doing so would result in an undue hardship for the company.

If interested, please apply at www.scripps.com/careers.

#LI-CH1

#GD-CH1",3.6,"The E.W. Scripps Company
3.6","Cincinnati, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1878,Company - Public,TV Broadcast & Cable Networks,Media,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
79,Senior Quantitative Analyst/Quantitative Analyst III,$90k-$177k (Glassdoor Est.),"The
Senior Quantitative Analyst will be an integral part of RADAR’s Retail
Supervisory Modeling Team (SMT). The Retail SMT has responsibility for
projecting losses associated with U.S. retail credit exposure groups (including
auto loans, credit and charge cards, first lien mortgage loans, and home equity
mortgage loans) for bank holding companies subject to the supervisory stress
test (DFAST and CCAR). You will perform statistical and econometric analysis to
support research, development, and implementation of the retail models in
accordance with the development cycle set forth by the Model Oversight Group
(MOG). You will provide initial and
final stress test estimates for each applicable firm, including written
explanations of analysis and results, and presentations to the MOG. The Senior
Quantitative Analyst will assist with maintaining model soundness and control
documentation in accordance with MOG standards. You will assist the team with model reviews by
the Supervisory Modeling Validation (SMV) team, providing explanations and
responses to follow-up requests and addressing SMV findings, as appropriate. You also assist FR staff on longer-term
research projects involving retail lending.

This position requires access to confidential supervisory information and/or
FOMC information, which is limited to “Protected Individuals” as defined in the
U.S. federal immigration law. Protected Individuals include, but are not
limited to, U.S. citizens, U.S. nationals, and U.S. permanent residents who
either are not yet eligible to apply for naturalization or who have applied for
naturalization within the requisite timeframe. Candidates who are permanent
residents must sign a declaration of intent to become a U.S. citizen when
eligible to do so and pursue a path to citizenship. Candidates who are not U.S.
citizens or U.S. permanent residents may be eligible for the information access
required for this position if they sign a declaration of intent to become
a permanent resident and a U.S. citizen and meet other eligibility
requirements. In addition, all candidates must undergo an applicable background
check and comply with all applicable information handling rules.

To
be considered for the position, please submit a resume and cover letter.

About
the Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia:

The Federal
Reserve Bank of Philadelphia is one of the 12 regional Reserve Banks that,
together with the Board of Governors in Washington, D.C., make up the Federal
Reserve System. It helps formulate and implement monetary policy,
supervises banks and bank and savings and loan holding companies, and provides
financial services to depository institutions and the federal
government. The Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia serves eastern and
central Pennsylvania, southern New Jersey, and Delaware.

Background
investigations including drug testing are required for all new hires as a
condition of employment, after the job offer is made. Employment may not begin until the Bank
accepts the results of the background investigation.

To
see the full job description, click the link:

https://www.philadelphiafed.org/-/media/67799981834740d49d69b177998c3bc8.ashx

To
Apply:

Go
to https://www.philadelphiafed.org/careers/job-openings.cfm
and find the ""Senior Quantitative Analyst/Quantitative Analyst III""
position.

We offer a great
benefits package that features:
Medical (4 options), Prescription, Dental
(3 options), and Vision Insurance
401k/Thrift Plan with
generous employer match
Employer-funded Pension Plan
Paid Vacation/Sick Time&
Holidays
Monthly Commuter Allowance
Flexible Spending Accounts
and Healthcare Spending Accounts
Flexible Work Schedule
available in most departments
Tuition Reimbursement
Parental Leave
Onsite 24/7 Fitness Center
including training classes, Peloton bikes and locker room / shower
facilities
Onsite Cafeteria and Coffee
Shop
Additional convenience
benefits, discounts and more…
The Federal
Reserve Bank of Philadelphia believes that diversity and inclusion among our
employees is essential to our success as an organization, and we want to
recruit, develop and retain the most accomplished people from a diverse
candidate pool. To support a workplace culture of belonging, we offer seven
employee resource groups (ERGs) and a 100 percent rating on the Human Rights
Campaign (HRC) Corporate Equality Index. The Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia
is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.6,"Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia
3.6","Philadelphia, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1914,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
80,"Scientist, Allogeneic CAR T Cell Research",-1,"Allogene Therapeutics, with headquarters in South San Francisco, is a clinical-stage biotechnology company pioneering the development of allogeneic chimeric antigen receptor T cell (AlloCAR T™) therapies for cancer. Led by a management team with significant experience in cell therapy, Allogene is developing a pipeline of “off-the-shelf” CAR T cell therapy candidates with the goal of delivering readily available cell therapy on-demand, more reliably, and at greater scale to more patients. For more information, please visit www.allogene.com, and follow @AllogeneTx on Twitter and LinkedIn.

Allogene Therapeutics is seeking a highly motivated Scientist to evaluate CAR T cell therapies against solid tumors. The successful applicant will support the preclinical in vitro and in vivo characterization of CAR T cells and potential antibody combination studies for solid tumor indications. The ideal candidate is an individual who is excited to take on new challenges in a dynamic and highly collaborative environment.

Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

Cell culture, including cell line maintenance and CAR T cell generation
Set up in vitro assays including CAR T cell phenotyping, short and long-term cytotoxicity assays to evaluate the function of CAR T cells against tumor targets
Execute in vivo studies to assess CAR T cell anti-tumor efficacy and safety using mouse models
Harvest and process mouse tissues, and perform immunophenotyping ex vivo as needed
Analysis and interpretation of experimental data
Work collaboratively with other biologists and protein engineers
Maintain detailed records of experimental protocols and results
Stay up to date on latest scientific and technology advancements in the field
Present at group meetings and project team meetings
Other duties as assigned

Position Requirements & Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in Biology or related field with at least 5 years of experience or a Master’s degree with at least 3 years of experience in an academic and/or industrial setting
Academic experience in immunology or cellular biology
Experience with aseptic technique and good cell culture practice is essential. Experience with primary T cell culture is highly preferred
Experience with immunological assays such as multi-color flow cytometry, ELISA and cytotoxicity, is highly preferred
Proficiency in mouse handling is essential. Experience with in vivo techniques such as dosing (e.g. subcutaneous, intravenous and intraperitoneal), blood collection, bioluminescent imaging, caliper measurement, and tissue harvesting is highly preferred
Proficiency in the use of software tools to support data analysis tasks (e.g., Prism, FlowJo, Word, Excel and PowerPoint)
Ability to take initiative, willingness to learn and adopt new experimental skills as needed
Excellent organizational skills and an ability to maintain detailed documentation
Comfortable in a fast-paced small company environment with minimal direction and able to adjust workload based upon changing priorities
Ability to work independently and as part of a team
Strong interpersonal skills including verbal and written communication are essential in this collaborative work environment
Candidates must be authorized to work in the U.S.

As an equal opportunity employer, Allogene Inc. is committed to a diverse workforce. Employment decisions regarding recruitment and selection will be made without discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin, gender, age, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, genetic information or characteristic, gender identity and expression, veteran status, or other non-job related characteristics or other prohibited grounds specified in applicable federal, state and local laws.

#LI-MT1",5.0,"Allogene Therapeutics
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
81,Data Scientist (Remote Work Option),$64k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Relocation Assistance Offered Within Country
# 88040 - Topeka, Kansas, United States

Job Summary:

We are looking for a Data Scientist who will support our cross-functional teams with insights gained from analyzing company data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Main Responsibilities:

Develop custom data models and algorithms to address business challenges
Assess quality of data sources
Evaluate technical feasibility of business problems
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Lead data automation projects to aggregate disparate data sources
Partner with IT to align on data architecture, tools and technologies

Main Requirements:

Bachelor's degree required; Certificate, Master’s or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field a plus
At least 2 years experience using computer languages (Python, R, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience communicating technical concepts to non-technical audiences
Experience with a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Experience with cloud services: GCP, AWS, etc
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Facebook Insights, Nielsen, etc.
Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Tableau, Data Studio, etc

Equal Opportunity Employer
Colgate is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, age, disability, marital status, veteran status (United States positions), or any other characteristic protected by law

Are you interested in working for Hill's Pet Nutrition? You can apply online and attach all relevant documents such as a cover letter and resume or CV. Applications received by e-mail are not considered in the selection process. Become part of our team. We look forward to your application.

Work that matters, fueled by passion for pets! At Hill’s we have a purpose. Every day around the world, we transform the lives of millions of pet families through pioneering innovation, amazing nutrition, and the best and brightest people. Founded more than 75 years ago with an unwavering commitment to pet nutrition, Hills' mission is to help enrich and lengthen the special relationships between people and their pets.

HILL'S® Prescription Diet® therapeutic pet foods, HILL'S® Science Diet® and HILL'S® Ideal Balance™ wellness pet foods are sold worldwide. Hill’s is a division of Colgate-Palmolive, a leading global consumer products company, tightly focused on Oral Care, Personal Care, Home Care and Pet Nutrition, with sales of products in more than 200 countries. To learn more about Hill's and Colgate, please visit http://www.hillspet.com and http://www.colgatepalmolive.com, or find us on LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter and YouTube.

Reasonable accommodation during the application process is available for persons with disabilities. Please contact Application_Accommodation@colpal.com with the subject ""Accommodation Request"" should you require accommodation.",4.1,"Hill's Pet Nutrition
4.1","Topeka, KS",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1907,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
82,Data Scientist,$69k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Design, implement and optimize algorithms for unsupervised and supervised learning based on structured and unstructured data. Develop powerful business insights from social, marketing, industrial data and public policy using advanced machine learning techniques. Work closely with the software engineering team to productize analytic software. Collaborate with system integration and data warehouse engineers on data extraction and data cleaning. Work in a highly interactive, team-oriented environment. Requires a bachelor’s degree in a STEM or related field and 5 years of experience, or a Master’s degree in same with 3 years, or a PhD.",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
83,Associate Data Scientist/ Data Scientist (Remote Work Option),$57k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Relocation Assistance Offered Within Country
# 86732 - Topeka, Kansas, United States

We are looking for a Data Scientist who will support our cross-functional teams with insights gained from analyzing company data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Responsibilities for Data Scientist

Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging company data to drive business solutions.
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Develop company A/B testing framework and test model quality.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy.

Qualifications for Data Scientist

We’re looking for someone with at least 2 years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models,
Bachelor's degree required; Certificate, Master’s or PHD in Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field a plus
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on product development.
Experience using statistical computer languages (R, Python, SQL, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights from large data sets.
Experience working with and creating data architectures.
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
Familiarity with the following software/tools:Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: Java, R, Python, SQL
Experience with cloud services: GCP, AWS, etc
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Facebook Insights, etc.
Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Data Studio, Datalab, Redshift, etc

Equal Opportunity Employer
Colgate is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, age, disability, marital status, veteran status (United States positions), or any other characteristic protected by law.

Are you interested in working for Hill's Pet Nutrition? You can apply online and attach all relevant documents such as a cover letter and resume or CV. Applications received by e-mail are not considered in the selection process. Become part of our team. We look forward to your application.

Work that matters, fueled by passion for pets! At Hill’s we have a purpose. Every day around the world, we transform the lives of millions of pet families through pioneering innovation, amazing nutrition, and the best and brightest people. Founded more than 75 years ago with an unwavering commitment to pet nutrition, Hills' mission is to help enrich and lengthen the special relationships between people and their pets.

HILL'S® Prescription Diet® therapeutic pet foods, HILL'S® Science Diet® and HILL'S® Ideal Balance™ wellness pet foods are sold worldwide. Hill’s is a division of Colgate-Palmolive, a leading global consumer products company, tightly focused on Oral Care, Personal Care, Home Care and Pet Nutrition, with sales of products in more than 200 countries. To learn more about Hill's and Colgate, please visit http://www.hillspet.com and http://www.colgatepalmolive.com, or find us on LinkedIn, Facebook, Twitter and YouTube.

Reasonable accommodation during the application process is available for persons with disabilities. Please contact Application_Accommodation@colpal.com with the subject ""Accommodation Request"" should you require accommodation.",4.1,"Hill's Pet Nutrition
4.1","Topeka, KS",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1907,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
84,Insight & Analytics Data Analyst,$36k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Insight & Analytics Data Analyst will support our Sr. Analysts and Directors who are managing clients and project work. The position entails measuring business objectives against client KPIs and requires strong technical skills with data analysis and visualization, as well as the ability to craft key insights and findings and present work when required. The Data Analyst will also play a role in various research projects that require an understanding of earned media analysis, and social and web analytics, with a tool-agnostic approach. Multi-tasking and working on several projects at once will be part of the job experience.

Job Functions:
Develops strategy insights that are compelling, actionable, and statistically rigorous, identifying trends and anomalies, and triangulating data gaps
Understanding of project management elements and what role they play, meet deadlines and apply critical thinking to ask questions and help problem solve when needed.
Data visualization expertise and the ability to translate data from multiple data sources into a compelling story.
Has a collaborative mindset, is willing to work with others and take direction.
Applies sophisticated analysis to datasets to discern and identify patterns and recommend relatable actions.
Ability to multi-task and manage competing priorities in a time-sensitive environment.
Ability to ask the right questions to understand business problems and identify measurement or research objectives.
Other duties as assigned.

Minimum/Preferred Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative discipline (Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Data Science) or marking/communications (Strategic Communications, Marketing Communications, Market Research), or the equivalent combination of education and experience
2-3 years of data analysis, data visualization, and/or market research experience is required.
Proficient with Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Power BI
Has passion and ability to learn new technologies, tools and platforms. Experience with social analytics platforms such as Talkwalker, Audiense, Netbase, Sprinklr or similar platforms is a plus.
Additional Requirements:
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate actively and work in a team environment.
Solid organizational and project management skills.
Self-motivated and able to adapt quickly to changing priorities and tight deadlines.
Strong presentation and consulting skills along with the ability to read, write and speak English
Experience working remotely or with colleagues in multiple locations
Must be able to work more than 40 hours per week on occasion
Travel: may on occasion need to travel, up to 10%

Equal Opportunity: WE provides equal employment opportunity and does not discriminate against an employee or applicant because of age, race, color, religion, gender, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, or other legally protected class status.
Diversity and Inclusion: WE values a diverse and inclusive workforce and is committed to creating a workplace where everyone thrives. We promote an atmosphere in which diversity of people and ideas are welcomed and valued. Diversity includes differences in race, religion, gender, age, lifestyle, ethnic background and sexual orientation as well as differences in experiences and ideas.
*LI-TQ1
WAG123",3.7,"WE Communications
3.7","Portland, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
85,Computational Scientist II,$108k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"Location: South San Francisco, CA, United States
Job Identification: 532
Job Schedule: Full time

Description
Myriad Genetics is a trailblazing genetic testing company that has helped millions of patients make critical healthcare decisions. We are the leader of hereditary cancer screening and prenatal screening, innovating every day to empower women and their families to benefit from advanced molecular technologies.

We are looking for a talented, creative, and enthusiastic Computational Scientist to join our R&D team in South San Francisco. The ideal candidate is both collegial and highly driven, with a thirst to create new products that have far-reaching clinical impact. We are particularly interested in candidates who combine efficient and rigorous scientific inquiry with exceptional coding skills. The most appealing candidates will likely view further growth in coding proficiency as a virtuous life-long endeavor and derive joy from things like crafting a set of time-saving vim shortcuts, recreationally pushing code to open source projects of interest, and participating in hackathons.
What you'll do:/
/
Envision, design, build, validate, and launch new genomics products and product features that directly improve patients' lives
/
Author optimized and reliable analysis pipelines applied to thousands of samples every day
/
Rigorously analyze a variety of big datasets-including genomic data, clinical-outcomes data, lab-operations data, etc.-to gain actionable insights that get launched into the lab
/
Amplify the productivity of the entire R&D team by creating time-saving software tools and environments
/
Work on collaborative teams with talented experimental scientists, software engineers, automation engineers, and data scientists
/
Communicate your results internally to key stakeholders and externally at conferences and in peer-reviewed literature.
/
/Suggested qualifications
(feel very encouraged to apply even if not all are met):
/
/
M.S. or Ph.D. in Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Computer Science, Biophysics, Physics, Statistics, Molecular Biology, Genetics, or related discipline
/
Exceptional software skills, preferably with fluency in Python
/
Experience with Next Generation Sequencing strongly preferred but not required
/
Conversant in molecular biology and genetics
/
Impeccable integrity; palpable drive; the competence to be self-sufficient but the strong desire to be part of a supportive team
/

PI124569589",3.9,"Myriad Genetics, Inc
3.9","South San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1991,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
86,Big Data Engineer,$76k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Big Data Engineer

Ann Arbor, MI

Are you looking for a stimulating company atmosphere where your efforts will have a significant impact on redefining the supply chain analytics market to fuel our company's success? Were driven by people who have a passion for technology and innovation; we are a fun, results-driven company that thrives on delivering value to customers and making a difference in the world leveraging our solutions. If this sounds like you, come join our herd!

At LLamasoft, our mission is to elevate lives and organizations through the science of smarter decision-making. Powered by AI and advanced analytics, our enterprise decision platform enables business leaders to solve problems in new ways and make smarter decisions faster as their business and operating models change. We are pioneering the use of a true digital twin of the extended supply chain combined with our powerful algorithms and deep supply chain, data engineering, AI and operational expertise. LLamasoft deploys decision solutions through enterprise ready apps, custom apps, and an extensible no-code App Studio.

The Role:

LLamasoft is looking for an experienced Big Data Engineer to join our amazing team and be part of our next-gen supply chain cloud platform. As a Big Data engineer, you will work as part of the Data Architecture team and interact closely with other data engineers & DBAs, Software Development, Architecture, DevOps, and Platform Success to build out our next-generation data architecture for our cloud platform in AWS and Azure.

You will be directly involved in the execution of tactical and strategic data related projects. You will develop data infrastructure and data pipelines to support data ingestion & enrichment, analytics, and visualization uniting data across disparate sources and scales, from small ad hoc datasets to cloud scale datasets. You will have the opportunity to learn, grow and prosper with the team along with maintaining the work-life balance and highest work ethics.

Job Description:

• Design, maintain and normalize multi-tenant enterprise data warehouse

• Ensure our data architecture supports the requirements of the business

• Help improve the volume, velocity and veracity of our data

• Implement cloud based ETL/ELT architecture for ingesting high volume data

• Enabling bi-directional data pipelines using APIs and cloud-based tools

• Implement best practices for data collection, partitioning and performance

• Ability to produce aggregated datasets for efficient cross-business analysis

• Mapping and designing ingestion and transformation from various data source

• Implement data modeling, security and data management best practices

The Qualifications:

• Bachelors in computer science, Software Engineering or related technical field

• 3+ years of experience in Big Data projects using Hadoop/Spark or similar technology

• Understanding of data warehousing and data lake design patterns

• 3+ years of data engineering / development / integration experience

• Build ETL pipelines with Kafka, Spark and RDBMS (MSSQL preferred)

• Experience with open source workflow tools like airflow, apache Nifi, mlflow and Apache Spark • Vendors integration with Databricks, Qubole, AWS Glue or Azure DF

• Fluent in SQL and at least one scripting language (Python, Java or Scala)

• Cloud computing on AWS, Azure, GCP

• Should have experience in leading teams and working with cross functional teams

• Ability to work with geographically distributed teams

• Strong oral and written communication

About LLamasoft:

Over 750 of the worlds most innovative companies rely on LLamasoft to design operational strategies to achieve profitability and growth goals. In addition to helping our customers identify billions of dollars in value, LLamasoft partners with humanitarian organizations, government entities and the World Economic Forum, using our solutions to design and optimize health supply chains around the globe in order to reach our goal of positively impacting 100 million lives by 2022.

LLamasoft is an equal opportunity employer, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.

If you require reasonable accommodation in completing this application, interviewing, or otherwise participating in the employee selection process, please direct your inquiries to accommodation@llamasoft.com.

Powered by JazzHR",4.1,"LLamasoft
4.1","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
87,Intern - Data Scientist - Product Management - Summer,-1,"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Product Management Department will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Interns within the Product Management group will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Product Management leads the product strategy, financial targets, product requirements and go-to-market strategy for a product portfolio.The internship will take place in Tempe, AZ. In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engage with our employee resource groups and be able to develop their professional skills and business acumen through frequent exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Come Intern with us and create the beginnings of a career right for YOU!

Job Description

We are seeking problem solvers unafraid of big challenges, who have a passion for transforming data into valuable, actionable insights and are looking to help build something from the ground up and make an impact.

• Make data visually appealing and simple to both navigate and comprehend for end-users.
• Work cross functionally with Product Finance, Strategic Pricing, Financial Intelligence and IT team to build/implement analytic dashboards, models and intelligent automation.
• To discover, collect, cleanse, and enrich the data needed for analysis and modeling.
• Responsible for building advanced analytics models while utilizing structured and unstructured information.
• Identify key business levers, establish cause & effect, and communicate key findings to facilitate data driven decision-making.

Qualifications
Minimum Cumulative GPA: 3.0 or higher (preferred)
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university, in a rising junior, rising senior, or masters level status at time of internship.
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
Education/Degree: In pursuit of a bachelor’s level degree in business, accounting or finance in a senior level status at the start of the internship. Master’s Degree preferred.
Strong sense of urgency and ability to meet deadlines
Ability to demonstrate ownership and accountability
Ability to collaborate and have agility while making effective decisions
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Flexible and adapts well to change
Professional appearance and attitude
Experience & Skills : PowerBI, Clickhouse, Tableau, Jupyter, Python, Perl, R, M, Javascript/JSON, SQL
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
US work authorization is required

Requisition #: 232796

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",-1,Lumen,"Tempe, AZ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Private Practice / Firm,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
88,Data Architect,$93k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Data Architect

Location: Orlando, Florida

Manager: Head of Data Science

About LSQ

LSQ Funding is a technology-driven provider of accounts receivable financing to companies who need working capital but may not be able to obtain sufficient financing from their bank. Our focus is to help businesses to release the liquidity tied up in their accounts receivable. With financing from LSQ, a business can purchase more inventory, fill more orders, and take advantage of new growth opportunities. Our creative and timely approach to providing working capital, along with our comprehensive accounts receivable management services, allows our clients to driving business success.

Job Overview

LSQ Funding is looking for a skilled and progressive Data Architect to join our growing team of analytics experts. The hire will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross-functional teams. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data wrangler who enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Architect will support database architects and engineers, data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will that ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects.

Responsibilities for Data Architect
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture,
Assemble large, complex data sets that meet functional / non-functional business requirements.
Identify, design, and assist in the implementation of data-focused internal process improvements: automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Build the infrastructure required for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL and AWS big data technologies.
Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Engineering and Data teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs.
Create data tools for analytics and data scientist team members that assist them in building and optimizing LSQ products into an innovative industry leader.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in our data systems.
Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
Qualifications for Data Engineer
1-3+ years of experience in a Data Engineer role, who has attained a Graduate degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Informatics, Information Systems or another quantitative field.
Advanced working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
Experience building and optimizing big data data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience performing root cause analysis on internal and external data and processes to answer specific business questions and identify opportunities for improvement.
Strong analytic skills related to working with structured as well as unstructured datasets.
A successful history of manipulating, processing and extracting value from large disconnected datasets.
Below experience is preferred but not required:
Experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Data Bricks
Experience with relational SQL and NoSQL databases, including Postgres and Cassandra.
Experience with data pipeline and workflow management tools: Azkaban, Luigi, Airflow, etc.
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift
Experience with stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming, etc.
Experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python, Java, C++, Scala, etc.",4.5,"LSQ
4.5","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
89,"Senior Business Intelligence Analyst, Service",$71k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Bloom faces an unprecedented opportunity to change the world and the way companies utilize energy. We have recently launched a “game changing” solution called “Always on” that will help companies power their primary business operations without disruption with cleaner, more reliable electricity generated on-site with no combustion. We are looking for a Technical Business Analyst, Service Optimization & Analytics to join our team in one of today’s most exciting technologies.

The Technical Business Analyst will support an ongoing effort to optimize our Service strategy through improved analytics and visualization capabilities. This includes the development of optimization algorithms based on contractual economic drivers, cost/benefit analysis of key variables, and the development of a dynamic P&L model for fleet operations. The role will include dashboard development for Executive Leadership which clearly represents the revenue and cost sensitivities associated with the optimization strategies.

Role and Responsibilities:
Candidates must have a background in the following:
• Software Development/ Data Analytics:
o Assist in analyzing diverse sets of imperfect data and finding common patterns, theme and trends by using Big Data tools
• Optimization/ Operations Research:
o Experience with optimization problem setup and execution
o Experience in sensitivity analysis for complex business models
o Experience in building clear and concise data visualization dashboards (Tableau)

Education:
• Electrical Engineering, or Computer Science
• MBA or Masters in Business Analytics Preferred

Skills and Experience:
• 4+ years’ work experience
• Strong background in optimization, estimation & data analysis techniques
• Proficient with Python
• Experience with functional or object-oriented scalable software design and development
• Familiarity with NoSQL databases like MongoDB, Hadoop and REST APIs
• Working with open source databases and tools
• Experience with machine learning/AI development for predictive models preferred
• Experience with understanding Statistical models
• Experience in financial modeling
• Strong communication and presentation skills
• Strong analytical and problem solving skills

About Bloom Energy:
Bloom Energy’s mission is to make clean, reliable, and affordable energy for everyone in the world. The Company’s product, the Bloom Energy Server, delivers highly reliable and resilient, ‘Always-On’ electric power that is clean and sustainable. Bloom’s customers include twenty-five of the Fortune 100 companies and leaders in cloud services and data centers, healthcare, retail, financial services, utilities and many other industries. For more information, visit www.bloomenergy.com

Bloom Energy is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit. We are committed to compliance with all applicable laws providing equal employment opportunities. All qualified applicants, will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, protected veteran status, or on the basis of disability. Bloom Energy makes reasonable accommodations, consistent with applicable laws, for the known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified applicant or employee with a disability, who can perform the essential job functions, unless undue hardship would result

IND1",3.1,"Bloom Energy
3.1","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
90,Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations,$139k-$219k (Glassdoor Est.),"Guild is hiring a Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations. As the Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations you will partner with our leaders across the business and lead a team of data scientists to improve our students' Guild experience.

As Senior Manager of Data Science - Operations, you will:
Partner with stakeholders across the organization to identify opportunities to use data science solutions to drive improved outcomes.
Manage large-scale projects and prioritize the team's workload to ensure effective delivery and implementation of solutions which drive our strategies forward.
Work closely with Operations leadership to translate business needs and problems into analyses. This could include uncovering a problem, identifying data sources to quantify the problem, synthesizing findings and solutions, analyzing the business case and tradeoffs, and managing the implementation of recommendations.
Develop frameworks, approaches, solutions and recommendations that effectively and efficiently address the most impactful opportunities and challenges for Guild's Operations teams.
Lead a world-class team of analysts who are responsive to our business partners' needs, and are capable of working with data, performing complex analyses, and developing recommendations and strategies which drive our business forward.
Use data to tell a story, effectively explaining analytical findings and technical solutions to business partners.
Act as a thought partner to data scientists, helping to formulate analytical plans, prioritize initiatives, and operationalize the results of learnings from complex analyses, including A/B testing, NLP, segmentation, and other predictive models.
In this role you will report to Beth Hegland and collaborate with other Guild leaders including: Kevin Chan-A-Shing, Mae Podesta, Josh Hadden-Leggett, and Terrence Cummings.

You are a strong fit for this role if you have:
8+ years of experience in an analytics/data science environment
5+ years managing high-performing technical and analytical teams
Strong technical and analytical skills, with high attention to detail and accuracy.
Strong experience with SQL, as well as Excel/Google Sheets, BI Tools (Looker a plus)
Ability to work cross-functionally to advocate for data science solutions, develop roadmaps, and ensure effective prioritization of analytical resources.
Extreme comfort presenting to and interacting with senior leaders, with the ability to win over strong personalities and reconcile competing points of view through data-driven storytelling
Preferred Competencies:
Familiarity with Operations teams in a sales or CRM environment
Proven business experience with a scripting language like Python or R
About Guild

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.5,"Guild Education
3.5","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
91,Data Scientist 3 (844),$128k-$201k (Glassdoor Est.),"Amyris has developed a high-throughput genetic engineering platform for designing and building custom microbes to serve as living factories. Using an industrial scale fermentation process, our microbes convert cheap sugars into a wide variety of high-value target molecules. Our end products directly impact millions of lives. We are pragmatic idealists seeking a profitable way to make the world a better place. We are convinced synthetic biology is here to stay and will have a major positive impact on our planet and everyday life.
Within Amyris R&D, we are searching for a highly energetic, curious, and self-motivated data scientist with a strong background in statistics, computing and biology to join our Data Science and Computing team. Research at Amyris is a highly multidisciplinary effort that needs brilliant contributions from life sciences and engineering disciplines in order to take projects from concept to market. From hacking directly on DNA in the lab to full scale factory production, every aspect of our work is facilitated and accelerated by quantitative science and software & hardware automation. The Data Science and Computing team works hand-in-hand with bench scientists and builds tools that enable genome engineering, protein engineering, metabolic modeling, omics experiment analysis, statistical design of experiments and machine learning models in pursuit of making better microbial strains or fermentation processes. In short, we help accelerate the design-build-test-analyze cycle in synthetic biology.
Key Responsibilities:
Iteratively develop computational algorithms, analyses, visualization tools and machine learning models to meet evolving scientific needs and to aid rapid data-driven decision making while working with a variety of data types including: genotype (NGS), phenotype (metabolomics, proteomics, GC/MS, spectroscopy, fermentation), material flow
Build version-controlled, computational workflows to analyze and model rich, high-throughput phenotype data
Interact closely with a cross-disciplinary teams of biology, analytical chemistry, and fermentation scientists to build data science products

Required Qualifications:
Degree in quantitative discipline such as computer science, mathematics, computational biology, electrical engineering, bioengineering or equivalent.
Ph.D. plus 1-3 years experience, or M.S. plus 3-6 years experience.
Experience in analyzing & visualizing large scientific datasets representing biological & chemical phenotypes
Intermediate (undergraduate level) understanding of biology topics including: genetics, cell physiology, biochemistry, evolution
Experience with programming best practices (unit testing, CI/CD, etc) and version control while contributing to or maintaining large codebases
Expertise with scripting programming languages (Python is preferred)
Hands-on experience with machine learning frameworks and concepts
Outstanding communication and interpersonal skills
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced and intellectually rigorous environment
Creativity, independent thinking, and passion
Preferred Qualifications:
Background in mass spectrometry informatics, high throughput sequencing, spectrophotometry, or industrial fermentation
Experience in a microbiology or synthetic biology setting
#LI-DJ1

Amyris, a leader in industrial synthetic biology, uses its innovative bioscience solutions to achieve renewable products by converting plant sugars into hydrocarbon molecules. Amyris’ molecules are used in wide range of specialty & performance chemicals, flavors & fragrances and in applications ranging from cosmetics to biofuels. Learn more at www.amyris.com.

Under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”), Amyris is required to inform California residents who are our job applicants (“Applicants”) about the personal information we collect about you when you apply to a job on this site.

As an Applicant, you have the right to know and understand the categories of personal information we collect about you, and the purposes for which the categories of personal information shall be used, pursuant to the CCPA.

By clicking the “APPLY FOR THIS JOB” button below and submitting your job application, you agree you have reviewed the complete Privacy Notice for Employees, Independent Contractors and Job Applicants.

If you have any questions regarding this information, please contact Amyris at privacy@amyris.com

As a VEVRAA Federal Contractor, Amyris is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Amyris complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment.

If you are a recruiter or placement agency, please do not submit resumes to any person or email address at Amyris, Inc. prior to having a signed agreement. Amyris is not liable for and will not pay placement fees for candidates submitted by any agency other than its approved recruitment partners. Furthermore, any resumes sent to us without an agreement in place will be considered your company’s gift to Amyris and may be forwarded to our recruiters for their attention.",3.8,"Amyris
3.8","Emeryville, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
92,Scientist/Research Associate-Metabolic Engineering,-1,"*Our company:
*Conagen Inc. is a leader in cutting-edge bio-manufacturing. We engineer organisms to produce high-value molecules that are essential to our well-being. Our focus is on food, nutrition, pharmaceuticals, and renewable materials. We employ the latest synthetic biology tools to design metabolic pathways and produce safe and high-quality products. Science and innovation are the driving forces of our mission. We believe in a green future.
Location: Bedford, MA
Job Type: Full-time
Compensation: Commensurate with skills and experience
Job Description Overview:
We are currently seeking a scientist/research associate to support projects related to the identification and functional characterization of metabolic enzymes for metabolic pathway engineering projects. The candidate is expected to have a strong background in molecular biology, biochemistry, microbiology, metabolic engineering, and other related disciplines. Strong technical, organizational, and communication skills, as well as the ability to develop creative solutions to challenging problems, are essential.
Responsibility:
Routinely perform molecular biology techniques such as primer design, PCR, DNA and RNA extraction, DNA mutagenesis, DNA cloning, plasmid mini-prep, DNA and protein sequence analysis, cell transformation, cell culture, and other more advanced molecular biology techniques in support of metabolic engineering research projects.
Utilize sequence analysis software such as Geneious Primer and other basic bioinformatics tools.
Perform experiments for enzymatic activity testing including express proteins in E. coli and yeast, recombinant proteins purification; analyze expressed proteins by SDS-PAGE and/or Western Blot and in vitro/in vivo enzymatic assays.
Operate laboratory and experimental equipment such as spectrophotometers, centrifuges, HPLC, FPLC, LC/MS, and GC/MS.
Strain engineering to optimize the production of desired compounds and protein.
Optimize the cultivation condition and assays for strains screening
Work collaboratively with other team members to accomplish project goals and milestones.
Routinely track and document results in laboratory notebooks and databases.
Analyze, summarize, and present experimental results to team leader and other team members.
Qualification:
A Master's degree or a Ph.D. degree in metabolic engineering, chemical engineering, molecular biology, microbiology, biochemistry, or other related fields.
Strong background in metabolic engineering, molecular biology, genetics, protein engineering, and synthetic biology with experience in recombinant DNA technologies, protein analysis, enzymatic assays, and cell transformation.
Experience in the engineering of metabolic pathways in microbial hosts is highly preferred.
Familiarity with analytical techniques for metabolite detection such as spectrophotometers, HPLC, LC/MS, and GC/MS.
Familiarity with diverse software packages for data processing and statistical analysis, primer design and sequence blasting and alignment.
Must be highly motivated and able to work independently while also possessing exceptional communication and teamwork skills.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer – and celebrate our employees’ differences, regardless of race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or veteran status.
*How to apply:
Cover letters and resumes will be accepted ONLY via email or Indeed.com.
Please do not contact the Company by phone until notified.
This position is not eligible for any type of visa sponsorship.
Job Type: Full-time
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Flexible schedule
Relocation assistance",3.5,"Conagen
3.5","New Bedford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
93,BUSINESS ANALYTICS CONSULTANT - FINANCE,$51k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Job Description
Type of Opportunity: Full Time
FTE: 1.000000
Exempt: Yes
Work Schedule: Days

Summary:
Support portfolio management of reporting/analytics solutions across the business units in the analytics organization. Identify business issues/problems, form hypotheses, plan and conduct interviews, whiteboard sessions & perform reporting/analysis to synthesize conclusions, transform them into recommendations and develop a solution. Lead and manage small cross functional team to implement, test and deploy the approved reporting/analytics solution in response to the business (clinical/operational/financial) needs. Identify reporting/analytics improvement opportunities and provide proactive, consultative strategic solutions. Responsible for mentoring junior analysts as well as coordinating various reporting/analytics initiatives with end business users. Support reporting/analytics projects prioritization and planning as well as cconduct due diligence concerning business implications of planned solutions.

Responsibilities:

Responsibilities:
Consultation and Communication:
Ability to collaborate and partner with management, project managers, and IT to develop, implement and manage reporting/analytics portfolio with the vision & goals of specific Hub/Spoke core teams
Effective communication skills across the organization and at different levels, strategic thinking and actions to influence key stakeholders and business decisions
Support day-to-day consultation to business users and participate and contribute cross-functional project teams
Work with business stakeholders to identify business needs and support creation of the use cases and user stories satisfying those needs
Project Management and Execution:
Coordinate with other departments across the AO such as IM governance & EDW and support conceptualization and development of reporting/analytical methodologies, solutions and initiatives
Aid in the development of project plans and strategies as well as execute assigned project plans to deliver solutions in a timely manner
Support collaboration on roadmaps, dependencies, and execution plans across analytical units and with applicable teams in the organization
Manage the intake requests across the business units; track and monitor the work to ensure critical milestones are met, identify and report/escalate risks to management appropriately; manage stakeholder relations
Obtain data, direct/execute reporting/analysis, perform interpretations and conclusions, and prepare recommendations.
Assist in determining business needs by effectively conducting fact-finding interviews and leveraging various tools and analytical methods and then summarize findings in a coherent manner to develop and propose appropriate solution
Conduct research studies that include collecting data from various sources, analyzing, trending and presenting the findings and recommendations to management
Support translation of business requirements and unstructured business issues into data analytic problems
Perform overall program evaluations (i.e., planning-implementation-completion/analysis-reporting) and other assessments such as change management assessments, workflow optimization assessments, etc.
Training and Guidance:
Manage and support teams to structure data and analysis to analyze issues and proactively identify improvement opportunities
Responsible for the work flow management of analysts and ensuring reliability, integrity, and timeliness of end products
Support coordination of training for analysts in core and expanded business department
Thought Leadership:
Support in development of presentations/publications/point-of-views with senior leadership within the AO
Contribute towards and assist senior leadership in developing a year-end value story to demonstrate value of the team and their contribution to progress towards the AOs and PHSs goals
Qualifications:

Preferred Qualifications:

Health Plan/Finance Experience
Strong Communicator
SAS/SQL Coding Experience

Other information:
SKILLS: Bachelors degree in a quantitative, business, or healthcare related subject. A Masters degree is highly preferred. Four or more years of combined experience in business intelligence, reporting and analytics preferably in a healthcare setting. Demonstrated project management skills as well as the ability to efficiently work and manage teams and resources. Experience working on complex analytical projects with diverse teams and developing data driven and outcome based initiatives to improve business decision making and operational efficiencies. Knowledge of health plan and delivery system operations, health care informatics, and healthcare benefits and terminology (e.g., care management). Understanding of operations in the Health Care industry and a strong acumen of business processes, including operations, delivery models and revenue models. Understanding of program evaluation life cycle, predictive modeling, data mining, and clinical best practices preferred. Content knowledge related to program outcomes evaluation, BI tools (e.g., BO), data visualizations tools (e.g., Tableau), statistical software such as SAS and Modeling techniques, as well as general health service research and outcomes reporting/analytics. Working knowledge of healthcare industry and healthcare information standards such as HL7, LOINC, FHIR, ICD 9/10 and CPT codes, industry standard groupers (e.g., ETGs, DRGs, DCGs, etc.) as well as of health care delivery system processes. Excellent written and oral communications is a MUST.

Competencies and skills:
Essential:
SKILL-Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively in person and via telephone with members, employer groups, brokers, physicians, and physician office staff using strong dialogue and customer service competencies.
SKILL-Written communication
Nonessential:
Analytics skills
SKILL-Decision Making
SKILL-Project management methods and tools in support of managing Scope, Time, Cost, Quality, Communication, Risk, and Procurement Management;
Benefits:

Benefits
Benefits are effective day-one (for .45 FTE and above) and include:

Competitive salaries
Full medical, dental and vision insurance
Flexible spending accounts (FSAs)
Free wellness programs
Paid time off (PTO)
Retirement plans, including matching employer contributions
Continuing education and career development opportunities
Life insurance and short/long term disability programs

About Us
Presbyterian Healthcare Services is a locally owned, not-for-profit healthcare system of nine hospitals, a statewide health plan and a growing multi-specialty medical group. Founded in New Mexico in 1908, it is the state's largest private employer with approximately 11,000 employees.

Presbyterian's story is really the story of the remarkable people who have chosen to work here. Starting with Reverend Cooper who began our journey in 1908, the hard work of thousands of physicians, employees, board members, and other volunteers brought Presbyterian from a tiny tuberculosis sanatorium to a statewide healthcare system, serving more than 700,000 New Mexicans.

We are part of New Mexico's history - and committed to its future. That is why we will continue to work just as hard and care just as deeply to serve New Mexico for years to come.

About New Mexico
New Mexico's unique blend of Spanish, Mexican and Native American influences contribute to a culturally rich lifestyle. Add in Albuquerque's International Balloon Fiesta, Los Alamos' nuclear scientists, Roswell's visitors from outer space, and Santa Fe's artists, and you get an eclectic mix of people, places and experiences that make this state great.

Cities in New Mexico are continually ranked among the nation's best places to work and live by Forbes magazine, Kiplinger's Personal Finance, and other corporate and government relocation managers like Worldwide ERC.

New Mexico offers endless recreational opportunities to explore, and enjoy an active lifestyle. Venture off the beaten path, challenge your body in the elements, or open yourself up to the expansive sky. From hiking, golfing and biking to skiing, snowboarding and boating, it's all available among our beautiful wonders of the west.

AA/EOE/VET/DISABLED. PHS is a drug-free and tobacco-free employer with smoke free campuses.

KM123",3.6,"Rev Hugh Cooper Admin Center
3.6","Albuquerque, NM",-1,10000+ Employees,1908,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
94,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Job Summary*
We are looking for a Machine Learning (ML) Engineer to help us create artificial intelligence products for Research and Development in the Medical Field. ML Engineer responsibilities include creating machine learning models and retraining systems. Transform Data Science prototypes to production-grade solutions. Responsible for implementing various algorithms for automated feature extraction, dataset augmentation, optimizing runtimes of neural network algorithms, and building higher level abstractions for various common AI/ML techniques.
Responsibilities: *
Study and transform data science prototypes
· Design, code and deploy machine learning systems capable of processing large volumes of data
Design and develop machine learning systems to create, train and deploy ML models
Develop machine learning applications according to requirements
Establish reusable data processing pipelines to enable rapid re-training and iteration through different ML methodologies
Select appropriate datasets and data representation methods
Design experiments and analysis methodologies that are statistically rigorous
Run machine learning tests and experiments
Perform statistical analysis and fine-tuning using test results
· Tailor and deploy software tools, processes and metrics

· Serve as a subject matter expert
Requirements: *
· Proven experience as a ML Engineer or similar role

· Experience with supervised, unsupervised, reinforcement learning algorithms

· Understanding of data structures, data modeling and software architecture

· Knowledge of ML frameworks such as Keras/Tensorflow/Theano/PyTorch and libraries (like scikit-learn)
Keep abreast of developments in the field
· Ability but to write robust code in Python, Java or equivalent modern programming language

· Proficiency in SQL, big data technologies and working with large data sets

· Works independently, able to manage multiple projects simultaneously

· Deep curiosity and a demonstrated ability to craft original solutions

· Highly communicative with collaborators and managers

· Proactive in seeking opportunities for innovation

· Ability to deal with ambiguity and deliver results in a fast-paced environment

· Dedicated and Self-Motivated

· Team collaboration and strong written and verbal communication skills

· Ownership and urgency across all responsible projects

· Proficient in Calculus, Statistics, and Linear Algebra

· Ability to work with cross-functional team to turn ideas into working solutions
Education & Experience: *
Requires Master’s Degree in Computer Science or Equivalent
2-5 years verifiable employment using requirements above. May substitute internships and projects for years of experience.
3-5 years Software Development Experience is preferred
1-2 years Networking Experience is preferred
Benefits*
· Competitive Pay

· Health, Dental & Retirement

· Continuing Education available
Salary*
· DOE

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
relevant: 1 year (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 1 year (Preferred)",-1,Ophthalmology Specialists of Texas,"Abilene, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
95,Data Analyst,$37k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Under general direction from the Data Analytics Supervisor, the Data Analyst I is responsible for developing, communicating, publishing, understanding, reconciling and maintaining reports, data cubes, and data tables for various business units, as well as managing the volume forecasting process from inputs to outputs. The role is also responsible for producing ad hoc analysis on a wide variety of insurance topics as necessary.
Responsibilities:
Assists with the development and maintenance of data sets to be used by other members of the department, including marketing, actuarial, modeling and product teams.
Modifies and maintains a model that forecasts volume and related components. This model requires complex programming as well as interfacing with the business
Updates volume forecast model and communicates results to the business on a timely basis. Analyzes process workflows and proposes improvements.
Creates and updates documentation
Publishes results within deadlines.
Reviews existing weekly, monthly, quarterly and annual reporting for accuracy, calls attention to problems
Helps to further align our metrics and data so these can be consumed across the enterprise
Answers data-related inquires and provides data to internal customers as requested.
Other job-related responsibilities as required.
Requirements and Skills:
Demonstrated expertise performing data analysis.
Proficiency manipulating data in Excel.
Understanding of insurance products and reserving.
Ability to research company raw data and use that data to build analytical data stores.
Ability to use relational database products to write data queries in SQL, build, update and maintain data cubes in SQL.
Demonstrated ability to communicate with internal customers about technical concepts and expected deliverables
Ability to reconcile data in a transparent way
Experience in assembling code into SSIS packages
Experience designing and modifying dashboards using Tableau
Education/Experience/Degree Requirements:
Demonstrated problem solving experience gained through related coursework and work experience.
1 or more years of experience with relational database tools and concepts.
BA/BS degree in quantitative field of study.
Property and Casualty Insurance experience preferred.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
96,Senior Data Scientist,$72k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you a talented and passionate engineer? Do you love solving problems and making ideas come to life? Are you a lifelong learner who thrives in dynamic environments and enjoys the challenge of learning new technologies and techniques? Are you a team player and enjoy collaboration, but you are also self-directed and enjoy the autonomy to be able to manage your own schedule and workload? Do you appreciate the importance of good communication and know that teamwork takes practice, effort and a good attitude? If so, we want to speak with you.

The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for collaborating with the team to design and implement systems that focus on forecasting, allocating, delivering, and reporting of advertising on the internet, TV, and connected devices. The successful candidate will utilize advanced mathematical, optimization, machine-learning, software engineering, and programming skills to solve challenging problems.

Responsibilities
Develop innovative forecasts, models, algorithms, and solutions and build prototypes and production implementations
Dig deep into high volumes of data, engineer features for improved forecast performance
Work cross-functionally to gather feedback and requirements from end users
Be a key contributor to product innovation and company strategy
Communicate technical information clearly to both technical and non-technical people
Required Qualifications
Degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Industrial Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or related field; MS/PhD preferred
3+ years of relevant experience
Strong analytical, statistical, and math abilities; Exceptional problem-solving skills
Excellent communication skills
Extreme attention to detail
Ability to work as part of a team in a fast-paced environment
#LI-KR1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,"Amobee
3.8","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
97,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Houston TX

Zdaly data intelligence platform unifies data science, machine learning and external factors to deliver breakthrough business insights.

Supported by the largest repository of world data trends and statistics – 3.3+ billion to be exact – our platform ingests, cleanses, classifies and correlates internal enterprise data with external factors to unlock hidden, predictive and actionable insights at scale.

Multiple Fortune 500 companies use Zdaly to analyze deep market intelligence, optimize operations and capitalize on new opportunities. Our team is comprised of PhD Data Scientists and is backed by Institutional Investors.

Due to the rapid growth of our business we are currently hiring for the position of Data Scientist and Application Developer. In this position you will work closely to deliver cutting Data Science applications. The successful candidate must have excellent skills in both data science and programming, as the position involves the direct, practical application of statistical and machine learning models but also requires the manipulation of very large data sets in a variety of back- and front-end technologies.

Requirements:
Very strong background in time series Data Science and experience with handling very complex real world Predictive Intelligence challenges.
Strong SQL skills including stored procedures, functions, views, transactions. Configuration of databases and indices for optimal performance.
Very strong programming skills in Python.
Very strong data science skills: applied statistics, regression / correlation; non-parametric and ML methods such as clustering, SVM, neural nets and related methodologies; digital filters; etc
Excellent English communication skills (spoken and written) as the position will involve interfacing with clients, investors and
Prefer PhD in a technical discipline, such as computer science, math or physics, or finance/econometrics, at a top school
Highly preferred: 2+ years of practical business experience
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $85,000.00 - $150,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Data Science: 3 years (Required)
Python Programming: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Location:
Houston, TX 77056 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Yes",3.9,"Zdaly
3.9","Houston, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
98,Data Modeler II,$45k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"ABOUT MEDIACOM DATA WAREHOUSE:

The Mediacom Data Warehouse (DW) is looking for an experienced individual interested in joining a growing team of professionals as it undertakes a complete refresh of its current DW environment. This is a unique opportunity to join a greenfield migration project at the ground level. The environment refresh includes Active Batch Automation and Scheduling, Informatica Data Integration tool, and Oracle Exadata running a 12c database. Mediacom’s Data Analytics tools of choice include Oracle OBIEE and Tableau. Mediacom’s data modeling environment is maintained through the erwin Data Modeler tool. The right person for this position will be able to work and thrive in a truly collaborative environment, be an eager learner, self-motivated and not afraid to work in partnership for all areas of the DW as needed.

GENERAL RESPONSIBILITIES

The Data Warehouse Senior Data Modeler will work with ETL developers, DBAs, business user personnel and project managers to gather data requirements and create logical data models for applications, including those with specialized or complex requirements. Develop, manage, and update data models, including physical and logical:

Develop and maintain logical and physical data models using best practices and company standards to ensure high data quality, reduced data redundancy, and good query performance.
Reverse and forward engineer data models in an Oracle Exadata environment.
Optimize and update logical and physical data models to support new and existing projects and ensure business users are working in a clean safe data environment.
Assist in the creation of best practices for standard naming conventions and coding practices to ensure consistency of data models.
Document database processes that currently extract the data from the existing system for reporting purposes.
Define and document the technical architecture of the data warehouse, including the physical components and their functionality, data models and data dictionaries.
Coordinate activities with the rest of the data warehouse team including developers and testers; Assist in promoting database objects from lower to higher environments.
Lead design reviews of data models and other relevant metadata to ensure consistency, quality, accuracy and integrity.
Recommend opportunities for reuse of data models in new projects.
Consult with Database Administrators concerning the creation of physical data schema from the logical model by making recommendations, designing referential integrity, and ensuring business requirements are satisfied.
Consult with ETL developers, report developers, end users concerning how to use the database as designed and how to navigate efficiently within the database.
Guide System Analysts, Engineers, Programmers and others on project limitations and capabilities, performance requirements and interfaces, and system integration challenges and solutions.
Mentor a junior data modeler

Required Skills:

Data modeling in Oracle Exadata (5 years)
Analyzing and generating technical requirements and design (8 years)
Creating and maintaining data models in a data warehouse environment (8 years)
Database tuning techniques (8 years)
Analyzing source databases, source data, source database referential integrity and profiling source data (8 years)
Hands-on data warehouse project experience (5 years)
erwin data modeling software (6 years)
Oracle PL/SQL developer experience (6 years)
Informatica PowerCenter experience a plus
Experience in team management, communication, and presentation (8 years)

Mediacom endeavors to make mediacomcable.com/careers accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our careers website, please contact careersassistance@mediacomcc.com or dial 845-443-2408. Any inquiries regarding employment application status, resume submittal, open positions and any other general inquiries will not receive a response.",3.4,"Mediacom Communications Corporation
3.4","Blooming Grove, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Company - Private,"Cable, Internet & Telephone Providers",Telecommunications,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
99,Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering,$86k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"20-Aug-2020

Job ID
300507BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""20. That’s how many years of data we have in our informatics systems! Enriched every day by more than 1000 Translational Medicine scientists. If you like data, there is no better place to be!

Who are we?

Our team of 30 Data Scientists are leveraging this data to accelerate drug development. NIBR Translational Medicine is in charge of creating data needed for submission of all Novartis drugs: Toxicology, DMPK, Phase I and II Clinical Trials, and most clinical Omics. We have one of the richest data pool in the Pharma world.
As a Translational Data Scientist, using your knowledge of research, you will analyze the Translational Medicine data landscape, and design ways to integrate data to speed up its analysis and the project delivery. Creating new capacities for Translational Medicine teams by easing access to data, relevant algorithms, and visualizations as part of the Novartis Digital Strategy, you will make drug development faster.

Your main responsibilities will be to:
• Organize access to data via APIs, applications and textual and graphical representations of the data in close collaboration with data scientists. Build application Proof of Concepts with selected scientists, organize scale up with relevant partners and release to NIBR community.
• Push community adoption of techniques and tools crafted by supporting power users and coordinating training sessions.
• Be a liaison between partners involved: scientific teams having data intensive needs, teams crafting enterprise solutions, internal and external partners producing similar solutions.
• Maintain expertise in methodologies for data handling, visualization and User Experience
• Mentor and encourage others to tackle problems
Posting Title
Translational Data Scientist/Data Engineering",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
100,Card Data Scientist,$88k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"McLean 2 (19052), United States of America, McLean, Virginia

Card Data Scientist
Job Description
Data is at the center of everything we do. As a startup, we disrupted the credit card industry by individually personalizing every credit card offer using statistical modeling and the relational database, cutting edge technology in 1988! Fast-forward a few years, and this little innovation and our passion for data has skyrocketed us to a Fortune 200 company and a leader in the world of data-driven decision-making.

As a Data Scientist at Capital One, youll be part of a team thats leading the next wave of disruption at a whole new scale, using the latest in computing and machine learning technologies and operating across billions of customer records to unlock the big opportunities that help everyday people save money, time and agony in their financial lives.

In this role, you will:
Partner with a cross-functional team of data scientists, software engineers, and product managers to deliver a product customers love
Leverage a broad stack of technologies Python, Conda, AWS, H2O, Spark, and more to reveal the insights hidden within huge volumes of numeric and textual data
Build machine learning models through all phases of development, from design through training, evaluation, validation, and implementation
Flex your interpersonal skills to translate the complexity of your work into tangible business goals

The Ideal Candidate is:
A leader. You challenge conventional thinking and work with stakeholders to identify and improve the status quo. Your passionate about talent development for your own team and beyond.
Statistically-minded. Youve built models, validated them, and backtested them. You know how to interpret a confusion matrix or a ROC curve. You have experience with clustering, classification, sentiment analysis, time series, and deep learning.
A data guru. Big data doesnt phase you. You have the skills to retrieve, combine, and analyze data from a variety of sources and structures. You know understanding the data is often the key to great data science.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree plus 5 years of experience in data analytics, or Masters Degree plus 3 years in data analytics, or PhD
At least 1 year of experience in open source programming languages for large scale data analysis
At least 1 year of experience with machine learning
At least 1 year of experience with relational databases
Preferred Qualifications:
Masters Degree in STEM field (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Mathematics) plus 3 years of experience in data analytics, or PhD in STEM field (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Mathematics)
At least 1 year of experience working with AWS
At least 3 years experience in Python, Scala, or R
At least 3 years experience with machine learning
At least 3 years experience with SQL
Capital One will consider sponsoring a new qualified applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One
4.0","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
101,Member Experience Data Analyst,$48k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Start a Rewarding Career with Alliant


What will your day look like?

You will be responsible for breaking down complex data sets into structured analysis and offering “Insights as a Service” to key stakeholders across the organization. This individual will create recurring and ad-hoc reports/dashboards and deliver findings that result in actionable recommendations that positively impact and influence operational efficiencies and the member experience. You will have a passion for problem solving, an intellectual curiosity to dig deep into root causes, along with the ability to think conceptually, analytically and creatively.

Responsibilities


Do you see yourself doing this?
Extract data from multiple complex data sets including internal and external sources.
Build, update and maintain databases.
Verify information integrity, and make recommendations to remediate potential gaps/errors in data.
Understand key stakeholder objectives and the metrics that impact their area of the business.
Prepare and distribute recurring and ad-hoc reports/dashboards comprised of key metrics from across the organization.
Derive actionable insights through critical analysis and data visualizations.
Create innovative visuals using Tableau (or other supported visualization tools) to enable more effective consumption of data.
Apply business analysis skills to complicated business wants/needs and make recommendations for optimal solutions.
Adhere to the enterprise responsibilities and standards of a Business Intelligence lead and support the Enterprise BI Community.
All other duties as assigned by Sr. Mgr. Member Experience Design & Insights.
Qualifications


What makes you a great fit?

You’ll be a great fit if in addition to the completion of a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Information Systems, Data Analytics/Data Science, or a related major, required, and you have:
4+ years of experience in data analysis, interpretation, report preparation and presentation of results, required.
Experience presenting findings to all levels of leadership.
Strong proficiency in Microsoft Excel/PowerPoint/Access, Tableau, SQL and extracting data from various sources.
Experience with relational databases and data warehouses.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Strong proficiency in time management and organizational skills.
High level of detail orientation and analysis.
Experience in customer/member experience analytics.
When you’re happy, we’re happy!

As a thank you for joining our team, you’ll benefit from:

Competitive medical, dental, and free vision benefits
Competitive compensation plan
Contributions towards gym memberships
Generous PTO and banking holidays off
Still not convinced?

We’re on the list of 100 Best Medium Companies to work for, check it out here. For more details you can also visit our Glassdoor and LinkedIn profiles.",3.6,"Alliant Credit Union
3.6","Rolling Meadows, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1935,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
102,"Scientist III, Pharma R & D",$27k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Scientist III develops and executes formulation strategies related to product development, such as project planning, experimental design and data evaluations. The Scientist III applies technical expertise and has knowledge of various formulation development approaches. Demonstrates leadership and experience in the area of pre-formulation, formulation and process development of immediate and modified solid dosage, Topicals (cream,gel), Oral liquid and /or Transdermal. The position reports to a Manager/ Principal Scientist as described in the current organization chart of the department.

Essential Functions:
Develops formulation strategy and designs experimental plan, formulation and process development work for oral controlled release and immediate release dosage forms, Topicals, (cream, gel), Oral Liquid, and Transdermal products.
Responsible for selection of raw materials, packaging components and process requirements based on sound scientific principles.
Reviews analytical and clinical data and makes scientific conclusions.
Writes and reviews protocols and batch records for process development and evaluation work, scale up and pivotal batch manufacturing.
Creates and reviews technical documents, reports and presentations for cross functional teams. Writes Modules of ANDA's for submission.
Maintain Design history files for combination products. Develop design and development plan.
Keeps updated on cGMP and current technologies.
Additional Responsibilities:
Provides scientific and technical direction to junior staff members (scientists I, II, technicians & operators) to ensure project deadlines and performance standards are met.
Identifies, analyzes and suggests corrective actions to optimize R&D processes, technologies and regulatory compliance issues.
Equipment: Becomix, Tube filler, Transdermal and liquid manufacturing equipment.
Reviews Junior Scientist work.

Qualifications

Education:
A Master Degree (MS/MA) in Pharmaceutical, Chemistry or related technical field is preferred
A Bachelors Degree (BA/BS) in Pharmaceutical, Chemistry or related technical field is required.
Experience:
3 years or more experience with a Master Degree in development of Pharmaceutical Dosage Forms is required.
5 years or more experience with a Bachelors of Science in development of Pharmaceutical Dosage Forms is required.
Skills:
Must have knowledge of Pharmaceutical product development and manufacturing process. - Intermediate
Must be precise and consistent in day to day developmental work, easily trainable and ready to learn. - Intermediate
Must be able to effectively communicate reports, problems or issues, verbally as well as in writing. - Intermediate
Must have good oral and written communication skills. - Intermediate
Must be able to work in a team environment and be flexible to easily adapt to changes in assignments. - Intermediate
Must follow safe practices as defined by the SOP's and MSDS. - Intermediate
Must be willing to work extended hours as and when required. - Intermediate
Strong interpersonal skills and maintaining cooperative working relationships with others. - Intermediate
Managing multiple projects, duties and assignments. - Intermediate
Specialized Knowledge:
Must possess in depth knowledge and trouble shooting skills with Wurster Bottom Spray Fluid Bed Processors from lab scale to Commercial scale.
Must possess expertise with the use and optimization of extrusion and spheronization manufacturing techniques.
Must have a good understanding of complex modified release dosage forms.
Must Possess in-depth knowledge of the operation and troubleshooting skills for various lab scale equipment to production scale equipment: including Blenders, granulators, planetary mixers, fluid bed dryers, fluid bed coaters, incubators, mills, vibrorotatory sifters, encapsulation equipment (Manual to fully automatic), tablet presses and tablet coaters, roller compaction, packaging.
Works independently once assignments and responsibilities are outlined and delegated. Effective in oral and written communication skills at all levels and cross functionally.

Primary Location: US-NJ-Piscataway
Work Locations: Piscataway 49 49 Colonial Drive Piscataway 08854
Job: Research & Analytics
Organization: Scientific Affairs
Schedule: Regular
Shift: Standard
Employee Status: Individual Contributor
Job Type: Full-time
Job Level: 1st Shift
Travel: No
Job Posting: Dec 4, 2019, 10:41:34 AM",3.2,"Amneal Pharmaceuticals
3.2","Piscataway, NJ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
103,Supply Chain Solution - Data Scientist,$68k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"*CURRENT EMPLOYEES :
Please click here to be redirected to the internal career site.
Job Description


The Supply Chain Solution – Data Scientist will be based in Austin, TX. In this role you will be responsible for creating reports using a variety of tools and methods.

We are looking for someone who demonstrates:
Intense collaboration
Passionate customer focus
Thoughtful, fast, disciplined execution
Tenacious commitment to continuous improvement
Relentless drive to win
Here is a glimpse of what you’ll do…
Use various analytical techniques including visualization, statistical methods, machine learning/AI to create scalable solutions for business problems
Translate Supply Chain business problems and questions into specific quantitative questions to be answered w/ available data using robust methodologies. In many cases, the data collection at scale will be part of the task and may involve co-work with software development team
Coordinate and perform testing on data quality and solutions
Analyze and extract relevant information from big data to help automate and optimize key processes
Establish scalable, efficient, automated processes for large scale data analyses, model development, model validation and model implementation
Research and implement novel machine learning and statistical approaches
Make business recommendations (e.g. cost-benefit, forecasting, experiment analysis) with effective presentations of findings to stakeholders through visual displays of quantitative information
Build scalable prototype analytics solutions
Work closely with software development/engineering teams to build model implementations and integrate successful models and algorithms in production systems at scale
Here is some of what you’ll need (required)…
Minimum 4 years’ experience with R
Demonstrated skill and experience of data analysis within open source scripting languages (e.g. R, Python)
Strong experience with SQL and working with relational databases (SQL Server, Teradata, MySQL etc.)
Strong demonstrated knowledge of applied statistical and machine learning methods
Experience with XML, JSON data formats, working with REST API’s, SVN/Git or other version control tools and techniques
Experience with Tableau in dashboard development, deployment and administration
Demonstrated ability to manage projects and implementation of solutions/applications
Effective written and oral communication skills, team player
Here are some nice to have’s…
Master’s degree in STEM field/Operations Research/Data Science/Supply Chain
Work experience in Supply Chain/Manufacturing
Be able to present quantitative results in the right context to various target audiences
Experience within the RStudio ecosystem (Shiny dashboards and applications, Plumber API’s, RStudio Connect)
Experience working with non-relational databases like MongoDB
Experience of deploying ML applications on platforms like Microsoft Azure, AWS, Google Cloud preferred
Demonstrated experience in business applications of distributed computing (e.g. MapReduce, HIVE, HADOOP)
Demonstrated capability in building scalable analytical solutions
Experience in ownership of solutions – life-cycle, roadmap, implementation, business value generation
Portfolio of data science projects on Github.com, RPubs.com etc.
Knowledge of data structures and algorithms
Demonstrated ability to communicate and influence executives and upper management
Here are a few examples of what you’ll get for the great work you provide…
Full range of medical benefits, dental, vision
Life Insurance
Matching 401K
PTO
Tuition Reimbursement
Employee discounts at local retailers
Job Category
Global Procurement & Supply Chain

Flex does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies or fee based recruitment services. Flex is an Equal Opportunity Employer and employment selection decisions are based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. Flex does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices based on: age, race, religion, color, sex, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, disability, pregnancy status or any other status protected by law. Flex provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request to express interest in a position by e-mailing: accesibility@flextronics.com. Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within Flex will be reviewed at the e-mail address. Flex will contact you if it is determined that your background is a match to the required skills required for this position. Thank you for considering a career with Flex.

The information we collect:

We may collect personal information that you choose to submit to us through the Website or otherwise provide to us. This may include your contact details; information provided in online questionnaires, feedback forms, or applications for employment; and information you provide such as CV/Resume. Your details will be provided to the entity you are applying for a job with. We will use your information for legitimate business purposes such as responding to comments or queries or answering questions; progressing applications for employment; allowing you to choose to share web content with others or; where you represent one of our customers or suppliers, administering the business relationship with that customer or supplier. We will process your data in accordance with our Recruitment Privacy Notice.

If you have any queries about the processing of your data, please contact:

Global Data Privacy Officer:

Email Address: chiefprivacyofficer@flex.com",3.8,"Flex
3.8","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
104,"Senior Product Data Analyst, Consumer",$58k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Car shopping is complicated. At CarGurus, we use data and technology to make it simple, giving people the tools they need to confidently find, buy, finance, or sell a car. The best part? Our work makes a real impact. We're the most-visited car-shopping site in the US, and we're expanding globally. Ready to come along for the ride?

About the Role

At CarGurus we use data, not hunches, to inform decisions. Product Analysts play a key role in crafting the data narrative for these decisions. We love to collaborate, we're excited by a challenge, and we believe that ownership enables us to grow.

This Product Analyst role will support the Consumer Products team, where you will have opportunities for outsized positive impact. Your data insights will play a big part in helping millions of site visitors have a more transparent and enjoyable car shopping experience. We are looking for thoughtful, daringly curious candidates who can dive into complex data and draw insightful conclusions. You'll work cross-functionally with many departments and partners, and gain exposure to multiple dimensions of the business.

Our team values diversity in experience and backgrounds—we do our best work when we create a space for different voices and perspectives. Whatever unique experiences or skill sets you bring to the table, we look forward to learning from each other

What You'll Do:
Conduct exploratory data analysis across disparate data sources (e.g. website usage, dealer behavior patterns and customer insights) to understand the performance of existing products and see opportunities for new product offerings
Partner with the product, engineering, marketing, sales, and finance departments to grow our business, including recommending and advocating for performance improvement ideas
Define metrics to evaluate business performance, products and experiments; build reports and dashboards to monitor and understand them
Communicate and present data analysis, visualizations, and insights to key partners
Be a voice and advocate for using data to improve the quality of our decision making
Mentor data analysts on technical and professional development
Who You Are:
4+ years of experience in data analysis (experience in consumer internet, digital marketing or SaaS product data a plus)
Proficiency in SQL and Python/R, or other scripting language
Strong grasp of statistical concepts (confidence intervals, hypothesis testing, regression models)
Knowledge of BI and reporting tools, or demonstrated ability in learning new tool
Ability to influence multiple stakeholders to adopt new data-driven approaches and achieve shared business goals
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
CarGurus Culture:

At CarGurus, we invest in our people's professional growth with everything from learning and development programs to tuition reimbursement. Want to work on projects that expand your skill set without sacrificing your work/life balance? You got it. We also strive to provide perks and benefits that employees actually care about like free lunch, commuter subsidies, and more. That includes equity in the company—our way of showing that we want you here for the long haul.

We work hard every day to build the world's most trusted and transparent automotive marketplace, but trust and transparency don't just apply to our consumers. They extend to our talent, too. We aim to create a workplace where everyone feels they can bring the ultimate expression of themselves and their potential—where you don't just fit, you thrive. We don't discriminate based on race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

In addition to the US, CarGurus operates sites in Canada, the UK. We have offices in Cambridge, MA; Detroit, MI; Dublin, Ireland; San Francisco, CA and London, UK. Check out our careers page to learn more.",3.9,"CarGurus
3.9","Cambridge, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
105,Senior Battery Scientist/Engineer,-1,"Position: Senior Battery Scientist/Engineer

Company: BrightVolt (www.brightvolt.com)

LOCATION: Indiana

REPORTS TO: Chief Battery Scientist

COMPENSATION: DOE

POSITION SUMMARY: The Senior Battery Scientist/Engineer’s primary responsibility will be product design & development of thin film batteries including product specification at the development level. The prospective candidate is expected to follow through from cradle to adult stages of the product: based on the performance requirement, ensure comprehensive qualification and validation of the design, transfer developed battery technology to scale up and manufacturing teams, work alongside production and quality teams to ensure that scaled up products meet required specifications, and address inadequate product performance if necessary. The ideal candidate will be familiar with the construction and manufacturing processes of lithium-based batteries and have successfully worked on various battery design configurations from concept to production. Some travel may be required.

CORE POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES
Product design: from concept to scale up including all ancillary requirements. (ie; regulatory, testing, etc.)
Project management: project conceptualization, execution, management, and reporting
Process improvement: Product development system operations, development and characterization of new processes, and improvement of existing process to improve battery performance
Working knowledge of Technical Sales to assist the Sales & Marketing teams on technical know-hows
COMPETENCIES
Execution: Able to translate designs and planning to actions and quantifiable results.
Quality: Commitment to product quality & customer satisfaction
Benchmark: Closely monitor current industry trends; benchmark competitive products and technologies to maintain BrightVolt’s leadership position in battery design and technology
Ownership: Be committed to product excellence, value, and continuous improvement (quality, service, and cost)
Personality: Positive, energetic, team oriented. Can effectively foster collaborative relationships with team members at all organizational levels.
SKILLS:
Strong organizational and project management skills.
High attention to details, accuracy and precision
Advanced communication (oral & written) and interpersonal skills
Demonstrated knowledge of cell and battery testing methodologies; interpretation and presentation of data.
Design of experiment (DOE) at development level
Failure analysis (FMEA), including validation testing, and root cause analysis
Knowledge in 6-sigma design concept a plus
MINIMUM POSITION REQUIREMENTS:
BS Engineering in Chemical, Electrochemical or Material Science w/minimum 10 years related industrial experience, or an advanced degree with minimum 5 yrs. related experience, in battery (primaries and secondary) design & development.
Demonstrated proficiency with MS Office, MS Project, etc.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Relocation assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Overtime
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
battery design/engineering: 5 years (Required)
private company battery design and engineer design: 5 years (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.brightvolt.com
Company's Facebook page:
BrightVolt
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.1,"BrightVolt
4.1","Newberry, IN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
106,Quality Control Scientist III,$37k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Quality Control Scientist III

Join our team in Milwaukee, WI. We are expanding this site to provide R&D, manufacturing and operations support for catalog and custom TheraPure components.

Biosciences Division / Milwaukee, WI

How will you make an impact?

The Quality Control Scientist III is responsible for (1) performing and interpreting analytical assays related to finished (bulk) product, in-process product, raw materials and other samples in QC lab in accordance with the quality and departmental procedures, (2) development and validation of new analytical methods for products and raw materials, (3) improvement of existing analytical methods for products and raw materials.

What will you do?

Perform and troubleshoot chemical assays (e.g., KF, UV-Vis, HPLC, NMR, etc.) following standard procedures and maintain records according to ISO and/or other applicable standards
Evaluate need for improvement in documentation, and implement improvement, when needed
Maintain lab equipment according to procedure. Maintain expertise in equipment use and troubleshooting. Identify and recommend the need for new equipment
Provide training to associates, foster achievement of goals as coach for team members and act as role model in implementation and improvement of safety practices/procedures
Perform laboratory investigations. Execute experiments to troubleshoot assays, resolve customer complaints and confirm out of specification results
Provide technical expertise to management and interdepartmental teams. Work with cross-functional teams to prepare for new product launches
Plan and execute validation protocols for existing or new analytical methods
Write technical reports. Prepare and deliver technical presentations
Support and actively participates in the continuous improvement processes.
How will you get here?
Education:
B.S. in Biology, Chemistry, Biochemistry, or a related science; Advanced degree, preferred
Experience / Skills:
Minimum of 5 years of laboratory experience in industry. Quality Control experience, preferred
Strong understanding of analytical principles, theory and operation of various analytical instruments and techniques (HPLC, NMR)
Ability to work on complex problems of diverse scope, and exercise judgment within broadly defined practices and policies
Strong understanding of analytical data, proficiency in troubleshooting, capability in method development
Ability to use computers and MS office (Word, Excel) knowledge
Good written communication skills, teamwork and interpersonal skills.
Excellent presentation and communication skills
Ability to regularly handle chemicals, solvents, and potentially hazardous substances
Physical Requirements:
Be mechanically adept and able to apply mechanical fundamentals to properly operate, the equipment within their area of responsibility
The employee is occasionally required to walk, sit, stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, and crawl and frequently lift and/or move 50 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move more than 50 pounds with assistance
Specific vision abilities required for this position include close vision, distant vision, depth perception and the ability to adjust focus and differentiate between basic colors.",3.6,"Thermo Fisher - America
3.6","Milwaukee, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,1902,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
107,Data Scientist,Employer Provided Salary:$80k-$120k,"About ClearCut Analytics
ClearCut was founded in Chicago with the mission of revolutionizing strategic decision-making by the world's leading brands through data-powered business intelligence. With a focus on the Amazon marketplace, ClearCut provides a vast array of sales analytics to equip brands with the information they need to maximize their value.


Data Scientist Job Description
ClearCut Analytics is looking for an innovative, solutions-oriented Data Scientist to join our fast-paced company and growing Analytics & Product Development team. The Data Scientist will play a key role in our company’s growth through building a highly scalable infrastructure that allows our team to develop data-driven solutions to solve complex business challenges. The ideal candidate is passionate about technology, loves collaborating to solve a wide variety of challenges and interesting use cases. This role will report to ClearCut’s Chief Technology Officer.
Responsibilities
Helping to build and drive the Data Science and Analytics roadmap
Leveraging data to drive business solutions for clients that are presented through ClearCut’s SaaS platform
Performing data collection, as well as developing custom models and algorithms to apply to data sets
Using predictive modeling to increase and optimize business operations, customer experience, revenue generation, and other business outcomes
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for modeling and analysis, while enhancing processes and tools used to monitor model performance and input data
Developing machine learning models and productizing AI-based solutions alongside product and development team
Ideating new data-related concepts and applications then overseeing projects through deployment
Taking end-to-end ownership of problem domains and continuously improving upon quantitative solutions
Requirements
MS or Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, CS/Engineering, or similar field
4+ years of professional experience in an analytics and data science environment utilizing quantitative analytics methodologies, experience in a SaaS or eCommerce environment a plus
Experience writing programs/queries with data analysis tools and languages such as Python, R, SAS, AMPL, SQL, or Alteryx
Hands-on experience with multivariate analytic techniques: linear and logistic regression, decision tree, cluster and factor analysis, time-series forecasting methods, SVM models, and/or neural networks
Understanding of broad business principles and the ability to create solutions for real-world challenges
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Eagerness to learn and grow",4.8,"ClearCut Analytics
4.8","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
108,Senior Finance Data Analyst,$81k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"Qualys is seeking a Senior Finance Data Analyst with a strong experience in data management and financial reporting and systems. Responsibilities include establishing and maintaining Master Data standards and items within the Qualys systems and monitoring and validating the integrity of data as well as supporting corrective actions related to variances to standard. He/she will also help maintain systems and manage information used for financial administration and key financial metrics and reporting and assist in setting up automated reporting and financial analysis.

Responsibilities include:
Implement, optimize, and maintain financial systems and augment it with a separate data warehouse as needed
Create, maintain, monitor, and analyze all master data in ERP & CRM and integrated solutions
Ensure and enhance data quality and train users to ensure continuity of results
Provide creative yet logical approaches to solving data problems
Perform various levels of data validation across multiple systems
Create and manage the data dictionary to support change management efforts
Draft and maintain policies, procedures, and other documentation to ensure uniform, accurate, and consistent data are present
Provide testing support for upgrades and releases, including integration testing from various sources to target systems
Assist in setting up hierarchies and maintain consistency across different systems
Assist with data and analysis requests, providing detailed backups and explanations as needed
Build and support complex planning and forecasting models using the Anaplan platform
Build Anaplan Visualizations
Set up and automate reporting and charting and analyze trends and patterns
Perform other ad hoc responsibilities as necessary
You are:
A strong team player with a positive, service-oriented attitude who drives process improvements to increase effectiveness of the team and minimize room for errors
Hands-on, detail-oriented, and organized; prior experience having gathered, structured, monitored, and validated data to ensure data integrity and detailed documentation; has developed a habit of checking the accuracy of data and analysis several times over before submitting for review
A self-starter and high-achiever with a focus on doing a great job
A superior problem solver, possessing the initiative to look into the details and interpret the impact of key business drivers
Excellent multi-tasker who has strong time and project management skills and understands the importance of planning in advance to meet deadlines that include multiple review points and iterations
Strong communicator, both written & verbal; reliable and responsive to email and phone communications
Highest level of integrity and good judgment with the ability to effectively deal with highly sensitive, confidential information
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or Accounting/Finance/Business or related field
Minimum of combined 4 years of hands on experience building Anaplan models and/or master data management in an ERP or CRM system
Experience querying data from a native source (ERP, CRM or database). Understanding of backend data and database structures
Experience partnering with FP&A and to deliver insightful information
Hands on experience with NetSuite, Salesforce, and Admin is a plus
High proficiency with Excel is a must, including ability to build automated Excel models from scratch (e.g., vlookup, sumif, iferror, etc.); VBA, SQL and ODBC knowledge preferred
Data organization and management skills. Technical expertise with data models, data import methodologies, database design development, and data mining; preferred experience with a BI tool",3.2,"Qualys
3.2","Foster City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
109,"Senior Data Analyst, Marketing",$54k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why We Need You

As part of the PEMCO Brand & Communications team, the Senior Data Analyst plays a critical role in making our marketing and communications efforts intelligent, efficient, and competitive. We’re looking for someone who can work with every member of the marketing organization to understand our data and turn raw numbers and research findings into compelling narratives and strategic recommendations.

In this role, you’ll collaborate cross-functionally to identify prospects and customers for targeted campaigns. You’ll conduct competitive research to identify gaps and opportunities in customer experiences, product mix, marketing strategies, and more. And you’ll create and review reports to identify strategic opportunities, monitor our sales funnel and forecast its performance, and own team reports including our comprehensive dashboard.

What You'll Be Doing
Work directly with users to gather requirements, provide status updates, and build relationships
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from stakeholders or out of self-initiated curiosity with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Identify trends and opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets
Evaluate for efficiency, problems, and inaccuracies, developing and maintaining protocols for handling, processing, and cleaning data
Develop, implement, and maintain analytic systems
Develop source-to-target mappings and information-model specification documents for data sets
Define and implement data acquisition and integration logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools within defined technology stack to ensure optimal scalability and performance of the solution
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources
Work closely with project managers to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Demonstrate behaviors consistent with PEMCO's policies, values, code of ethics, and business conduct
Authentically support the PEMCO Brand and constantly are on the lookout for top talent to join us to achieve our Mission to Worry Less and Live More
Other duties as assigned
What You'll Bring
B.A. or B.S. degree or equivalent work experience (Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, or Statistics) is required
6 years of experience in a data analyst role is required
One (1+) years of experience in working with automated testing tools (Quick Test Professional / Selenium)
MS Office: Skilled proficiency in Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, Access is required
MS Office: Skilled proficiency in MS Visio is required
Excellent written communications skills sufficient to write systems documentation, reports, and business correspondences in an organized and concise fashion is required
Ability to verbally present complex concepts and technical information to a non-technical audience is required
Communicates clearly and informatively, verbally and in writing, with colleagues, customers, and the community in both technical and non-technical professional language is required
Passionate about working with disparate datasets bringing data together to answer business questions
Collaborates to create, manage, and translate data to meaningful insights. Can work with external vendors to integrate data for analysis; knows how to build efficient and scalable infrastructure and data models
Ability to analyze, diagnose and resolve complex unstructured problems quickly, efficiently, and collaboratively
We've Got You Covered
Competitive salary
200% match on your 401(k) up to 6% of your pay
Generous medical, dental, disability and life insurance plans
A friendly, professional work environment
The opportunity to work at a place of integrity, where customer service is emphasized
At PEMCO, we celebrate and support our differences. We know employing a team rich in diverse thoughts, experiences, and opinions allows our employees, our products and our community to flourish. PEMCO is honored to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are dedicated to equal employment opportunities regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation or Veteran status.",4.3,"PEMCO Insurance
4.3","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1949,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
110,Sr. Algorithm Development Scientist / Engineer,$12k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description


Dynetics, a wholly owned subsidiary of Leidos, is seeking a talented, self-motivated Aerospace or Electrical Engineer, or Scientist for simulation and post processing algorithm development to join a multi-discipline engineering team in support of the development of Avionics products design, development, analysis, and test. The end products are avionics systems that provide time, space, position, guidance, navigation, control and automated flight termination capability. With offices across the United States engaging in the defense, space, cyber and commercial fields, Dynetics provides responsive, cost-effective engineering, scientific and IT solutions.

The candidate will design and develop in-flight, post processing and estimation algorithms for complex flight vehicle configurations and flight envelopes including high-dynamic scenarios. The position requires a fundamental of modeling and estimation techniques, coupled with a solid base of programming experience. Candidate must have an interest in modeling and simulation, analysis, and problem-solving. These skills will be used in the creation of detailed algorithms, estimation techniques and test scenarios to support complete end-to-end test and evaluation of: strategic/tactical missile systems, glide munitions, and manned/unmanned vehicles.

The successful applicant will work closely with a highly technical team of multi-disciplinary engineers to provide accurate and timely analysis of flight vehicle systems' performance and capabilities, and to verify/validate system models.

The work will evolve into hardware in the loop simulation, and flight test support. Work may cover both new and existing air vehicles. The work will engage in module level testing, system level testing, debugging, and documentation, in addition to authoring code. As part of a team the work will use configuration management tools and other development tools and methods to ensure a quality product.

This position may require travel for meetings and test events.

Basic Qualifications


Position requires a Bachelor's degree from an ABET accredited school in Engineering, Math or Science with 5+ years of applicable experience or a Master's Degree in Engineering, Math or Science with 3+ years of applicable experience or a PhD in Engineering, Math or Physics with applicable course and research work.
Candidate must have familiarity with linear and nonlinear attitude estimation methods, e.g., extended Kalman filters, batch smoother based on quadratic and cubic programs, sigma-point ﬁlters, particle ﬁlters
Candidate must possess knowledge of state estimation techniques and their application to aerospace physical systems
Candidate must possess knowledge or have a willingness to learn and apply algorithms for trajectory estimation and reconstruction
Candidate must have familiarity with Global Navigation Satellite System fundamentals and application
Candidate must have experience with Matlab, Simulink and basic programming concepts
Candidate must have interest in and basic familiarity with the analysis of physical systems, to include simulation development and maintenance, and hardware-in-the-loop development, application and validation
Excellent communication and inter-personal skills are required, as the successful candidate must function effectively in a team environment and interact with program stakeholders.

Candidate must be a resident of the North Alabama area or willing to relocate to the Huntsville - North Alabama area.

Other Qualifications


Experience with the following is beneficial:
Command-and-control modeling
C/C++
Ground and flight test support
Hands-on experience with aviation platforms
Experience with design and implementation of embedded software or firmware
Experience with Guidance, Navigation, and Control (GNC) for missiles and/or launch vehicles
Knowledge of GPS receiver operation, integration and test
Experience with GPS simulators
Experience with GPS antennas including Anti-Jam antennas
Organizational skills to document designs, assist with Technical Data Packages (TDP) and support production and test production Avionics systems
Security Requirements


Candidate must be a US Citizen and possess (and be able to maintain) a Final Secret Clearance or meet the eligibility to obtain (and maintain) a Secret Clearance.
Job Number:
01.05.03-79

Closing Date:
11/11/2020

#CJ

#LI",4.2,"Dynetics
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
111,Senior Data Scientist Marketing,$130k-$150k (Employer Est.),"****This position is located in Clearwater, FL and is only temporarily remote due to current COVID restrictions.*****

The Senior Data Scientist (Marketing) will work closely with the SVP of FP&A and Dir of Analytics to implement advanced analytical models and other data-driven solutions.

Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders in marketing to identify opportunities to use available data to develop business solutions.
Enhance existing data collection procedures to ensure that all data relevant for analyses is captured.
Cleanse, consolidate, and verify the integrity of data used in analyses.
Build and validate predictive models to increase customer retention, revenue generation, and other business outcomes.
Assist in the design and data modeling of the data warehouse.
Visualize data, especially in reports and dashboards, to communicate analysis results to stakeholders.
Extend data collection to unstructured data within the company and external sources
Develop machine learning driven products for internal use.
Perform ad-hoc analysis, presentations and other projects as required
Minimum Qualifications:
Master's degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or other quantitative discipline. PhD preferred.
Master's degree 4+ yrs in similar role: PhD 3+ yrs
Experience with statistical computer languages (Python, R etc.) to manipulate and analyze large datasets.
Experience with databases, query languages, and associated data architecture.
Experience with data visualization tools like Looker, Tableau, PowerBI, or Plotly
Experience in professional application of machine learning algorithms such as Random Forest, SVM, k-NN, Naïve Bayes, Gradient Boosting. Deep learning frameworks (Keras/Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc.) is a plus
Experience applying data science to marketing including attribution modeling, media mix modeling, and ROI analysis.
Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical colleagues
Experience with marketing automation platforms and/or CRM software is a plus (Hubspot, Salesforce, Marketo, etc.)
Experience with AWS is a plus
Note: An applicant assessment, background check and drug test may be part of your hiring procedure.

Individuals seeking employment at KnowBe4 are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

No recruitment agencies, please.",4.8,"KnowBe4
4.8","Clearwater, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
112,Data Scientist - Regional Merchandising Strategy,$115k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

We are looking for a Data Scientist who will work cross-functionally with technical and non-technical teams to mine internal and external semi-structured data to understand consumer demand in individual markets, drive sales through feed optimization, influence supply, design and deploy long-term merchandising strategies.

The ideal candidate should be passionate about Wish and e-commerce, be able to conduct market research independently, has a strong analytical and consultative mindset, deep understanding of databases, visualization, and modeling techniques, and the ability to thrive in a dynamic, fast-paced environment delivering against tight deadlines, and a passion for scaling data-driven regional merchandising strategies.

What you'll be doing:
Conduct quantitative market research for each market, by analyzing external e-commerce web data, understand regional consumer demand, through various text and image mining techniques
Analyze internal behavior tracking data and forecast Wish users’ demand
Identify high potential but underexposed product candidates, propose strategies to increase their exposure and boost sales
Implement the strategies and set up A/B test experiments to gauge the impact, and reiterate
Establish scalable, efficient, and automated processes for data-driven regional merchandising strategies
Qualifications
Bachelor's or advanced degree in an analytical field (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Economics or similar)
3+ years of hands-on experience in predictive modeling and analysis
2+ years Python, R, or Matlab experience
2+ years work experience including business analytics and project management
2+ years experience writing complex SQL queries in a business environment
2+ years experience with Tableau, OBIEE or other visualization tools
2+ years experience operating in a Unix/Linux environment
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in e-commerce companies working on mining product listing data
Text mining and image mining experience
Feed ranking experience
A/B test experience
Analytical mindset and ability to see the big picture and influence others
Detail-oriented and must have an aptitude for solving unstructured problems
Ability to work effectively in a multi-task, high volume environment
Ability to be adaptable and flexible in responding to deadlines and workflow fluctuations
#LI-BD1

Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,"Wish
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
113,Principal Data Scientist,-1,"The Principal Data Scientist will be a data science subject matter expert and provide team leadership in their area of responsibility. The Technical Team Lead will lead selected projects or activities, as required, and will collaborate with other disciplines and teams.

Qualifications:
• MSc/PhD degree in in a quantitative field (such as Computer Science, Mathematics, Engineering) or BSc in a related discipline and 7 years of industry experience
• 5+ years of professional experience in data science, computer vision or related fields
• 3+ years of professional experience leading data science or related discipline teams
• Subject matter expert in the areas of Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence
• Advanced quantitative and analytical skills around applied research, mathematical modelling, and statistical modeling
• Practical software development skills in one or more programming languages, such as Python, Scala/Java, C++, etc.
• Fluency with one or more machine learning frameworks (such as TensorFlow, Pytorch, Caffe)
• Experience leading and mentoring senior, mid-level, and junior data scientists
• A passion for AI/ML, overcoming difficult challenges, and accomplishing great things
Bonus:
• Proven experience developing and evolving novel/new DNN architectures
• Strong publication background (Company will support publication work)",4.5,"Infinite Resource Solutions
4.5",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
114,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"We are always looking for new talent to join us in our mission to optimize time tracking. As one of the largest, award-winning, and top-selling app vendors in the Atlassian Ecosystem, we hire only the best and brightest.
What does Tempo do? We enable companies to grasp the true value of time and get meaningful insights into their operations. With our products, managers know exactly how their teams are spending their hours each day. From billing, to resource management, to cost tracking, we are proud to give our customers data they can use. Lately we have been expanding into new ecosystems, most recently Zendesk. It’s an exciting time, with lots of innovation and growth on the horizon!
Our reach is wide: we are happy to support more than 13,000 customers all over the world. We are looking for candidates to bring fresh perspectives to our amazing teams located in Iceland, Canada, and the USA.
Join us and discover the joy of being part of a team that builds a product our customers’ love!
The position is currently fully remote due to COVID19.
About the Job
We are looking for an experienced and enthusiastic Data Engineer to join our growing team. This position will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data ingestion and processing pipelines, as well as optimizing data flow and collection for cross functional teams. The ideal candidate is an experienced data pipeline builder and data manipulator who enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our data analysts and data scientists on data initiatives and will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products. The right candidate will be excited by the prospect of optimizing or even re-designing our company’s data architecture to support our next generation of products and data initiatives.
The Role
Develops and maintains scalable data pipelines and builds out new API integrations to support continuing increases in data sources, volume and complexity.
Collaborates with analytics and business teams to improve data models that feed business intelligence tools, increasing data accessibility and fostering data-driven decision making across the organization.
Implements processes and systems to monitor data quality, ensuring production data is always accurate and available for key stakeholders and business processes that depend on it.
Writes unit/integration tests, contributes to engineering wiki, and documents work.
Performs data analysis required to troubleshoot data related issues and assist in the resolution of data issues.
Process unstructured data into a form suitable for analysis.
Analyze processed data.
The ideal Candidate
BS or MS degree in Computer Science or a related technical field.
5+ years of industry experience in data engineering or other related field.
4+ years of Python development experience.
5+ years of strong SQL experience.
Experience building workflows as Directed Acyclic Graphs (DAGs) using Apache Airflow.
Experience with big data tools: Bigtable, BigQuery, Airflow, Spark, Kafka, etc.
Experience with GCP and/or AWS cloud services.
Experience with relational SQL and NoSQL databases, including Postgres, Bigtable, etc.
Experience designing, building, and maintaining data processing systems
Experience with AWS Glue, AWS Firehose, AWS Kinesis, Avro / Parquet file formats, Snowflake, or data lake architecture is a plus.
Proven abilities to take initiative and be innovative
Analytical mind with a problem-solving aptitude
Great communicator
Team player
What's in it for you?
Remote work options
Unlimited vacation!!
Great benefits plan including health, dental, vision and more
Great office spaces in Canada, Iceland and USA
Diverse and dynamic teams
Challenging and exciting work
An opportunity to have a real impact on our business
Free breakfast and snacks
A great range of social activities
And so much more!!
Come and join our amazing & high-performing tech team!
Applicants must have a valid work permit for Canada",3.6,"Tempo Software
3.6",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
115,Data Architect/Scientist,$80k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Member of Technical Staff – DATA ARCHITECT / SCIENTIST
US, Home Office

US Citizen or Permanent Resident

Wind River

In a world increasingly driven by software innovation, Wind River is pioneering the technologies to accelerate the digital transformation of our customers with a new generation of Mission Critical AI Systems in an AI-first world with the most exacting standards for safety, security, performance, and reliability. Success will be determined by our ability to innovate with velocity and sell at the solutions level.


ABOUT THE OPPORTUNITY

Wind River Systems is seeking an experienced high-performing senior software engineer for a position developing a hybrid cloud-based data analytics, machine learning and artificial intelligence platform.

The successful candidate will join a highly skilled development team delivering internal and external tools and technologies across a complete analytics driven DevSecOps platform, pioneering many new industry leading capabilities.

This is a data science all-rounder role. The core purpose of the role is to build models to improve the product, the customer experience and ultimately the business.


Interface & Collaboration

The successful candidate will collaborate with development and customer facing teams to ensure high levels of intuitive usability and product quality.

Responsibilities
Conceive, devise, create, implement and fine tune data science models to solve a range of development and systems problems
Help devise and layout a high-quality infrastructure, upon which future data science can flourish
Help up skill other analytical team members into advanced data science techniques
Produce ad hoc analyses
Deliver cloud analytics solutions across a wide portfolio of class-leading products, in many industry verticals.
Extract data from development tools like Gitlab, Jenkins, JIRA, and many more.
Extracting data from real devices in the labs and the real world – planes, trains and automobiles
Develop new user interfaces and reporting options for these tools
Ensure security of all data
And let's be honest, a whole load of data wrangling!


ABOUT YOU

Core Competencies, Demonstrated Success & Qualifications
BSc / MSc degree (Computer Science, Computer/Electrical Engineering) or equivalent work experience
US Citizen or Permanent Resident
Real-time analytics experience—receiving and analyzing streaming data from applications and distributed devices (not just processing data)
Experience working for companies engaged with autonomous devices in any vertical market (unmanned vehicles and defense systems, robotics for manufacturing and warehousing, autonomous transportation systems, etc.)
Blend of technical expertise and soft skills including business acumen, decision making, well developed oral and written communication skills
Demonstrable skills in SQL and Python
Data science models (K-means, random Forrest, neural nets, etc.)
Strong foundational knowledge in stats and mathematics
Experience converting data models into products for real customers
Experience with Nifi / Kafka / Postgres / Hadoop / Linux
Familiarity with Real Time Operating Systems (RTOS)
Experience in autonomous systems development is a plus
3+ years of experience of big data analytics
6+ years working in a software development arena",4.1,"Wind River
4.1","Portland, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
116,Process Development Scientist 29900 - Vision Systems & Packaging Process,-1,"Education: *
Doctorate degree or Master’s degree and 3 years of directly related experience or Bachelor’s degree and 5 years of directly related experience.*
Preferred Qualifications: *
Packaging Process Equipment and Vision System Installation, Qualification and Improvements.*
Description: *
To conceive, design, implement and execute specific scientific experiments, which contribute to the successful completion of goals and/or projects under general guidance of supervisor. Under general guidance of supervisor,
Conceives and designs, executes or evaluates, and interprets experimental strategies. Provides input to new processes to generate robust and reliable data. Ensures that studies are conducted in compliance with the respective protocol and applicable guidelines and regulations. Designs, monitors or conducts experimental strategies with general guidance from supervisor. Provides data analysis and interpretation, and assesses impact of the data on the project. Keeps current in field of scientific expertise and areas relevant to their function. Monitors field of expertise, including literature and technology development, and communicates relevant observations. May introduce advanced scientific methods. Develops and implements new and novel protocols to address specific issues. May represent the department on project teams under supervision of a senior scientific staff member. May initiate productive collaborations within and outside of the department or company. Advises or assists others in experimental design and/or interpretation/diagnosis of data and implementing innovative remedies.
Independently authors scientific reports, summary documents, complex regulatory documents, invention disclosure submissions and/or patents. Participates in external scientific community. May assume lead role in department-wide support efforts such as safety, recruiting and committees. May develop supervisory and mentoring skills. Develops and follows timelines for completing project team work.
Skills: *
Advanced scientific analysis and troubleshooting skills.
Advanced laboratory work skills. Ability to motivate and/or supervise the activities of others.
Must be well organized, have multi-task project experience, and be able to communicate and work well with other departments. Must have demonstrated skills and competencies in the following areas: Verbal communication
Written communication including technical writing skills, negotiation and conflict resolution Analytical problem solving Project management Ability to be flexible and manage change. Computer literacy (Windows environment: Word, Excel, Power Point). Skills requiring the application of scientific theory. Creative skills in the design and performance of scientific experiments and interpretation of results. Strong knowledge of cGMP’s. Fully bilingual (English/Spanish).
Job Type: Full-time

Salary: $0.00 per hour",3.7,"CIS International LLC
3.7","Juncos, PR",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
117,Clinical Research Scientist (Social Work),$38k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Ph.D level Clinical Research Scientist (Social Work) at the Center for Child and Family Traumatic Stress (CCFTS) will support leadership through a research agenda and projects focused on individuals, children, and families. This published Ph.D Social Work Researcher will focus on traumatic stress, impact of race, mental health disparities within a multicultural context, and the promotion of social justice. The incumbent will work with federal and state grant funded research/projects and be a part of the department’s clinical practice with communities of color or other minorities. In coordination with the Vice President, Research Director, and key CCFTS leadership this position will assist with research direction. The Clinical Research Scientist may also have administrative and clinical care duties as assigned.

Qualifications:

EDUCATION:
Must possess a Ph.D. in Social Work with an emphasis on data, evaluation, and research.
EXPERIENCE:
 Must have demonstrated an active portfolio of funded research and leadership in the field.
 Must have at least five (5) years’ experience conducting research and publishing in a peer
reviewed journal.
 Must have at least one year of Supervisory or Management experience.",3.4,"Kennedy Krieger Institute
3.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
118,Senior Data Scientist,$71k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities:

·- End-to-End development of computer vision
model for performing cell counting

·- Working knowledge of different loss
functions, ways of regularization, different architecture design

·- Familiarity with containerizing the code in
a manner that is suitable for deployment

· - Utilise a scientific and pragmatic approach
to all projects

· - Compare results from various methodologies
and recommend best model/approaches

· - Write robust code that can be deployed to
production

· - Work with interdisciplinary product teams
to design, develop, and optimize the solution for the end-user

· - Communicate technical subject matter
clearly and concisely to audiences of various backgrounds

Requirements:

8+
hands-on experience in Data Science activities 5+
hands-on experience in NLP,NLG and Computer Vision 5+
years of Experience or certification in Cloud-based Architectures, AWS Experience
in architecting, designing and developing highly scalable distributed
data processing systems and Data Warehouse. Working
experience in one or more modern Object-Oriented Programming languages
(Java, Scala, Python) Experience
with executing projects in Agile environments Analyze
data, identifying gaps, issues, patterns and trends Analyze
application dependencies and conduct impact assessment of changes Strong
understanding of database design concepts - Transactional / Data mart /
Data warehouse etc.

You must be legally authorized to work in the
United States without the need for employer sponsorship, now or at any time in
the future.

Behavorial Attributes

Extremely
good interpersonal skills with working with cross functional teams
located across geographies
Good
interpersonal and client-handling skills with the ability to manage
expectations and explain technical detail.
Ability
to multitask, prioritizes tasks, and quickly adjusts in a rapidly
changing environment.
Ability
to work effectively with geographically dispersed team.
Ability
to balance complex information with accuracy and attention to detail.
A
disciplined, investigative and inquisitive mind; together with creative
abilities.
Excellent
conflict management and negotiation skills
Eager
to learn and continuously develop personal and technical capabilities.
High
level of dedication, initiative, vision and enthusiasm

#LI-MA1 #ind123

Employee Status : Full Time Employee
Shift : Day Job
Travel : No
Job Posting : Oct 07 2020

About Cognizant Cognizant (Nasdaq-100: CTSH) is one of the world's leading professional services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology models for the digital era. Our unique industry-based, consultative approach helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses. Headquartered in the U.S., Cognizant is ranked 194 on the Fortune 500 and is consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world. Learn how Cognizant helps clients lead with digital at www.cognizant.com or follow us @USJobsCognizant.

Cognizant is recognized as a Military Friendly Employer and is a coalition member of the Veteran Jobs Mission. Our Cognizant Veterans Network assists Veterans in building and growing a career at Cognizant that allows them to leverage the leadership, loyalty, integrity, and commitment to excellence instilled in them through participation in military service.
Cognizant is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
If you have a disability that requires a reasonable accommodation to search for a job opening or submit an application, please email CareersNA2@cognizant.com with your request and contact information.",3.7,"Cognizant Technology Solutions
3.7","Collegeville, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,-1,-1,$10+ billion (USD),-1
119,"Principal Scientist / Team Lead, Medicinal Chemistry",-1,"The Opportunity
Does delivering a great small molecule hit, lead or development candidate thrill you? We get excited, too, and we are building the best environment in the industry to discover the drugs that will make a difference for patients. We are looking for a self-motivated, experienced Medicinal Chemist to join our team and to help drive projects from lead generation through candidate selection in a highly collaborative environment.
We take what we do seriously, but we don’t take ourselves too seriously. You’ll have fun in our collaborative and energetic environment where you’ll face new challenges every day.
If you are flexible and fearless in the face of rapidly evolving data, then we want you to join us and discover the next generation of innovative therapeutics based on protein motion!
Your Role
You will apply your drug hunting expertise to leading teams and developing strategy across the spectrum of drug discovery, from hit validation to development candidate selection. You will work closely and collaboratively in a multi-disciplinary team of computational chemists, biophysicists, cell and molecular biologists, pharmacologists, and DMPK specialists. You see how all the aspects of compound performance are necessary to make it a drug, and you can communicate that effectively to your discovery partners.
You will work with chemists at Relay as well as with teams at CROs to advance your projects.
You will contribute to the chemistry team’s development of a platform for efficient project execution by identifying and establishing collaborations with both academic and industry partners to expand our capabilities. Internally, you will help drive the implementation of cutting-edge in silico methods of compound design and data analysis to facilitate rapid SAR decision making.
Your Background
You were educated in chemistry with an emphasis on synthetic organic chemistry, synthetic methodology or a related field.
You have 7+ years of relevant biotech and/or pharmaceutical industry experience in medicinal chemistry, with an emphasis on small molecule drug discovery.
You have participated in the delivery of clinical candidates from discovery into development, and your track record of excellence is supported by high impact, peer-reviewed publications and/or patents. You have led or are ready to lead a team and make critical decisions on the SAR direction.
Our current portfolio is oncology-focused, so experience in this therapeutic area and related targets is a strong plus.
You are comfortable enabling your compound design with in silico predictive tools and structure-based drug design.
You have strong communication skills, can flex to different work styles, and believe that the best outcomes result from bringing out the creativity of your colleagues.
You are committed to building an energetic, collaborative and open company culture and contributing to the company’s success.


We believe in building balanced teams and a place where our people can be their best self every day. We encourage people from underrepresented backgrounds to apply.

Relay Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer and will not discriminate against any employee or applicant on the basis of age, color, disability, gender, national origin, race, religion, sexual orientation, veteran status, or any classification protected by federal, state, or local law.

Our Culture:
At Relay Tx, we believe that along with our people, our culture is our greatest asset. In fact we're proud to share we were named as one of the Boston Business Journal's ""Best Places to Work"" in 2017, the #1 place for small companies in 2018 & the #2 place for small companies in 2019. To drive that culture, no one will stop you or hold you back. Instead, we will give you the tools and colleagues to push forward relentlessly and cheer you on as you go. If this resonates with you, drop us a line.

About Relay Therapeutics
Relay Therapeutics is a clinical-stage precision medicines company transforming the drug discovery process with the goal of bringing life-changing therapies to patients. Built on unparalleled insights into protein motion and how this dynamic behavior relates to protein function, we aim to effectively drug protein targets that have previously been intractable, with an initial focus on enhancing small molecule therapeutic discovery in targeted oncology. Our Dynamo platform integrates an array of leading-edge experimental and computational approaches to provide a differentiated understanding of protein structure and motion to drug these targets. We have built a world-class team of leading experts from each of these disciplines, and they are driven by a deep collaboration at every step of our drug discovery process.
Our team is equal parts fearless and relentless, with a shared passion for working collaboratively in intellectually stimulating environments. If you’re excited by the challenge of putting protein motion at the heart of drug discovery and passionate about making a difference in the lives of patients, join us!",5.0,"Relay Therapeutics
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
120,Data Scientist,-1,"Back to search results
Previous job

Next job

JOB DESCRIPTION

A BIT ABOUT OUR DATA SCIENCE & ANALYTICS TEAM

Mars Petcare Data Science & Analytics team is core to our strategy. We’re using digital, data and customer insights to transform our business by finding answers to problems that we’ve often never asked ourselves before. Our vast data assets are being combined to build a 360° view of pets and pet owners to not only power Kinship’s businesses but also influence the next great ideas in the pet care space. This role will be key in helping us understand the power of our data, and how this translates into value for our company, our pets, and pet owners everywhere. Frequently the projects will be ambiguous, but that’s part of the fun; you will determine the best way to leverage our data to tell the right story for any given audience.

HOW YOU’LL CREATE A BETTER WORLD FOR PETS
Apply advanced analytics & data science approaches to understand and predict pet and pet owner behaviors
Collaborate with internal and external teams to ensure we focus on pet-centric product and service recommendations
Support new pet technology businesses and partners by generating actionable insights from our data assets
Develop compelling stories that provide insight into the drivers of business performance and pet/pet owner behavior
WHO WE NEED TO CHART THE FUTURE OF PET CARE

We strive to hire people who are passionate about our mission: Shaping the Future of Pet Care. For all of our Kinship roles, we look for candidates who exemplify our core values. We believe what we do is just as important as how we do it, and we aim to hire people who are:
Optimistic
Purposefully Inquisitive
Open to All
And for this role, we hope you have the following skills we require to knock it out of the dog park:
Truly inspired by, and want to live, our purpose of creating a better world for pets.
4+ years’ experience in a data science role handling varied and complex data
Varied technical experience in delivering statistical analytics, data science and insight on large-scale consumer data sets across multiple sectors, including packaged goods and retail
Hands-on experience with Python is required; Familiarity with PySpark is also desirable
Comfortable with ambiguity, with a passion for collaboration to achieve objectives
A Bachelor’s degree in quantitative field (economics, statistics, business, computer science) or equivalent experience
Passion for growing and strengthening a business using data driven approaches
Familiarity with cloud-based computing services e.g. AWS, Databricks, etc.
Enjoys explaining how technical concepts to both non-technical and technical stakeholders.
WHY JOIN US?

We offer our associates a unique opportunity to have a completely customizable career within pet care. Through Kinship you will work with and learn from a community of industry executives, pet partners, entrepreneurs, and fellow associates across our startup investment companies, outside partners, and in Mars Petcare. Our nimble and flexible approach to work allows you to make an immediate impact across businesses, while learning new skills at every stage. The diversity of our work opens doors to big opportunities and unlocks enormous potential for countless career experiences in pet care. Join us in our mission to chart the future of pet care, alongside the industry’s brightest minds.

Kinship’s offices are global, and so are our associates. We are located in NYC, San Francisco, Portland, London, Helsinki, Shanghai, and in Moscow. Many of us flex between our dog-friendly hubs and our home offices. Today, Kinship offers exceptional benefits for you, your family, and your pets, generous paid time off, exponential opportunities to build a career within pet care, and progressive reward packages. Interested? Let’s take big strides, together.",4.0,"Mars
4.0",United States,-1,10000+ Employees,1911,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
121,Signal and Information Processing Research Scientist,-1,"Job Description:

Our Reston office is seeking a talented Signal and Information Processing Research Scientist to be part of a strong team of scientists, engineers, and operations experts in pursuit of applied research and development of effective and efficient solutions for real-world National Security System problems.

The position responsibilities include data analysis, signal and clutter phenomenology identification/capture/modeling, and advanced algorithm development, implementation and testing. Projects will involve a variety of advanced sensing and Command and Control systems, ranging from Undersea Sensors to Airborne and Space systems employing sensory modes spanning, Acoustic, Radio Frequency, and Optical/IR.

Required Qualifications:

Core Qualifications

Degree in Electrical Engineering, Physics, Mathematics, or a related field, with a minimum of 2 years of relevant work experience
Capable of researching and implementing advanced processing methods
Demonstrated Knowledge Skills and Abilities in one or more of the areas of Sonar, Radar, Streaming Video, SIGINT, or related sensing domain
Demonstrated Knowledge Skills and Abilities in one or more of the subjects of Statistical Adaptive Array and Multichannel Processing, Stochastic Processes and Applications, Classical Inference/Detection and Estimation Theory, Fusion, Tracking, Classification, or relate field
Candidates must be comfortable in small work groups, doing extended development with minimal oversight and direction
A current active US security clearance

Preferred Qualifications

MS or PhD degree in Electrical Engineering, Physics, Mathematics
Experience in mathematical/physical modeling, simulation and performance analysis
Experience analyzing data on very large and diverse scales
Programming experience in Java or C/C++

Position Location: Reston, VA

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or protected veteran status. Metron takes affirmative action in support of its policy to employ and advance in employment individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",3.0,"Metron, Inc.
3.0","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
122,Data Engineer,$52k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

ID.me is a digital identity network and our mission is to make the world a more trusted place by facilitating transparent and efficient interactions between people and organizations.

We are looking for a Data Engineer to join our Product team to design and build a robust set of tools and pipelines to support data analytics efforts. You’ll manage and optimize our core infrastructure by creating and maintaining data pipelines. You will work with other engineers and analysts from the Product and Business teams to design, implement, and maintain a data ecosystem that delivers actionable insights to make key business decisions. You have technical chops but can also work independently to prioritize issues, work within ambiguity, and manage conflicting deadlines. You are creative, data-driven, results-oriented, and eager to help us solve data problems of varying complexities.

Responsibilities
Develop technical solutions using proven techniques in data and analytics processes
Develop, prototype, and build frameworks based on open source and commercially available tools
Orchestrate and maintain data pipelines that meet security standards and ensure the integrity and quality of data
Demonstrate a passion for serving the needs of internal and external customers by enabling them with self-service reporting tools and analytics capabilities
Drive the execution of data initiatives that provide key performance metrics
Understand the data related challenges, nuances, and requirements to identify and recommend the optimal technical approach
Train and educate team members as well as stakeholders about best practices in data engineering and governance
Collaborate closely with the engineering and devops team to implement DataOps, thus reducing our analytics development cycle
Research and improve our data platform to ingest, process, transform, and distribute insightful data to our audience ranging from executives, analysts, and engineers to customers, vendors, and partners
Evangelize data driven culture by breaking down silos and encouraging data sharing
Qualifications
3+ years of hands-on experience in data engineering for a SaaS company or a mature startup
Proven experience working with various tools but more importantly, familiarity with how to best assemble and deploy production ready data stack to any cloud environment
BS in a quantitative or scientific field such as computer science, computer engineering or equivalent experience
Experience in applying agile software development approach - Git, CI/CD, Jira, etc - to data engineering
Familiar with SQL and other popular programming languages (such as Ruby, Python, .NET, etc)
Exceptional fluency with SQL; you conquered the join venn diagram long ago and have moved on to explaining cost based optimization to your peers on the engineering team
Some level of experience working in the cloud - AWS, Azure, or GCP
Experience with ingesting, processing, and visualizing data sources of varying types - structured/relational and unstructured
Experience in developing, managing, and manipulating large, complex datasets
Data-driven, detail-oriented individual with excellent storytelling and problem-solving abilities
Ability to work independently and autonomously, as well as part of a team
Superb time management, prioritization of tasks and ability to meet deadlines with little supervision
Vision: To be the world's leading digital identity network empowering people to control their own information and to prove their credentials across all channels: online, call center, and in-person.

Mission: To make the world a more trusted place by delivering the highest level of security with the least amount of friction at the lowest possible cost.

People: We have an audacious mission. We aim to fix the identity layer of the internet. Billions of people will live better lives with more trust and convenience thanks to ID.me. We are like Special Forces. We take on the most difficult challenges with amazing teammates.

ID.me Core Values: *Don't be a jerk. *Always compete. *Ask questions like a 5-year old. *Inspire people with your passion. *Make something better every day. *Treat each customer like your favorite family member. *Own your mistakes so you can learn from them. *Details are everything. *Communicate like a scientist. *Be truthful (even when it's hard). *Reflect ID.me's values in your actions. *Act like an owner.

ID.me Career Site & Culture Deck: https://www.id.me/careers",3.2,"Id.me
3.2","McLean, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
123,Data Analytics Manager,$32k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Curant Health is blazing a trail in medication care management and personalized healthcare and we are looking for a Data Analytics Manager to join us as we continue our amazing growth trajectory.
We are not only committed to improving the lives of patients we serve, but yours as well. Curant means CARE, and that is just what we do.
Our culture of caring is evident by being recognized as one of Inc.’s fastest growing healthcare companies, receiving the Georgia Fast 40 and Atlanta Business Chronicle Trendsetters awards every year since 2013. Our medication care management programs and processes are proven to improve outcomes while reducing overall healthcare costs for our patients.
The Data Analytics Manager role is in our Smyrna, GA Headquarters and will be responsible for working across the organization with all teams to ensure Curant Health (CH) leaders are empowered with optimal business intelligence information.

This role leads a team of Business Analysts and SQL Developers to facilitate internal and external business insights. Responsible for leading strategic design and maintenance of Business Intelligence applications. Identifies, researches, and resolves complex business analytics. Ensures that business intelligence systems and processes enhance business decision making, demonstrate outcomes, support efficiency projects, and enhance sales.
Build and lead a team of business analysts and data scientists to facilitate internal and external business insights.
Provide data analytics support to drive Sales, Finance, Operations, and Outcomes.
Acts as a leader to assist in providing independent review and evaluation of business information.
Identifying business problems and developing analytic techniques to provide solutions to internal and external teams.
Institute standard development methodologies to ensure that the team is using best practices for collaborative coding, modular efficiency, version control, QA and release management.
Draw on strong business and statistical knowledge to organize research or development projects, including identification of relevant data points, data extraction and transformation, data model building, and visualizations.
Lead the BI team to build the roles, skills, processes and collaboration with other teams necessary to improve solution delivery speed and improve end user satisfaction.
Expert guidance – Understand underlying business challenges and communicate accurate data insights that enable confident, effective decision making.
Manage BI request backlogs and report on development progress to stakeholders.
Develop an advanced understanding of industry trends, metrics, and KPI benchmarks.
Driving multiple technical and data-related projects of varying scopes and complexities.
Interfacing with other business units within CH, vendors, and executives to represent and drive our organization's strategy.
Using data visualization and other data-gathering methods to either provide internal strategic direction or guide decisions for other teams.
Leads report development for operations areas as assigned in order to increase efficiencies.
Prepare data strategies and provide business object solutions as per requirements.
Supervise efficient working of all Business Intelligence projects, analyze requirements and perform appropriate tests on same.
Administer BI projects, prepare updates and implement all phases for project to achieve project objectives.
Analyze all complex data and identify requirements for business enhancement in project.

Bachelor’s Degree, preferably in Business Analytics or similar.
Advanced degree in management, healthcare, mathematics, or other related field preferred.
5+ years related experience with progressive growth in responsibility and scope. With 2 years managing a BI team.
Leadership of a BI or software development team.
BI practices and concepts, data modeling, ETL processes, and data warehousing.
Advanced understanding of the full reporting delivery life cycle, from requirements definition to report development and testing required.
Comfortable working with sales, billing, and financial information.
Advanced data visualization tool knowledge (Power BI, Tableau, etc.).
Experience with SQL Server Reporting and SSIS (Power BI preferred).
Ability to interpret analytic results.
Advanced MS Excel knowledge.
Strong working knowledge of Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook).
Project management skills.
Demonstrated ability to turn end-user requirements into actionable tools and insights.
Why Work for Us?

We offer competitive pay, paid holidays, generous benefits, paid and volunteer time off and a work/life balance.
While our perks and benefits are generous, the people are what make Curant Health great. Curant Health employees have passion, are collaborative, and resilient. We are enthusiastic, productive, and problem solvers.
Our Core Values consist of ICARE; Integrity, Communication, Accountability, Relationships and Excellence, and we take pride in you embodying those traits. You will help write the next chapter in healthcare.
Curant Health is an equal opportunity employer. We promote a team atmosphere that provides excellent opportunity for growth as well as work life balance.",4.4,"Curant Health
4.4","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
124,Sr. Staff Data Analyst - Marketing Analytics Manager,$86k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart + $ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2500 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart + $ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

We are looking for a Senior Staff Analyst/Marketing Analytics Manager who will work closely with our internal and external business partners in developing data-driven solutions for the organization. In this role, you will be involved in analyzing campaign results, validating assumptions and provide recommendation for future campaigns and product offerings. You will also collaborate with team members in assessing and developing new analytic opportunities within the broader analytics organization

THE ROLE:

Conduct large scale analyses, with ownership through all stages: understand business goals and strategies, formulate the analytic approach, perform data extraction, exploration, and transformation, and translate results into actional items for the business team.
Leverage deep hands-on technical skills to produce analyses in various topics including, but not limited to, customer segmentation, campaign performance, marketing attribution and return on investment/ad spend.
Closely work with business partners on Direct Mail (DM) initiatives to ensure successful execution of campaigns.
Analyze DM campaign results to inform future targeting and optimization decisions
Iterate scoring model and perform model validation to be implemented on DM campaigns
Perform data operations necessary to execute campaigns
Develop methodologies to analyze, understand, and quantify trade-offs in marketing decision making
Interact with multiple functional teams across the organization to identify potential issues, implement solutions, improve throughput, and automate recurring processes.
Collaborate with Advanced Analytics, Data Science, and Data Engineering teams to implement predictive models into various stages of marketing funnels, particularly in adapting modern analytics techniques to offline marketing channels such as direct mail and linear television.

REQUIREMENTS/CHARACTERISTICS:

6+ years of hands-on analytic experience in the financial services industry
Hands-on experience in SQL, Python, R, Excel, and Tableau
Experience with data analytics and statistical modeling concepts such as multivariate regression, segmentation modeling, machine learning, data mining, simulation, optimization, and forecasting
Strong understanding on how the data should be captured, stored and structured in data warehousing environment
An effective cross functional communicator in both written and verbal skills
Ability and willingness to learn in a fast-paced environment and adapt to various situation
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Econometrics or equivalent

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.

Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted a Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday

This is your opportunity to be part of a growing company where dedicated professionals strive to help customers and each other succeed every day. If that sounds exciting, we want to talk to you. Apply today!

Attention Agencies & Search Firms: We do not accept unsolicited candidate resumes or profiles. Please do not reach out to anyone within Freedom Financial Network (FFN) to market your services or candidates. All inquiries should be directed to Talent Acquisition only. We reserve the right to hire any candidates sent unsolicited and will not pay any fees without a contract signed by FFN’s Talent Acquisition leader.",3.4,"Freedom Financial Network
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
125,HR Data Analyst II,$52k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you ready to use your critical thinking and love of data to scale new heights, creating platforms and integrating information that support large-scale, data-driven decision making at ENGIE North America?

The HR Data Analyst II supports the HR department by processing the organization's human resource information using cost-effective computer systems and applications. In this role, you will partner with HR, IT, Payroll and their customers to analyze work process design and flow, improve processes and leverage the return on existing and new systems. You will also provide support for HR information needs and design new or modify existing systems to meet changing requirements.

What you’ll do:
Analyze HR data and provide recommendations to leadership based on key performance indicators including turnover and engagement.
Maintain, develop, and administer HR dashboard to aid HR Business Partners and Leaders in decision making.
BU Leader for Group Social Reporting, ensuring BU’s report is timely and accurate. Coordinates with contacts for each entity not on the ADP Vantage platform. Manage the quarterly Group Social Reporting process for the North America BU tracking employee headcount, movement, and key performance indicators. Work with auditors during GSR Audit to ensure reporting meets Group’s requirements.
Support system maintenance including reviews, testing and implementation of HRIS system changes and enhancements in conjunction with the Applications Management Advisor.
Maintain HRMS system data and tables within ADP Vantage HCM ensuring the highest possible quality of data.
Maintain job, department, and functional reporting changes within the system.
Responsible for producing existing and custom reports including EEO-1, AAP, and other compliance related reports in support of Human Resources reporting requirements. Escalating complex issues to the Applications Management Advisor to bring issues to resolution.
Takes lead on mass data load/update projects such as mergers and acquisitions and employee data change load, which includes data bridges, analysis of data, ensuring templates complete, and communicating with various contacts to obtain necessary data.
Assist the Benefits staff with maintenance and creation of vendor electronic eligibility files.
Troubleshoot HRIS system related issues working with internal departments and third parties, recommends solutions in conjunction with ADP and implements at the direction of leadership.
Provisions access to ADP Vantage upon approval from leadership.

Qualifications

What you bring:
Bachelor’s Degree in Human Resources, Information Technology, Business or related discipline required
3-5 years’ experience in Human Resources Information Systems.
Professional in Human Resources (PHR), or SHRM Certified Professional (SHRM-C credential preferred.
Self-starter with excellent time and task management skills.
Team oriented individual willing to adapt to a fast paced and continuously improving organization.
Customer focused individual who leverages new and existing system capabilities to deliver on customer requirements.
Ability to communicate openly and effectively with internal and external customers managing expectations and timelines related to responsibilities.
Ability to develop and maintain relationships both within and outside of Human Resources.
Intermediate to expert level proficiency with HCM software; ADP Vantage HCM strongly preferred.
3-5 years’ experience building custom reports in ADP Vantage HCM or similar HCM.
Proficiency with Microsoft Office suite of products including Word, Excel, and PowerPoint.

Why ENGIE?

ENGIE North America isn’t just participating in the Zero-Carbon transition, we’re leading it! Join us as we develop energy that is more renewable, more efficient and more accessible to everyone.

Unite with us in leading the transformation of the world of energy! ENGIE is looking for talented and motivated individuals to create the future of energy and customer solutions. Join a rewarding and flexible work environment that encourages innovation and creativity to help customers meet their energy challenges today and in the future. Are you up for the challenge?

At ENGIE, our goal is to support, encourage, promote, and thrive on diversity, equity, and inclusion. We do so for the benefit of our employees, customers, products and services, and community. So ENGIE is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace, and is also an affirmative action employer. We are firmly committed to creating an equitable and inclusive environment for all employees.

We are committed to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at ENGIE are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications. ENGIE is committed to providing equal employment opportunity regardless of actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical conditions), gender identity or gender expression (including transgender status), sexual orientation, marital status, civil union, or domestic partnership status, military service or veteran status, physical or mental disability, protected medical condition, genetic information, or any other legally protected category (referred to as “protected characteristics”) as defined by applicable federal, state or local law in the locations where we operate.

If you need assistance with this application or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability, you may contact us at ENGIENA-ENGIEHR@engie.com . Please note: This email address is reserved for individuals with disabilities in need of assistance, and is not a means of inquiry regarding positions or application status.

Job
: Human resources
Primary Location
: North America-United States-Texas-Houston
Organization
: ENA Business Functions
Schedule
: Full-time
Nature of Responsibility
: Professional / First Line team leader

Job Posting
: Oct 10, 2020, 12:55:10 AM",3.7,"ENGIE North America Inc.
3.7","Houston, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1995,Company - Public,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
126,Data Scientist,-1,"About Triplebyte

Triplebyte is transforming the way software engineers are hired. Our mission is to build an open, valuable and skills-based credential for all engineers and data scientists. This is important because millions of people have skills (and deserve good jobs), but don't fit the profile that recruiters seek. We aim to cut out that noise by matching opportunities to people who have the skills to succeed in them - regardless of their background.

Companies like Apple, Dropbox and American Express trust Triplebyte's technical assessment to identify the best engineers for their open roles and reduce the time and effort it takes to hire them.

We raised a $35 million Series B and our team of 64 is growing! We're building out the leadership of our team to help us scale to the next phase.

Press Links:

You can read more about our company and hear from our founders in the press here:

Triplebyte raises $35M for its online coding test and credentialing service for hiring engineers

Triplebyte incubates ColorStack to increase Black and Latinx representation in CS programs

CNBC (Your Next Job Interview Could be with a Robot)

Building an Engineering Team - Harj Taggar and Ammon Bartram

Role Description

As a data scientist at Triplebyte, you'll have the opportunity to work on a variety of challenges to help us scale. You'll be part of a small team, who are leveraging data to fix technical hiring. Your day to day, will include a mix of dataset acquisition, statistical modeling, exploratory data analysis, and software engineering. You'll report directly to Triplebytes' Head of Machine Learning and will work alongside a team of 6-8 machine learning engineers and data scientists.Fields your work will touch on
Psychometrics
Recommender systems
Time series analysis
Survival analysis
Bayesian inference
Probabilistic programming
This is an ideal role for a data scientist who wants the scope and responsibility to own features/products from the inception and research phase through to measuring real-world results.

Compensation and Benefits

Competitive salary and stock options package

Open vacation policy

Employer paid health, vision and dental insurance

401(k) plan with matching

Pre-tax commuter benefits

Daily catered lunches

The Company is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit and business needs. The Company does not discriminate against employees or applicants (in any aspect of employment, including, but not limited to recruiting and hiring, job assignment, compensation, opportunities for advancement, promotion, transfers, evaluation, benefits, training, discipline, and termination), on the basis of any characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local laws.",3.2,"Triplebyte
3.2",California,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
127,Senior Scientist - Analytical Development,-1,"Job responsibility: *
· Develop and perform HPLC methods (including RP, SEC, IEX etc.) for biologics (protein therapeutics) process development and support purposes

· Develop and perform other common analytical methods such as electrophoresis, Western-Blot, ELISA, PCR, Endotoxin, host cell proteins, concentration, and cell-based assays

· Attend internal and external meetings as analytical lead to present analytical data and address questions

· Author SOPs, protocols and technical reports and ensure adherence to high technical standards and compliance with applicable regulatory guidelines

· Maintain accurate experimental records and results in laboratory notebook and/or datasheet

· Manage and mentor junior staff
Minimum Qualifications: *
· MS or PhD degree in Analytical Chemistry, Pharmaceutical Chemistry, or related discipline with strong hands-on experience with biologic/protein analytics in biopharmaceutical industry

· Minimum Experience: 8+ years (Masters) or 5+ years (PhD)

· Extensive knowledge on method development and qualification of HPLC and other analytical/characterization techniques for proteins (including monoclonal antibodies) is required

· Knowledge on AAV analysis and characterization a plus

· Ability to work in a fast pace environment, manage priorities, and maintain timelines for multiple projects is required

· Ability to work independently and in a team environment is required

· Staff management experience is preferred

· Basic knowledge of GMP is desirable

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
protein biologics industrial analytical: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Confidential (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.bostonbib.com
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Boston Institute of Biotechnology, LLC
4.0","Southborough, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Public,-1,-1,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
128,Sr. Data Scientist,$71k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Medifast is seeking a full-time Senior Data Scientist to join our team.
The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for anticipating future business needs, solving real-time business questions, and identifying new applications for complex analysis.
The candidate focus will be using Machine Learning for the following use cases at Medifast:
Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, Natural Language Processing, AB Testing, and Customer Segmentation (Unsupervised Learning).

Employ machine learning and statistical modeling to generate new features to feed into our data core. Key Models include: Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, and Customer Segmentation
Use storytelling to bring out the insights derived from machine learning and statistical modeling making the complex easy to follow and digestible
Perform automated market analyses to dynamically react to changing market conditions
Discover new predictive insights in our datasets and design measures that compute new predictive models while using data visualization methodology
Assist the Insights Center Manager in using Data Science to enhance the Insights Roadmap and assist in the selection of Data Science products to help enable and maintain the Data Science stack
Create measures that monitor inputs and performance on a real-time basis to inform the insights council when unexpected changes arise.
Be active in communications with business users and data management resources to collaborate through a project lifecycle as data changes occur
Aid and train end super users to effectively use the Data Science platform
Coordinate with offshore technical resources

PHD degree or equivalent preferred in Applied Statistics, Mathematics or a related data field
5-8 years related experience
Executing solutions to business problems using advanced statistics, testing methods, data analysis, data mining, predictive modeling, optimization, and machine learning techniques;
Design and run end-to-end experiments with statistical rigor for test and learn, apply appropriate sampling methods and probabilistic simulations to hypothesis testing and parameter estimation including bootstrapping
Perform data exploration and visualization (using Tableau and other visualization tools), apply machine learning and statistical inference to seed hypotheses, identify opportunities, define metrics, provide interpretability to multi-dimensional scoring, regressor and classifier models, and decision tree learning, using novel methods;
Employ statistical programming through, Python, R, Dataiku, and toolkits (Scikit-learn, Pandas, Numpy, Scipy, PySpark, Jupyter Notebook and kernel, Macro) across disparate environments including Linux/Unix command line and shell scripting, virtual and clouds
Execute and automate data preprocessing via relational systems (AWS, Redshift, SQL Server, MySQL, Postgre, and, Oracle), and parallel computing for big data, using analytics engine and cluster computing frameworks: Apache Spark and Hadoop MapReduce, Apache Tez, and Yarn.
#LI-JP1",3.0,"Medifast, Inc.
3.0","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1980,Company - Public,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
129,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Senior Data Scientist
Location/City: Any US location (offices in Atlanta, GA and Playa Vista, CA)

Responsibilities
We are looking for a sharp, highly-motivated Senior Data Scientist to join our team. This is a high-impact role that will leverage data & analytics to derive insights from our Members’ data and make recommendations to help improve their financial wellbeing. You will collaborate with product, and engineering as well as executive stakeholders to create analytical solutions to help achieve business goals. An ideal candidate is an individual who has a deep background in statistics, analysis, experiment design, and can bring those skills to bear in a start-up environment. A strong understanding and hands-on ability with data science technology and infrastructure is important as well.
As the Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Work with large volumes of bank transactions to create proprietary intelligence about the nature of employment and earnings for our Members
Help build out our job recommendation engine to aid our Members in finding new or additional work to increase their income
Help drive a data-first culture where data is understood and leveraged in decision making
Collaborate with the data science team and CDO to define the technical strategy for Steady’s data science ecosystem
Develop and codify processes and best practices for modeling, testing, and analytics
Effectively balance short term delivery with long term direction and value
Advocate for data science innovation and increased contribution to Steady’s mission

Skills & Requirements
Advanced degree and relevant experience (MS + 5 years, PhD + 3 years) in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or similar field
Demonstrated experience creating production ML pipelines (training, scoring, leveraging in real-time systems)
Expert knowledge of modern machine learning algorithms (regression, classification, random forests, clustering, optimization, etc.) and statistical inference
Experience with bank or credit card transaction data preferred
Experience with NLP and textual data analysis is a plus
Demonstrated experience of efficient manipulation and storage of large datasets
Hands on experience and expertise with SQL, Spark, Python (preferred) or R
Experience with machine learning platforms Sagemaker/Databricks a plus
Strong data visualization skills (experience with Tableau preferred)
Familiarity and experience with the AWS data ecosystem (S3, AWS Glue, EMR, etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to interact at all levels of the organization
Comfortable working with distributed teams across multiple offices and timezones
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial, high-energy environment


Benefits
We value our Steady Team Members and are committed to their success. We are located in downtown Atlanta near MARTA, as well as in Playa Vista CA. We offer competitive compensation packages and a 100% company-paid benefits package including medical, dental, and vision. Steady is a relaxed, casual work environment with flexible hours and lunch provided once weekly in addition to a weekly meal stipend. We also offer a generous PTO plan, 401K, and future growth opportunities within the company. We strive to maintain a positive and fun environment for our employees where people can learn and grow with the company.
About Steady
Steady is a mission-driven business that helps people earn more. Through the free Steady app users can build & track income, networks, and buying power – allowing them to augment retirement savings, work around childcare responsibilities, pay down debt, save for purchases, and supplement their income from primary employers, while limiting their income volatility and better positioning themselves for access to a sustainable financial services ecosystem.
Every Steady member will build something different. We celebrate those who take the initiative to create a path that works for them. Whatever that looks like, Steady is there to support it, providing a stable foundation that allows people to build financial success over a lifetime.

Mission: Steady turns the tables by putting workers back in charge of their financial future with an income-building platform that creates financial stability and helps its users to take charge of their future.

For more information, visit us at www.steadyapp.com or on Twitter @TheSteadyApp.

Steady, Platform Inc. (Steady) is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer – All qualified applicants/employees will receive consideration for employment without regard to that individual’s age, race, color, religion or creed, national origin or ancestry, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, physical or mental disability, veteran status, genetic information, ethnicity, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Statement to ALL Third-Party Agencies and Similar Organizations: Steady accepts resumes only from agencies with which we formally engage their services. Please do not forward resumes to our applicant tracking system, Steady employees, Steady hiring manager, or send to any Steady facility. Steady is not responsible for any fees or charges associated with unsolicited resumes.",4.0,"Steady
4.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
130,Senior Marketing Data Analyst,$55k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"As part of the Marketing Analytics & Reporting team at Plymouth Rock Assurance, this position will play a critical role in extending Plymouth Rock’s digital data analytics and reporting capabilities. The Senior Marketing Data Analyst is responsible for customer and prospect interaction analysis, attribution models for eSales program, digital campaign and mobile app program analysis. The analyst will be an expert resource on all digital marketing related data analysis and reporting. The role is also responsible for producing ad hoc analysis on a wide variety of insurance and marketing topics as necessary.
A key part of this role will be to expand the capabilities of bridging customer information from intricate internal and external data sources, including digital customer data (such as site interactions and digital engagement data from third parties, e.g. Google, Adobe, Facebook, etc.), and internal core customer data (policy datamart, quote datamart, claims datamart, etc.). As we continue to expand our digital capabilities, it is crucial to integrate our data analysis to better understand our customers.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Use SQL and SAS to mine large relational database to drive data-oriented insights, such as sales trends, loss trends, business mix, standard vs nonstandard policies, as well as provide customer behavior insights and overall insurance book trends.
Analyze website and mobile app data on traffic sources and patterns. Provide insight on data trends and anomalies, making recommendations where appropriate to improve business performance.
Create model-driven customer segmentations for current customers, prospect customers, and agency customers.
Design A/B digital marketing test models, analyze, and report outcomes of marketing tests.
Conduct analysis related to the quality of leads, quotes, and sales from different marketing programs, by integrating both internal data in multiple business data marts and external data from partners, and developing in depth analysis to evaluate the effectiveness of each initiative.
Develop sales and KPI forecast for a broad range of marketing campaigns and programs, report periodically on performance against the forecast.
Perform complex data analysis in support of ad-hoc and standing requests and demand for insights and be able to present results to non-technical audiences.
Coordinate with cross functional teams, Product, Claims, and IT Team, and build relationships with business users of the data to support their requirements through effective communication, data governance and documentation.
Develop and maintain digital marketing and ecommerce site performance reports by using SQL and Adobe Analytics.
Build a reliable attribution model using stochastic modeling approach, such as Markov Chain, to capture the effectiveness of digital campaigns in various channels.
Set up automation in the data flow with the Media vendors to expand capabilities to bridge digital customer data (site interactions, digital engagement, etc.) with core customer data.
Build and enhance existing reports, and develop new reporting products in Excel, Tableau, and Salesforce Service Cloud.
Conduct data profiling and data quality analytics.
Stay up-to-date with data-driven technologies to keep us ahead of the competition, including new innovations in tracking social media marketing efforts, sales attributions, and related AI applications.
Qualifications and Education
Excellent analytical, critical thinking and problem-solving skills.
Excellent technical skills: expert SQL, experience with a statistical processing language (R, Python), and experience with a data visualization / BI tool (Tableau).
Relevant data and analysis experience, and work experience in dealing with complex data environment.
Proficient at statistical modeling, especially regression model and logistic model.
Working knowledge of mainstream marketing analytics tool, including Omniture/Adobe Analytics, and Google Analytics.
Ability to communicate effectively at all levels (including executive team) and articulate ideas, analysis results, and recommendations.
Ability to prioritize work independently, ensuring accuracy while meeting rigid deadlines.
Bachelors/Master Degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Applied Mathematics or similar required
Minimum 3-5 years of relevant analytics experience, ideally in a tech savvy company
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
131,Data Scientist,$112k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Entefy’s Senior Data Scientist is a highly visible position both internally and externally. Join the intelligence revolution, where we can push the state-of-the-art boundaries of data science. This is where deep experience and multi-dimensional insights intersect with an amazing opportunity to shape the future of productivity for people everywhere.

Skills and Experience:

We’re not looking for “good.” Entefy is on a mission to find exceptional talent. The success of our mission depends on our team’s ability to be creatively analytical, insatiably curious, and absolutely fearless in tackling big challenges.
Requirements
Master's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, or a compatible field. PhD is preferred.
3+ years of applicable work experience.
Demonstrable proficiency in Python, Scala, SQL, or R.
Strong data visualization and reporting skills.
Proven track record delivering high-value, advanced analytics.
Experience leading the work of other data scientists or analysts is preferred.
World-class ability to extract and communicate insights from real-world datasets.
Startup agility and versatility.
Visit www.entefy.com and www.blog.entefy.com.",4.3,"Entefy
4.3","Palo Alto, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
132,Senior Data Scientist,$116k-$184k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Recursion, our mission is to decode biology to radically improve lives. To accomplish this bold goal, we have already generated one of the largest biological datasets in existence in our own labs— tens of billions of images of cells under millions of different biological and chemical perturbations.

With treatments for hundreds of diseases in our sights, Recursion has constructed a world-class team of specialists in biology, drug discovery, automation, engineering, management, and data science that work side by side. Our data science team is no less diverse. We bring together domain expertise in computer science, physics, biology, mathematics, applied statistics, and more. Together, we analyze experimental results, develop best-practice analytical methods for a field that has none, and build the computational tooling required to fuel Recursion's drug-discovery engine.

HOW YOU'LL CONTRIBUTE:

You will help us accomplish all of this by applying your domain expertise, technical experience, and years working on a data science team to deliver scalable solutions that immediately impact decisions— in whatever area that expertise may be:
Biologists just generated a novel dataset and need help developing a new analytical approach.
Our Chemistry team needs a new tool to register and recommend molecules with specific properties from an X-million compound registry.
Our analysis toolkit needs to level-up to support the growing needs of the company.
A production ML model is underperforming on new data, and needs both a redesign and additional experimental data to support the desired objectives.
You will identify and then own projects that suit your expertise— meaning conception, planning, development, implementation, and delivery— with the support of whatever other data science and cross-team expertise is required.

THE EXPERIENCE YOU'LL NEED:
Minimum of 4 years in industry setting on a data science team
Experience working with production repositories and developing deployable data-science products.
High fluency with the Python data stack (pandas, sklearn, etc).
Professional experience in project leadership and team mentorship
Curiosity and the professional skill-set to excel in an open, highly collaborative environment.
A track record of outstanding past projects, publications, or presentations.
NICE TO HAVE:
Experience developing computational analysis for imaging-based biological datasets or bioinformatics for sequencing-based datasets.
Code you can share. Send a link along with your email.
THE BENEFITS/PERKS YOU'LL ENJOY
100% Coverage of health, vision, and dental insurance premiums
401(k) with generous matching (immediate vesting)
Stock option grants
Two one-week paid company closures (summer and winter)
Flexible vacation/sick leave
Onsite daycare facility*
Commuter benefit and vehicle parking to ease your commute*
Complimentary chef-prepared lunches and well-stocked snack bars*
Generous paid parental leave (including adoptive)
Fully-paid gym membership to Metro Fitness, located just feet away from our headquarters*
One-of-a-kind 100,000 square foot headquarters complete with a 70-foot climbing wall, showers, lockers, and bike parking*
*Subject to change during the COVID-19 pandemic

More About Us

Recursion is a digital biology company industrializing drug discovery. Recursion does this by combining automation, artificial intelligence, machine learning, in vivo validation capabilities and a highly cross-functional team to discover novel medicines that expand our collective understanding of biology. Recursion's rich, relatable database of over 4 petabytes of biological images generated in-house on the company's robotics platform enables advanced machine learning approaches to reveal drug candidates, mechanisms of action, novel chemistry, and potential toxicity, with the eventual goal of decoding biology and advancing new therapeutics that radically improve people's lives. Recursion is proudly headquartered in Salt Lake City.

Check out what it is like to work at Recursion here

Recursion is an equal opportunity employer and complies with all applicable federal, state, and local fair employment practices laws. Recursion strictly prohibits and does not tolerate discrimination against applicants because of race, color, religion, creed, national origin or ancestry, ethnicity, sex, pregnancy, gender (including gender nonconformity and status as a transgender individual), age, physical or mental disability, citizenship, past, current, or prospective service in the uniformed services, or any other characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local law.",4.6,"Recursion Pharmaceuticals
4.6","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
133,Research Scientist - Autonomous Systems,-1,"Job Description:

Our Unmanned Systems group is looking to add a talented Research Scientist with a background in autonomous systems, artificial intelligence, scientific computation, and/or mathematical modeling. The successful candidate will be passionate about designing, developing and applying cutting-edge technologies for prototype autonomous systems.

In this position, you will see your ideas control autonomous vehicles in the most challenging environments. The successful candidate will be part of a team that designs and implements software and hardware solutions addressing critical challenges to develop some of the most autonomous systems on or off the planet. You will integrate into, and lead, dynamic and highly-motivated project teams, and use new ideas from across multiple fields to push the boundaries of the possible for intelligent systems.

Required Qualifications:

Ph.D. in computer science, mathematics, physics, or applicable engineering field, or equivalent training and experience; would consider a BS degree with 5+ years relevant industry experience OR an MS degree with 3+ years relevant industry experience in;

autonomy and autonomous decision making
automated planning
optimization
scientific computing
mathematical modeling
programming experience in C++ and/or Java

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience in R&D environments and with rapid software prototyping
Ability to improvise and think “outside the box” to develop technical solutions
Excellent communication skills, both written and oral
A track record of publications and/or successful proposal writing is strongly desired
Experience with Federal S&T and R&D sponsors (DARPA, IARPA, ONR, NASA) and contract vehicles (BAAs, SBIRs) is a plus
US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED, active DoD clearance a plus

Position Location: Reston, VA

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or protected veteran status. Metron takes affirmative action in support of its policy to employ and advance in employment individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

VEVRAA Federal Contractor",3.0,"Metron, Inc.
3.0","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
134,"Scientist, Cell Culture Development",-1,"Visterra is a clinical stage biotechnology company committed to developing innovative antibody-based therapies for the treatment of patients with kidney diseases and other hard-to-treat diseases. Our proprietary technology platform enables the design and engineering of precision antibody-based product candidates that specifically bind to, and modulate, key disease targets. Applying this technology to disease targets that are not adequately addressed by traditional therapeutic approaches, we are developing a robust pipeline of novel therapies for patients with unmet needs.

Visterra is a wholly owned subsidiary of Otsuka America, Inc., which is a U.S. holding company and a wholly owned subsidiary of Otsuka Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd. of Japan. Visterra has approximately 75 employees and is in Waltham, Massachusetts.
Summary*
The Cell Culture Development Scientist will be responsible for planning cell culture process development and manufacturing activities as well as participating in cell line development. Tasks include supporting in-house and contracted cell line development, developing scale-down models, providing technical guidance for contract process development activities, overseeing technology transfer to manufacturing sites, and serving as person in plant during GMP operations. The Scientist will work closely with internal partners in Quality Assurance, Analytical and Quality Control and Regulatory as well as with external partners at Contract Manufacturing sites.

This is a full-time position located at Visterra’s offices in Waltham, MA.
Responsibilities*
Act as principle technical advisor for cell culture development and manufacturing activities at our contract development organizations.
Conduct in-house bioreactor operations and pre-culture activities for small scale development of cell culture processes for Visterra’s antibody products.
Perform activities and small-scale cell culture experiments to optimize media/feed composition and feeding strategies.
Independently operate laboratory scale bioreactors and other cell culture equipment required for development studies.
Monitor and sample cell culture processes daily; including testing for attributes such as cell viability and density, metabolites, pH, and more.
Participate in and lead cell culture technology transfer activities such as authoring and reviewing process descriptions, reviewing master batch records and process data, and providing on the floor support during GMP manufacturing.
Take responsibility as the lead scientist for cell line development activities at CDMO.
Develop in-house cell line.
Present work at department and cross functional meetings and contribute as a process lead in drug development team meetings.
Troubleshoot and maintain laboratory equipment.
Document experimental results in lab notebooks, tech transfer documents, and technical reports and present data at meetings.
Keeping current with new technologies to improve process development capabilities.
Requirements*
B.S./M.S. in Pharmaceutical Sciences, Chemical, Mechanical or Biochemical Engineering (or related discipline) with 5-8 years of relevant industry experience or Ph.D. with 2-3 years of relevant industry experience.
Hands-on experience with aseptic techniques for small scale bioreactor experiments.
Experience in maintaining and troubleshooting cell culture operations from vial thaw to bioreactor harvest.
A strong understanding of cell culture parameters in general (cell growth rate, cell density, viability, population doubling, metabolites and cell waste, etc.).
Knowledge and experience scaling up processes from bench to commercial manufacturing and supporting technology transfers to CMO.
Experience with executing or supporting GMP manufacturing operations.
The ability to think critically and communicate effectively across broad spectrum of audience both internal and external.
An ability to work independently, meet deadlines and prioritize work effectively.
An understanding of cell line development.
The ability to travel to conferences and global manufacturing sites up to 10-20% of the time.
_Visterra provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws._

Job Type: Full-time

Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Parental leave
Relocation assistance
Professional development assistance
Other
Company's website:
http://www.visterrainc.com/",4.6,"Visterra, Inc.
4.6","Waltham, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
135,Machine Learning Scientists/Engineers,-1,"Machine Learning Scientists/Engineers
Company Name *NovoDynamics, Inc. *

Company Location: Ann Arbor, Michigan

Fast-growing AI company is seeking highly-qualified scientists and engineers with experience in ML
(Machine Learning), DL (Deep Learning) and Computer Vision to address real-world challenges in the
Health Care industry. If you have a successful track record in software development, knowledge of current software technologies and methodologies, and excellent communication and interpersonal skills, we want to talk with you. Experience with image processing technologies is a plus.

Desired skills:

• Experience with data noise removal, data augmentation, dataset truthing and construction
• Expertise in visualizing and manipulating large datasets
• Familiarity with Java and Python a plus
• Proficiency with a deep learning library such as Keras or deeplearning4j a plus

Responsibilities may include:

• Understanding business objectives and developing models that help to achieve them, along with metrics to track progress

• Analyzing DL algorithms that could be used to solve a given problem and ranking them by their success probability

• Exploring and visualizing data to gain an understanding of it, then identifying differences in data distribution that could affect performance when deploying the model in the real world

• Verifying data quality and/or ensuring it via data cleaning
• Defining validation strategies
• Training models and tuning hyperparameters
• Analyzing errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them

Why work for NovoDynamics?

• Be part of a dynamic team that designs disruptive technologies for the Health Care industry
• Receive great compensation and benefits
• Work in downtown Ann Arbor near the University of Michigan campus
• Enjoy free parking, popcorn, coffee, tea and soft drinks
• Delight in an amazing work environment with interesting and engaged teammates
• Relax with generous and flexible time off
Seniority Level *
Mid-Senior level
Employment Type *
Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $170,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Location:
Ann Arbor, MI 48104 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
Company's website:
https://www.novodynamics.com and https://www.novohealthdental.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/70143/admin/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"NovoDynamics, Inc.
4.0","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
136,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Formation provides personalization for the largest enterprise businesses in the world. We work with high-volume data streams and apply Data Science to bring individualized multi-step promotions to customers. Our Data Science Team is transforming the relationships between Fortune 500 companies and their customers.

You'll work in small teams with a common goal: create excellent data science solutions anchored in a culture of quality, customer focus, and growth.

As a Senior Data Scientist at Formation you will work in an agile environment to prioritize and test hypotheses using principles of rigorous experimental design. You understand that Data Science is an expansive area and no line of code is written until you have clearly defined the problem, methods, and definition of done. Your guidance on causal inference, machine learning techniques, and work prioritization will be sought by other team members. You will contribute to process documentation, and methodology design and review. You will create platform architecture specifications as you work with Engineering and Product Management to integrate Data Science processes into the product platform.

You understand that bugs, inadequate processes, and less than ideal code are part of building a startup. You welcome the challenge of solving these kind of problems while building a great product with the Data Science team.

You will report to the Manager of Data Science.

Key Responsibilities:
Work with Solution Architects and Customer Success to determine how to best apply Formation's product to client use cases
Explore and understand unfamiliar data-sets with tools such as Apache Spark and AWS Athena
Determine metrics and conduct power analysis to determine the feasibility and design of experiments
Implement processing pipelines to clean and process source data
Present experimental methodology and results to Fortune 500 clients
Work with Engineering and Product to standardize and integrate DS workflows into Formation's product
Provide mentorship and prioritization of DS work to junior Data Scientists
Skills and Experience:
Minimum 5 years experience as a Data Scientist, or 3 years experience as a Data Scientist at a startup
Proficient with the Python scientific ecosystem, Apache Spark, and SQL
Have foundational software engineering skills such as bash scripting, version control, and continuous integration
Have worked with job schedulers such as Apache Airflow
Knowledge of experimental design and analysis of results
Understand common concepts related to e-commerce, e.g. lifetime value, net incremental revenue, and churn
Machine learning proficiency with a focus on recommender systems and supervised learning techniques
Experience with optimization techniques such as constrained linear optimization and contextual bandits
Experience in customer onboarding and long-term customer engagement
Experience participating in talent screening and interviewing
About Formation:

Formation distills complex customer data into uniquely tailored experiences; we orchestrate physical and digital exchanges into one seamless journey. Our business is building lasting, trusted relationships between people and brands—and making it look easy.

We're already reaching millions of people a day, and we're just getting started. Our founding leadership is equal parts business, design, and engineering—because we believe differing perspectives + passionate discourse achieve the greatest outcomes. We give our whole selves. We love learning new things.

Formation is committed to inclusion and diversity and is an equal opportunity employer. You will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

If you're up for the challenge of a lifetime, we're looking for outstanding talent to join our team.

Benefits:

Among our many benefits:
100% medical, dental, and vision
Discretionary PTO policy in addition to 11 paid holidays per year
401K
Commuter Benefits",2.9,"Formation
2.9",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
137,Senior Data Analytics Lead,$57k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"About CXD Analytics

We are a dynamic team and this is not a “Business as Usual” type of analytics role. Everything we do is to evolve and enhance our client’s digital experiences. In this capacity you will play a key role and lead analytics and insights engagements which support business efforts that deepen the understanding of Vanguard investors in our Client Experience - Digital (CXD) department.

Our Group: The CXD team at Vanguard has recently been established to improve Vanguard client’s end-to-end experiences when performing specific tasks, such as opening an account or placing a brokerage trade. Our goal is to transform the way our clients experience Vanguard using data, analytics and insights that support strategic decision-making and drive digital solutions.

How We Work: CXD hosts a team of highly talented, cross-disciplinary individuals including advanced data analysts, UX strategists and designers, front-end developers, data scientists, data engineers, scrum masters, and market researchers who work together in highly collaborative agile “labs”. We follow the “Stacked Agile” model made famous by Spotify. Each lab is fully dedicated to one part of a specific client journey and each analyst is fully dedicated to their lab.

Core Responsibilities
Engages with internal partners to understand business strategy, questions and goals. Brings structure to business requests, translates requirements into an analytical project approach, and leads projects through completion. Delegates tasks and provides tactical and strategic guidance to peers.
Be a thought leader for the Mobile analytics at Vanguard and be the catalyst for change
Lead tag-based data collection, build client-side integrations, and implement third party acquisition tracking into the mobile app's tag management system
Acquires and compiles structured and unstructured data and verifies its quality, accuracy and reasonableness.
Understand and collaborate on end-to-end user experience of online channels (web, mobile web, native app and kiosk UI)
Drive implementation of mobile strategies and user adoption of Vanguards evolving and cutting edge mobile app
Explain higher level statistical methods, test results and experimental design to a diverse audience with varying degrees of analytical capabilities
Drive and execute optimization strategies, work with marketing, product, design and engineering
Work with UX design to understand impact of page flow changes and calculate ROI’s
Develop personalization and segmentation strategies to target the right customers with the most relevant offers
Performs analyses of historical data to surface trends and insights using advanced analytical methods
Prepares and delivers visualizations and internal presentations that translate analytic insights into tangible, actionable solutions for business partners to implement.
Mentors, coaches, trains, and develops junior analysts. Proactively expands knowledge of business and analytics and shares with team members. Develops and documents best practices.
Qualifications
Graduate degree in an analytic/quantitative field
A minimum of 5+ years of relevant professional experience in a data analysis role.
Strong experience querying data with SQL and programming with Python or R
Experience with mobile digital analytics and channels preferred
Solid understanding and experience of statistical methods with regards to study design and analysis
Experience leading, designing and implementing marketing or digital experimentation (A/B or MVT) to improve marketing performance or improve the client experience
Understanding and working knowledge of quasi-experimental study design
Leverage NLP and text mining packages to better understand client feedback
About Vanguard

We are Vanguard. Together, we’re changing the way the world invests.

For us, investing doesn’t just end in value. It starts with values. Because when you invest with courage, when you invest with clarity, and when you invest with care, you can get so much more in return. We invest with purpose – and that’s how we’ve become a global market leader. Here, we grow by doing the right thing for the people we serve. And so can you.

We want to make success accessible to everyone. This is our opportunity. Let’s make it count.

Inclusion Statement

Vanguard’s continued commitment to diversity and inclusion is firmly rooted in our culture. Every decision we make to best serve our clients, crew (internally employees are referred to as crew), and communities is guided by one simple statement: “Do the right thing.”

We believe that a critical aspect of doing the right thing requires building diverse, inclusive, and highly effective teams of individuals who are as unique as the clients they serve. We empower our crew to contribute their distinct strengths to achieving Vanguard’s core purpose through our values.

When all crew members feel valued and included, our ability to collaborate and innovate is amplified, and we are united in delivering on Vanguard's core purpose.

Our core purpose: To take a stand for all investors, to treat them fairly, and to give them the best chance for investment success.",3.3,"Vanguard
3.3","Malvern, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1975,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
138,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Opportunity overview

Cohere Health is simplifying healthcare for patients, their doctors, and all those who are important in a patient's healthcare experience. Our focus is to enable an efficient, transparent patient journey where patient goals are central to decision-making.

We are a mission-driven and fast-growing company obsessed with eliminating the wasteful friction patients and doctors experience, particularly for diagnoses that require expensive procedures or medications. To that end, we build products and services that ensure the appropriate plan of care is understood and expeditiously approved, so that patients and doctors can focus on health, rather than payment or administrative hassles.

In this role, you'll join our growing team of world-class engineers, statisticians, and clinical experts to deploy machine learning algorithms that help automate burdensome administrative clinical practices. You will be tasked with finding the most promising opportunities for impact and then delivering on them.

What you will do:
Find the signal in incoherent clinical data
Build reliable and scalable production machine learning systems
Work on feature engineering, statistical analysis, developing novel ML techniques, understanding classifier performance, and ensuring fit-for-purpose.
Work cross-functionally across diverse stakeholders, including product managers, statisticians, EHR data specialists and physicians.
What you will have:
You have at 3 years experience in applied ML in the industry with a degree or higher (MS/PhD) in computer science, machine learning, mathematics or similar field
Clear understanding of model building, model maintenance and the measures that optimize models for product use
Understand experimental design and can independently perform collection, measurement, and interpretation of results
Expert in R, SQL,Python or other common analytical data tools
Expert in linear regression and classification approaches
Bonus points if:


Have experience with healthcare data such as claims and EMR data
Have hands on experience building NLP models using Spacy from clinical narratives
Experience with TensorFlow is also a plus.
We can't wait to learn more about you and meet you at Cohere Health!",5.0,"Cohere Health
5.0","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
139,"Principal Scientist, Gene Therapy 2",-1,"We are seeking a motivated scientist who will be supporting research and development activities of Ocugen’ s gene therapy programs. This role involves leading the discovery and preclinical activities related our pipelines for ocular degenerative diseases. The Principal Scientist will be responsible for leading the laboratory research, making decisions within his area of expertise and proactively work with colleagues for timely execution of the team’s deliverables. The ideal candidate will have advanced expertise in at least 2 areas: adeno-associated virus biology, molecular biology, animal models in ocular degenerative diseases, or biochemistry.
What You Will Be Primarily Responsible For: *
Your responsibilities will include, but not be limited to:
Lead laboratory research related to vector design, development, and characterizations for gene therapy products
Support pre-clinical AAV studies related to ocular degenerative diseases
Work with external collaborators and Contract Research Organizations for timely execution of projects
Identifying and quickly resolving workflow issues
Maintaining familiarity with current scientific literature and techniques in the field of AAV based gene therapy
Write technical reports and present data/results to the project teams
Collaborating with colleagues within Research and Development group
What You Need to Apply: *
PhD in molecular biology, cell biology, biochemistry, genetics, or a related field
Minimum 3 years of industry experience or 5 years of postdoctoral experience in relevant field
Scientific training and hands-on experience with AAV, such as vector design, potency assay, and characterizations
Strong leadership and communication skills
Evidence of scientific accomplishments in the form of publications and presentations
Evidence of contribution to the field of gene therapy
Ability to work independently and effectively as a team member within multidisciplinary project teams
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $105,000.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
industry: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",1.7,"Ocugen, Inc.
1.7","Malvern, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
140,Data Analyst,$42k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sapphire Digital seeks a dynamic and driven mid-level Data Analyst/QA to join our growing New Jersey team with experience in the healthcare domain. This role will perform in-depth analysis of our internal data management systems to identify, analyze, and interpret trends and/or patterns in order to provide actionable recommendations for data integrity. The Data Analyst/QA will work closely with multiple internal teams to collaborate on different stages of the data lifecycle and assist in developing data quality processes.
In this position, you'll be responsible for:
Preparing and conducting analyses and studies, needs assessment, and requirements analysis to align systems and solutions
Overseing data QA functions to ensure data integrity and accuracy
Monitoring all production data processes and validation systems
Performing data investigations, root cause analysis, data profiling, and data lineage activities
Performing research and provides recommendations for data processes and updates
Reviewing and analyzes specific data elements for accuracy and quality assurance
Driving the resolution of the identified data quality problems
Maintaining documentation as required
Partnering with BI in the development of reports and presentations
Maintaining data quality rules, data standards and data governance policies
Supporting special project work as assigned by the data managers
Collaborating effectively with cross functional teams including Data, Business Intelligence, Business Applications, and Engineering

You might be a good fit if you have:
Bachelor's degree (B. A. / B. S.) from four-year college or university; 4+ years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience
5+ years of experience as a data analyst or in a related field
Expertise with query languages (SQL) required
Experience working with large complex datasets including healthcare data such as medical claims, clinical information, demographic data and program activity results
Exposure with one or more of the following programming languages: SAS, Python, R
Prior experience working with Healthcare data, or in the Healthcare field preferred
Experience with data visualization tools and methodologies (Excel and PowerBI)
Demonstrated experience in analyzing large data sets and relational databases
Ability to manage time and priorities of multiple projects/tasks
Displays professionalism and ability to learn quickly
Extremely detail oriented
Strong oral and written communication skills
Ability to collaborate closely with multiple teams across with a wide range of technical backgrounds",3.4,"Sapphire Digital
3.4","Lyndhurst, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
141,"Principal Scientist, Medicinal Chemistry",$59k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"One Global Discovery Chemistry community, working across seven disease areas at the Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research (NIBR), is seeking a highly talented and motivated medicinal chemist to join our Global Discovery Chemistry Department in Cambridge, MA.

Here, we value your ideas, personal growth, and career aspirations; you will be surrounded by and learn from curious colleagues across multiple disciplines; you will have opportunities to explore the power of cutting-edge science and technology; you will be empowered to take smart risks and to use your creativity and resourcefulness to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

We are looking for individuals with cross-disciplinary knowledge and scientific leadership skills. Successful candidates are:

(1)Insightful, collaborative, and decisive project contributors (2) champions of innovative drug discovery, (3) creative and curious lab-based scientists, and (4) dynamic individuals with high learning agility.

Your responsibilities:

• Contribute at all stages of a project, from inception, early project validation, optimization, candidate selection, and through to early development.
• Working closely with other experts, you will identify key drug discovery issues, propose and implement creative solutions, execute on innovative medicinal chemistry designs, and guide teams to success and decision points.
• Propose and explore new research directions, projects, and/or new technologies.
• Act as a source of drug discovery expertise, demonstrate impact beyond your project team and mentor colleagues.
• Work closely with computational chemistry colleagues and apply modern digital and data technologies to drug discovery.

What you will bring to the role:

• 3-8 years of drug discovery experience and typically a PhD in a relevant chemical science
• A track-record of contributions to innovative drug discovery projects, exemplified by a record of patent inventorship, conference presentations and peer-reviewed publications
• Strong laboratory presence, and experience mentoring scientists
• Aptitude for modern digital and data technologies
• Outstanding communication skills

Why consider Novartis?

799 million. That’s how many lives our products touched in 2019. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

Imagine what you could do at Novartis!

Commitment to Diversity & Inclusion:

Novartis embraces diversity, equal opportunity and inclusion. We are committed to building diverse teams, representative of the patients and communities we serve, and we strive to create an inclusive workplace that cultivates bold innovation through collaboration, and empowers our people to unleash their full potential.
We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.

The Novartis Group of Companies are Equal Opportunity Employers and take pride in maintaining a diverse environment. We do not discriminate in recruitment, hiring, training, promotion or any other employment practices for reasons of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, marital or veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status.",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
142,Sr Data Engineer,$71k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Group O is seeking a strong candidate in the job of Senior Data Engineer for a Group O partner in San Antonio, TX. In this role, you will be a valuable expert in data coding and ETL and will lead the development of data models, structures, and data wrangling.

Responsibilities
Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, pre-processing using Hive and Pig
Scope and deliver various Big Data solutions
Design solutions based on high-level architecture
Manage technical communications between clients (technical and non-technical) and internal teams
Building a cloud-based platform that allows easy development of new applications
Collaborate with developers, subject matter experts, and business users in gathering and documenting requirements for data extraction and transformation
Perform code reviews, analyze execution plans, improve ETL jobs efficiencies, correct ETL defects and respond quickly to fixes and enhancement requests
Follow design standards for ETL and ELT processes
Analyze, assess and implement changes to existing solutions in response to business changes
Perform data research and analysis to find insights
Analyze data models to identify variances and discrepancies
Design, update, and maintain data sets
Work with geographically distributed team structure in a fast paced and challenging environment; multi-task and work under pressure
Communicate results with internal and external stakeholders

Qualifications:
An ideal candidate will have experience leading data quality assessment, will be a strong problem-solver and will have excellent interpersonal and communications skills.
Over 5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc.
Strong background with ETL Design and coding for Data loading, Data cleansing, Data Validation
Proficiency in SQL, SAS, R and Python – with preference to SQL
Previous experience designing custom deliverables based on user requirements
Excellent written and verbal communication skills – must be able to communicate fluently in English both verbally and in writing
Strong analytical and statistical analysis skills to extract insights and recommendations
Strong problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners
Insurance domain experience is preferred",3.1,"Group O
3.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
143,R&D Food Scientist,-1,"Golding Farms Foods is a specialty sauce and condiment manufacturer with facilities in Winston Salem NC and St. Louis MO. Golding Farms produces private label, branded and co-packed products for an array of national and international customers. The company is aggressively growing its product portfolio and its customer base and requires a Food Scientist to contribute to the team. This position is well suited for you if you enjoy (i) being a part of a small organization where you can have a meaningful impact on business results; (ii) working closely with colleagues from all functional areas of the business (e.g. sales, finance, manufacturing, logistics, warehouse and customer service) and (iii) a team-oriented culture where colleagues work collaboratively to solve problems and deliver corporate objectives. This role also offers the opportunity for personal growth, as employees receive cross-training and experience in multiple areas of the business to provide redundancy; in addition, the role will provide the candidate with direct exposure to senior management, both at the site and corporate level.
Summary: *The Food Scientist is responsible for supporting the growth of new and existing products in the marketplace.
Primary Tasks/Responsibilities: *
Partner with Marketing and Sales to identify and develop new product platforms and improvements which delight customers and support business strategies.
Source raw ingredients and specifications that meet company standards.
Develop formula and processing specifications and costing for new product prototypes.
Determine special processes in order to ensure safe products.
Develop tests to make sure products meet quality standards and legal requirements.
Support new product launch to plant startup until quality standards are established.
Provide sales samples of new products as requested by Sales and Marketing.
Set up sensory panels to evaluate new products or existing products.
Conduct shelf-life tests on new products.
Generate nutritional data, assuring compliance with regulatory nutritional and label compliance.
Identify and implement cost reduction opportunities through reformulation.
Comply with all company work and safety rules and regulatory compliance rules and regulations.
Maintain a clean, sanitary, and safe work area.
Follow all Good Manufacturing Practices and Standard Operating Procedures.
Adhere to all safety and security policies and procedures.
Follow all food safety and quality system requirements by committing to meet all pertinent regulatory, customer and Safe Quality Foods (SQF) requirements.
Qualifications: *
Bachelors degree in food science or other relevant field required.
2-5 years of experience in R&D, regulatory, or quality role in food industry required.
Other Skills and relevant considerations: *
Project Management experience beneficial, creativity is critical.
Strong attention to detail.
Exceptional sensory capability.
Must be able to frequently stand, walk, kneel, reach, climb, pull, and bend with full range of body motion.
Must be able to work independently and/or on a team in a fast-paced environment.
Must be able to work in a wet and/or humid environment. Occasional exposure to fumes or airborne particles; toxic or caustic chemicals will occur. Exposure to nut allergens.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $20.00 - $24.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.goldingfarms.com
Work Remotely:
No",1.5,"Golding Farms Foods
1.5","Winston-Salem, NC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1972,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
144,Data Engineer with Top Secret,$90k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Opportunity: Our team is seeking a talented Top Secret cleared Data Engineer to work in our NW Washington DC location.

This role supports DHS’s Office of Intelligence and Analysis (I&A). I&A is responsible for developing DHS-wide intelligence through managing the collection, analysis and fusion of intelligence throughout the entire Department. I&A disseminates intelligence throughout DHS, to the other members of the United States Intelligence Community, and to first responders at the state, local, and tribal level.
What You'll Get To Do as a Data Engineer: *
Create and maintain data pipelines and transformation flows in a cloud environment
Data management/mapping among multiple distinct data sources
Cloud management and server administration of domain services
Big Data infrastructure services and cross domain data transfer
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Active Top Secret clearance with SCI Eligibility
BS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline from an accredited college or university and ten (10) to fourteen (14) years of progressive experience, or an MS degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline, and eight (8) to twelve (12) years of progressive experience, or a Ph.D. degree in a related scientific or engineering discipline and four (4) to seven (7) years of progressive experience.
Familiar with ETL technologies, MapReduce, JSON/XML transformations and schemas
Familiar with AngularJS
Familiar with Apache NiFi and Java (NAR) NiFi Archives
Knowledge of Amazon Web Services (AWS Cloud)
Programming languages – Java/JEE, Javascript, Python, Groovy, Shell Script
HTTP via REST and SOAP
Datastores – HDFS, MongoDB, S3, Elastic, NoSQL, RDBMS
Build and Configuration Management Tools – Maven, Ansible, Puppet
Working knowledge with public keys and digital certificates
Linux/Unix server environments
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have: *
Master’s level education
Familiarity with: jQuery, XPath, XQuery, Spark, Impala, Sqoop, Hive/Pig, Python, Gradle, Maven, PL/SQL, Unix Shell, C++/C, AngularJS, Spring, JSON, XML/XSLT/HTML, JPA/Hibernate, Spark, Accumulo, MapReduce, Storm/Kafka, HSpace, Pig, Servlet/JSP, LDAP
About OneGlobe: *
OneGlobe LLC was founded in 2005 to provide quality Information Technology solutions that exceed expectations. We focus on IT System Modernization using agile software development practices and DevSecOps to deliver intuitive and maintainable systems that we help our customers improve their processes and capabilities.

We provide full service IT solutions and have the skill to identify, plan and perform cost-saving steps throughout the system lifecycle to enhance system efficiency, while optimizing the value that we deliver to our customers. Our team has the drive and right mindset to feel ownership on the projects they work. They partner with our customers to give the extra effort sometimes required to deliver success.

We provide highly competitive benefits package to include: extensive medical/dental/vision, 7% of your annual salary toward 401(k), Paid Time Off (PTO), $5K annually toward ongoing education and training, and more. We also have monthly social and tech events!

See additional positions at: http://www.oneglobeit.com/#careers

OneGlobe is a proud equal opportunity employer. We are a drug free, EEO employer committed to a diverse workforce. We will consider all qualified candidates regardless of race, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity, family responsibilities, disability, political affiliation or veteran status.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
NiFi: 5 years (Preferred)
Java: 5 years (Preferred)
Hadoop: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
ETL: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"OneGlobe LLC
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
145,Software Engineer - Data Science,$60k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels with Data Science experience. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for assisting in solving real world problems using data science techniques. The candidate should be experienced with exploratory data analysis, machine learning, network graph modeling, information insight, data mining, data driven analytics and statistical methods.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop and deploy software solutions
Self-motivated and have a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Working directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver data-driven analytical solutions that solve client problems
Creating and deploying predictive models from a wide variety of data sources and types using the latest mathematical and statistical methods
Performing enterprise level software development, integration, and implementation using advanced data science or big data technologies
Establishing and implementing end-to-end proof of concepts
Performing data mining, statistical analysis, predictive modeling and simulation, and forecasting for the development of solutions
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams using documentation, presentations, and demonstrations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design and development of data science software applications
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Experience with Exploratory Data Analysis including wrangling, grooming, transformation, and analysis
Experience applying statistical methods to solve data problems
Software development programming experience in languages such as Python, R, Java, Scala
Experience using IDE tools such as Jupyter to develop and demonstrate results
Experience with integrating and using Data Science libraries such as scikit-learn, MlLib, Pandas, python (Jupyter, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.), R, Java
Experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Experience with Agile development and Agile tools (i.e. Jira, Confluence)
Experience within the SIGINT mission environment and an understanding of customer data formats
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Experience using large-scale distributed frameworks such as Hadoop, Spark, Tensorflow
Experience with GPU-based machine learning techniques


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"ClearEdge
4.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
146,Data Scientist,$88k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"POSITION SUMMARY:

The Data Scientist is a highly motivated and experienced individual who likes to work in a multi-disciplinary team. The Data Scientist will be instrumental in the analysis and interpretation of high-throughput molecular data. Additionally, the individual in this role should have solid Data Science background and be strongly goal-oriented with a focus on real-world impact.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Statistical and bioinformatics analyses of high-throughput molecular data
Interaction with internal and external collaborators to understand, design, and develop the requested solutions
Development and execution of data analysis protocols to support the company's discovery pipeline
Presentation of scientific results internally and externally
Preparation and submission of scientific manuscripts for review and publication
Other duties as assigned
REQUIREMENTS:
Requires a Ph.D. in Bioinformatics, Statistics, Applied Math, Computer Sciences or related field with 0-3 years of experience; or an MS with 5-7 years of industry experience
Proficiency in R is required. Experience in Bioconductor is preferred
Experience in Linux and Big Data technologies
Experience in Scala, C, Python and MySQL is a plus
Experience in working with Graph Neural Networks (GNNs) is a plus
Proven ability to find creative and practical solutions to complex problems
Proven experience in applying Data Science methodologies to extract, process, and transform data from multiple sources
Proven ability to deliver outputs in a comprehensive format that highlights major trends, avoid miss-interpretations and value the conclusions
Proven ability to demonstrate attention to detail and record-keeping
Quick learner, extremely flexible and adaptable to the needs of internal collaborators in a dynamic environment
Ability to efficiently work in multiple projects
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Must be able to work in a team-oriented environment",4.2,"Berg Health
4.2","Framingham, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
147,Data Scientist II,$56k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Scientist II to join our team based in Vienna, VA.

Responsibilities:
Must be able to design, modify, develop, write and implement software programming applications.
Must be able to support and/or install software applications/operating systems.
Must be able to participate in the testing process through test reviews and analysis, test witnessing and certification of software.
Must be able to design, plan, and coordinate work teams.
Must be able to provides technical support to project team members.
Must be familiar with a variety of the field concepts, practices, and procedures.
Must be able to rely on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Must be able to perform a variety of tasks.
Must be able to lead and direct the work of others.
Must exhibit a wide degree of creativity and latitude.
Must typically be able to report to a head of a unit/department
Requirements:
Required a bachelor's degree in science or a related area.
Required 6-8 years of experience in the field.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go to https://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,"Nolij Consulting
4.1","Vienna, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
148,"Computational Scientist, Machine Learning",$86k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"ROLE SUMMARY

The Pfizer Simulation and Modeling Sciences (SMS) group has an opening for a computational methods developer with strong expertise in computational biology, bioinformatics, Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML). Working with the biotherapeutics group, the successful candidate will leverage skills in sequence analysis, protein structure modeling, machine learning, and scientific programming to develop AI models and computational tools that enable design of antibody therapeutics and prediction of biophysical and therapeutic properties. To be successful in this role, the incumbent must be able to effectively collaborate with colleagues with diverse scientific background, identify problems and opportunities, and combine techniques from computational biology and AI, in particular recent advances in deep learning, to rapidly develop powerful computational solutions.

ROLE RESPONSIBILITIES
Identify novel and creative applications of deep learning approaches to advance discovery and development of antibody therapeutics.
Collaborate across biotherapeutics organization to implement powerful AI models and cutting-edge computational tools to enable rapid developability assessment of novel monoclonal antibodies.
Effectively utilize relevant public and proprietary databases and available computational resources (internal HPC and Cloud) to develop ML models to predict important biophysical and therapeutic properties of antibodies.
Occasionally contribute to the ongoing and new ML-related efforts within SMS in the area of small molecule discovery and development.
Leverage proprietary computational framework and applications to deploy AI/ML models for wide usage by Pfizer scientists.
Proactively identify, assess, and internalize promising methods and tools.
Communicate and explain computational models and ML techniques to broad scientific audience from diverse discipline.
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
Ph.D. in computational biology, chemical engineering, computer science, physical or biological sciences, machine learning, or related discipline.
Experience with several machine learning algorithms (e.g. Random Forest, Support Vector Machine, Deep Neural Networks) and packages (e.g. Sci-kit Learn, Keras, TensorFlow, PyTorch).
Track record of applying machine learning, in particular modern deep learning approaches, to solve relevant biological problems.
Familiarity with concepts, techniques, and common tools used for sequence analysis and protein structure modeling.
Experience with Unix/Linux, HPC environments, and high-level programming language (e.g. Python).
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Demonstrated track record of applying AI/ML, in particular cutting-edge deep learning techniques such as ConvNet, RNN, generative modeling, and reinforcement learning to tackle complex drug discovery and development problems.
Experience in applying ML to immunology data, e.g. HLA peptide binding.
OTHER INFORMATION
Eligible for Employee Referral Bonus
#LI-PFE
Sunshine Act

Pfizer reports payments and other transfers of value to health care providers as required by federal and state transparency laws and implementing regulations. These laws and regulations require Pfizer to provide government agencies with information such as a health care provider’s name, address and the type of payments or other value received, generally for public disclosure. Subject to further legal review and statutory or regulatory clarification, which Pfizer intends to pursue, reimbursement of recruiting expenses for licensed physicians may constitute a reportable transfer of value under the federal transparency law commonly known as the Sunshine Act. Therefore, if you are a licensed physician who incurs recruiting expenses as a result of interviewing with Pfizer that we pay or reimburse, your name, address and the amount of payments made currently will be reported to the government. If you have questions regarding this matter, please do not hesitate to contact your Talent Acquisition representative.
EEO & Employment Eligibility

Pfizer is committed to equal opportunity in the terms and conditions of employment for all employees and job applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, gender identity or gender expression, national origin, disability or veteran status. Pfizer also complies with all applicable national, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment as well as work authorization and employment eligibility verification requirements of the Immigration and Nationality Act and IRCA. Pfizer is an E-Verify employer.
Information & Business Tech",4.1,"Pfizer
4.1","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1849,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
149,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"About SecurityScorecard:


SecurityScorecard is an industry-leading cybersecurity company backed by Google, Sequoia, and Riverwood. Our mission is to make the world a safer place. We measure your and your vendors' cyber-health by assigning a security rating of ""A"" through ""F"" based on outside-in, non-intrusive data. Our Comprehensive security ratings, advanced data analytics, and actionable insights discover Third-Party Vulnerabilities & Security Gaps In Real-Time.
We are headquartered in NYC with over 200+ employees globally, raised over $110M USD, used by 1,000+ enterprise customers, and rating 1.5 million companies. We have created a new category of enterprise software, and our culture has helped us be recognized as one of the 10 hottest SaaS startups in NY for two years in a row.
Our vision is to create a new language for companies and their partners to communicate, understand, and improve each other's security posture.

What you will do:


As a Senior Software Engineer on the Data Pipeline Platform team, you will help us scale, support, and build the next-generation platform for our data pipelines. The team's mission is to empower data scientists, software engineers, data engineers, and threat intelligence engineers accelerate the ingestion of new data sources and present the data in a meaningful way to our clients.

You will design and implement systems for ingesting, transforming, connecting, storing, and delivering data from a wide range of sources with varying levels of complexity and scale. You will enable other engineers to deliver value rapidly with minimum duplication of effort. Automate the infrastructure supporting the data pipeline as code and deployments by improving CI/CD pipelines. Monitor, troubleshoot, and improve the data platform to maintain stability and optimal performance.

Who you are:
Bachelor's degree or higher in a quantitative/technical field such as Computer Science, Engineering, Math
6+ years of data pipeline software development experience
Exceptional skills in at least one high-level programming language (Scala, Java, Go, Python or equivalent)
Actively using and a strong understanding of big data technologies such as Kafka, Spark, Storm, Apache Flink, Databricks toolkit and Cassandra
Experience with Dataflow orchestration in Google Cloud Flow, Airflow, or Conductor
Experience with AWS services including EMR, S3, Redshift, and RDS
Excellent communication skills to collaborate with cross-functional partners and independently drive projects and decisions
Previous experience working in distributed teams. We are a remote-first company!
Located in the U.S. or Canada
Benefits:
We pay people well and give them challenging problems to solve.
World-class health benefits
Stock options
401K
You are always welcome to work from home
$3000 per year education fund
#1 Ranked Cybersecurity Analytics company in the word
SecurityScorecard embraces diversity. We believe that our team is strengthened through hiring and retaining employees with diverse backgrounds, skillsets, ideas, and perspectives. We make hiring decisions based upon merit and do not discriminate based on race, religion, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, or marital, veteran, or disability status.",4.1,"SecurityScorecard
4.1",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
150,Manufacturing Scientist,$19k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary:

Support daily operations in the Purification Department, executing process improvement projects for Flexbumin including validation support and submission writing.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Work with appropriate support groups to assess product impact of manufacturing deviations and write product impact statements

Solve technical manufacturing issues, either lead teams or be an integral member of the team

Work with manufacturing to identify improvement opportunities

Work with appropriate teams to execute improvement projects, including validation support and submission writing

Design appropriate experiments to achieve process improvements with minimal supervision

Work independently or with other Manufacturing Science personnel to execute experiments

May work on small scale experiments

Assessment of new technology and application to our existing processes

Utilize robust statistical analysis to draw appropriate conclusions from the data

Develop new or improved techniques and procedures around specific tasks with minimal supervision

Present information to auditors

Work with manufacturing, quality, engineering, and other support groups to drive the goals of the Flexbumin projects

Qualifications:

Knowledge of protein purification techniques and biochemistry

Experience in protein process development

Knowledge of analytical tools for analysis of proteins

Experience with DOE (Design of Experiments), six sigma, and lean manufacturing a plus

Knowledge of GMPs

Good interpersonal skills, good verbal, and written communication skills

Able to work in a cold environment

Ability to handle multiple tasks concurrently while paying attention to detail

Strong computer skills (MS Word, MS Excel, MS PowerPoint, Minitab)

Strong interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills.Strong presentation skills

Education and/or experience:

Typically requires a Bachelor’s degree in science, engineering, or other related technical fields. 3+ years of related experience

Physical Demands:

Must be able to lift, push, pull 50 lbs, and carry up to 25 lbs

In general, the position requires a combination of sedentary work and walking around observing conditions in the facility

Working Environment:

Must be able to work in controlled environments requiring special gowning. Will be required to follow gowning requirements and wear protective clothing over the head, face, hands, feet, and body

No make-up, jewelry, contact lenses, nail polish, or artificial fingernails may be worn in the manufacturing environment

Will work in a cold, wet environment

Must be able to work multiple shifts, including weekends

Must be able to work overtime as required (only for non-exempt positions)

May be required to work in a confined area

Some Clean Room and cool/hot storage conditions

Notice to Employment / Recruitment Agents:

Employment / Recruitment agents may only submit candidates for vacancies only if they have written authorization to do so from Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda’s Talent Acquisition department. Any agency candidate submission may only be submitted to positions opened to the agency through the specific Agency Portal. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda will only pay a fee for candidates submitted or presented where there is a fully executed contract in place between the Employment / Recruitment agents and Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda and only if the candidate is submitted via the Agency Portal. Candidates submitted or presented by Employment / Recruitment Agents without a fully executed contract or submitted through this site shall not be deemed to form part of any Engagement for which the Agency may claim remuneration.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

EEO is the Law - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

EEO is the Law – Supplement - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf

Pay Transparency Policy - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_formattedESQA508c.pdf

Reasonable Accommodations

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process, or in order to perform the essential functions of a position, please call 484-595-8400 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Los Angeles, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
151,Data Engineer - AWS,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with AWS in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oRDS
oAWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB
oAmazon Redshift
oAWS DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline
oAWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAmazon EMR
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
o AWS Kinesis Analytics, AWS Lambda
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAWS QuickSight
oAmazon Athena
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAWS S3
oAWS ElastiCache
oAWS CloudSearch
•Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
152,Sr Data Analyst - Digital,$80k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Data Analyst - Digital role provides a fantastic opportunity to work with a fast-paced and highly functioning Digital Marketing team. This role is responsible for modeling complex Industry problems, discovering Industry insights and identifying opportunities through the use of statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques. This role is also proficient at integrating and preparing large, varied datasets, architecting specialized database and computing environments, that will integrate with the Adobe Experience Cloud (e.g. Adobe Campaign, Adobe Analytics, Audience Manager etc.) focusing in areas of customer segmentation and analytics. Data Analyst work closely with SMEs, data stewards, project/scrum teams, and other IT teams to turn data into critical information.

They will need to validate their findings using an experimental and iterative approach. Also, the Data Analyst will need to be able to present their findings by exposing their assumptions and validation work in a way that can be easily understood using strong written and communication skills. These professionals will need a combination of business focus, strong analytical and problem-solving skills, and programming knowledge to be able to quickly cycle hypothesis validation.

Responsibilities:

JOB DUTIES

Leads discovery processes with GMF stakeholders to identify the business requirements and the expected outcome
Models and frames business scenarios that are meaningful and which impact on critical business processes and/or decisions
Works with and alongside business SMEs by suggesting other products of interest
Collaborates with Institute subject matter experts to select the relevant sources of information
Identifies what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources, leveraging new data collection processes
Makes strategic recommendations on data collection, integration and retention requirements incorporating business requirements and knowledge of best practices
Develops innovative and effective approaches to solve client's analytics problems and communicates results and methodologies
Works in iterative processes with the client and validates findings
Develops experimental design approaches to validate finding or test hypotheses
Validates analysis using scenario modeling
Identifies/creates the appropriate algorithm to discover patterns
Assesses, with the business, opportunities to enhance the qualification and assurance of the information to strengthen the use case
Defines the validity of the information, how long the information is meaningful, and what other information it is related to
Partners with the data SMEs in continuous improvement processes impacting data quality in the context of the specific use case
Recommends ongoing improvements to methods and algorithms that lead to findings, including new information
Educates the organization both from IT and the business perspectives on new approaches, such as testing hypotheses and validation of results
Helps the organization understand the principles and the math behind the process to drive organizational buy-in
Contributes business metrics to show performance contribution over iterations
Contributes to on-going reporting metrics and data usage patterns to provide feedback to Marketing Management
Leads the design and deployment of enhancements and fixes to systems as needed
Interface with customers to provide issue resolution for products and processes
Maintain technical and functional awareness and competence of supported business applications, and organizational and industry technology standards
May participate in an on-call rotation that requires after-hours and weekend support for production outages and issues
Perform other duties as assigned
Conform with all company policies and procedures
Qualifications:

Knowledge

Data Strategies including customer segmentation, market segmentation
Marketing Campaign architecture
Marketing Analytics
Data Modeling/Engineering best practices
Delivery Methodologies including Agile, Waterfall, etc.
Thorough working knowledge of information systems and operations
Functional knowledge of the business area or areas assigned to them
Full technical knowledge of systems analysis techniques
Preferred Marketing/CRM platform(s) knowledge such as Adobe Experience Cloud and Google Marketing Suite

Skill

Analysis and reporting using knowledge in one or more of the following frameworks: SQL Server, SAS, or Power-BI
Excellent analytical, organizational, problem solving and follow-up skills with the ability to meet time sensitive deadlines
Must be a self-starter and able to manage the investigations function with minimal supervision
Proficiency with Microsoft Office products
Ability to interact with staff at all levels
Ability to make sound decisions and exercise good judgment
Promote a cooperative and productive team environment
Strong communication and interpersonal skills

Education

Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics or computer science or related field

Experience

5-7 years of relevant quantitative and qualitative research, analytics experience and SQL experience preferred
Knowledge in statistical analysis, quantitative analytics, forecasting/predictive analytics, multivariate testing, and optimization algorithms

Working Conditions

Normal office environment subject to stressful situations

Work is conducted in a professional office environment subject to stressful situations arising from meeting deadlines and managing multiple priorities

Evening and weekend work as required

Some travel to company and vendor sites may be required, including outside the United States

A passport is recommended

#DICE

#LI-KD2",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Irving, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
153,Staff Scientist I – Life Sciences,-1,"Staff Scientist I – Life Sciences


As a representative of EH&E’s Life Sciences team, a Staff Scientist I, is an experienced environmental health and safety professional who works with our biotechnology and research laboratory clients throughout New England. Educates, trains, and provides support to operations in the development and execution of consistent safety and environmental management programs. Directs accident investigation programs, develops accident trends, and develops programs for improving performance. Ensures compliance with all safety and environmental programs. Directs a proactive safety and environmental program. Improves the quality of safety and environmental management processes following established regulations, policies, standards, and practices. The successful applicant will be supported by a team of industry experts who will nurture and develop your career. This position reports directly to the Managing Principal Consultant or Senior Scientist. We offer competitive salary packages and excellent benefits. If you are interested in this opportunity, we would be delighted to hear from you.

About You:


The ideal candidate will have industrial experience in a research laboratory, clinical laboratory, or biotech industry environment; or, at least experience working within an environmental health and safety department for a biotech or research facility. Background working with radioactive materials or radiation safety is preferred.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities


Sales & Client Relations:
Responsible for maintaining the integrity of the business by presenting a positive, professional, respectful and professional image to our clients
Identify potential opportunities to senior staff
Deliver services on projects that meet or exceed client expectations
Consults with Principal Investigators and laboratory personnel on inspection findings and provide appropriate recommendations based on regulatory compliance and best practice guidance
QA/QC:
Participates in Institutional Biosafety Committee (IBC) and Laboratory Safety Committee meetings
Conducts or oversees periodic inspections of laboratories by qualified personnel in accordance with federal, state, and local government regulations and agencies’ policies; conducts air sampling for specific materials used in the research environment
Collect quality data as well as field data by other project staff
Assists clients with identification of appropriate biological laboratory containment levels, and strategies for hazard assessment and control
Assist in project/study design
Training/Mentoring:
Willingness and openness to professional development
Prepares and delivers classroom-based and online biosafety and laboratory EH&S training programs. Topics include laboratory safety and chemical hygiene, biosafety, NIH recombinant DNA, OSHA Bloodborne Pathogens Standard, Shipping (IATA/DOT), and other customized training. Updates written materials regarding biological safety and laboratory EH&S (e.g., Biosafety Manual, Chemical Hygiene Plan, Hazard Communication, etc.)
Conducts follow-up with laboratory personnel as needed
Customer Satisfaction:
Represent respectful professional image
Interact with client’s staff to execute work
Contribute to client satisfaction as a team member/project manager
Technical Expertise:
Ability to apply basic scientific principles to EH&E’s work while developing observational ability and functional analytical skills in discipline
Performs risk assessments and job safety analyses for work involving chemical and biological materials
Conducts air sampling and personal monitoring for specific materials used in the research environment; inspects and/or tests and audits the performance of safety equipment such as but not limited to emergency safety showers and eyewash stations, chemical fume hoods and spill kits; performs respiratory protection fit-testing
Assists in shipping hazardous materials and biological materials; investigates research environment incidents; responds to chemical, biological, and after-hour emergencies
Utilizes mobile devices to collect inspection information
Communication and reports:
Written and verbal communication skills are essential as you will be contributing to reports
Clearly communicate technical concepts while maintain context and understanding the audience
Financial Management:
Be able to work to timelines and report any deviations to this to management
Achieve project profitability goals
Key Skills
Excellent interpersonal, written and communication skills
Driver’s license, occasional travel required
Commercial awareness
The ability to work well under pressure
Teamworking skills
Good analytical skills
Ability to work independently when required
Proficient in MS Word, Excel, and Access
The ability to cope with shift work and unsocial hours, which are at times required
Experience with standard office equipment (computers, phones, and photocopiers)
Education / Training


Bachelor of Science (BS) or Master of Science (MS) in Biology, Microbiology, Molecular Biology, or related subject.

Professional Certifications & Memberships Preferred:


Registered Biosafety Professional; Certified Industrial Hygienist; Certified Safety Professional; HAZWOPER certification; DOT/RCRA certification; membership in the American Biological Safety Association; membership in the American Industrial Hygiene Association.

Please send résumé and salary expectations to HumanResources@eheinc.com",3.7,"Environmental Health
3.7","Needham Heights, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
154,Data Scientist Lead- DAB,$94k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Central Support

Central Support – Central support will be at the forefront of driving new ways of working, collaborating and change. We need talent that are willing to be first adopters. Leaders who can help ensure learnings and best practices are leveraged across all of Takeda’s digital priorities

As disruptive technology changes the face of healthcare industry, Takeda will have a new role to play. We are taking a giant step forward to shape a new breed of organization. A future-ready organization that shape shifts as the world changes. We have embarked on a visionary journey to become a truly Living Business. A digital and data-driven organization with agile capabilities to respond quickly to new technology opportunities and changing customer expectations.

While others react to changing dynamics and disruption by building barriers around their digital solutions and patients, we understand that the global healthcare transformation can only be successful when we enter a new era of trust and collaboration by exchanging data, insights and knowledge.

We will explore new ways of working across Takeda. We will introduce agile capabilities and culture driving more intentional collaboration, innovation and partnerships across geographies and business units.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Takeda is undergoing a digital transformation. Mobilized by the C-suite in November 2018 with a $300M funding released in January 2019, the transformation program has several initiatives in flight across the globe.
One key pillar of the program and the digital organization is the emerging technology and digital partnerships team. This team serves as the agile prototyping body that drives pilot efforts to validate the efficacy and scalability of onboarded technology, analytics products.
We are looking for a versatile, super-star data scientist that will lead the development of models, insight engines across the molecule lifecycle. And if needed, put hands on the keyboard to build rapid prototypes.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Identify relevant internal and external stakeholders to gather requirements to deliver data solutions.
The scope of work is broad - crystal structure prediction, synthetic control arms, rare disease early diagnosis algorithms, yield optimization for manufacturing, patient journey analysis, micro-segmentation, field force optimization, etc.
Involve additional data experts as needed.
Implement tools (e.g., Power BI) that help data consumers to extract, analyze and visualize data faster through data pipelines.
Design proposals for calculations based on subscribed data collection.
Develop calculation mechanisms to ensure real-time data collection of customer behavior.
Identify and interpret trends or make patterns in complex data sets in order to enable the business data-driven decisions.
Provide data insights for technical solutions and system improvements based on interpreted results.
Work alongside architects and other technical experts while contributing actionable, database insights to the system architecture.
The goal would be for you to have global visibility, impact, and be positioned to start building your own team in April 2021.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS

Bachelor’s degree in relevant field, or other relevant work experience.
This role requires comfort with common modeling techniques (linear Regression, logistic Regression. decision tree, SVM, Naive Bayes, kNN. K-Means. Random Forest, dimensionality reduction, gradient boosting, xgboost, etc.), deep learning, deep knowledge of NLP (BERT, NLTK, including interest in learning new packages like GPT-3, deeBERT, AutoML, Sagemaker autopilot), a different approach for deploying models in the cloud (primarily AWS) and a strong appetite for learning!
Advanced knowledge of statistical and data mining techniques (regression, decision trees, clustering, neural networks etc..).
Proficiency in R, SAS, SPSS, MATLAB, Python (NumPy/SciPy) or other statistical packages.
Experience in working with large data sets and relational databases.
Experience with distributed systems and programming models, using Big Data technologies such as Hadoop or Spark.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills along with strong desire to work in cross-functional teams.
If you are a high performing data science wizard that can be a thought leader for ~200 data scientists across the organization in data science innovation, speed/comfort with learning and rapid prototyping - this is the gig you are looking for.

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
155,"Machine Learning Engineer, Marketing Analytics",$50k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Ibotta is seeking a Machine Learning Engineer to help build a targeted, personalized, high performing Marketing engine that drives our company's mission to make every purchase rewarding for millions of consumers. We're looking for a machine learning engineer who has a passion for building scalable machine learning solutions using technologies such as Python, Spark, AWS, Airflow, Sagemaker, PyTorch, etc. Every member of the team has input into our analytics strategy and will have a real impact on Marketing decisions and performance.

What you will be doing:
Embrace and uphold Ibotta's Core Values: Integrity, Boldness, Outhustle, Teamwork, Transparency & A good idea can come from anywhere
Design, develop and deploy large scale, big data-driven machine learning models that are integrated with key product features. Some examples of potential projects include:
Building/scaling ML related infrastructure to help streamline the development, evaluation, deployment, and re-usability of core ML features and services
A/B testing. Ability to distinguish the signal from the noise in order to drive business decisions, and iteratively improve performance from new/existing marketing campaigns
Using experiments to build uplift models that decide optimal treatments at the user level
Collaborate with Engineering and Analytics leads to establish analytic standards and platforms that scale and can be leveraged in various initiatives throughout the organization
Deliver world class products in partnership with cross functional teams (Product Managers, Data Engineers, Software Engineers, etc.)
Communicate complex machine learning solutions, concepts and the results of analyses in a clear and effective manner to business stakeholders and technology leaders to maximize the effectiveness of machine learning initiatives
What we are looking for:
2+ years of professional experience as a Machine Learning Engineer, Data Scientist, or equivalent role, focusing on machine learning, statistical modeling, and/or ML infrastructure
Proficiency in Python
Experience working with machine learning frameworks (e.g. scikit-learn, xgboost, PyTorch, TensorFlow) and distributed big-data tools (Spark, Hive)
Experience working with version control systems (e.g. git) and CI/CD for machine learning pipelines
Ability to communicate complex, technical machine learning implementations to diverse audiences
Ability to think critically and leverage domain expertise to build machine learning powered applications that help to achieve high-level business objectives
About Us:

Built in Denver, CO, Ibotta (""I bought a..."") is a free mobile shopping app that gives users cash back on groceries and more. Through our partnerships with brands and retailers like Procter & Gamble, Kraft Heinz, Kellogg, Amazon, Walmart, Target and Uber, we've delivered over $750 million in cumulative cash rewards to our Savers. Guided by our values and our mission to make every purchase rewarding, we come to work energized by the business problems we get to solve, the technology we get to build, and the people we get to innovate (and have fun) with. Ibotta made Inc.'s 2020 list of the 5000 fastest-growing private companies in the U.S. for the third consecutive year. In 2019, we became the first mobile consumer technology company in Colorado to achieve $1B in valuation.

To learn more about what our Tech teams are doing day to day, visit Building Ibotta on Medium.com.

Additional Details:
This position is located in Denver, CO and includes competitive pay, benefits package (including medical, dental, vision), 401k, and equity.
Ibotta is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Ibotta's employment decisions are made without regard with race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other legally protected status
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.
For the security of our employees and the business, all employees are responsible for the secure handling of data in accordance with our security policies, identifying and reporting phishing attempts, as well as reporting security incidents to the proper channels.",3.6,"Ibotta
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
156,Staff Data Scientist,-1,"We are a company of passionate individuals striving to improve healthcare and patient experiences. Our evidence-based medical content and software tools empower both payers and providers to make the best decisions for patients. Our work makes a difference in the quality of care that hundreds of thousands of patients receive each day and we're proud of our positive impact.

MCG Health's Data Science Solutions Team is responsible for building, delivering, evolving and operating the company's Data Science Solutions. These solutions empower doctors, nurses and patients to make the best decisions for health outcomes and quality of life factors valued by patients. The primary purpose of the Senior Data Scientist is to provide thought leadership and pragmatic technical leadership to the Data Science Solutions group and their use of AI, Data Science, Machine Learning and Natural Language Processing Technologies.

In this role you will:
Collaborate with business, product, technical stakeholders and team members to deliver innovative solutions that improve the efficiency and effectiveness of healthcare delivery
Be an expert on problems that matter to MCG's markets / clients, and propose approaches to leverage data, AI / ML / NLP / DS technologies and MCG's assets to address these problems
Contribute to establishing a team environment of collaboration, excellence and innovation
Provide thought leadership regarding the continually advancing state of the art of readily available AI technologies and cloud-based services that are relevant to MCG products and solutions
Contribute to establishment and evolution of methodologies for development and maintenance of data science models, to ensure effective usage and rapid, continuous improvement
Contribute to technology choices (build, buy, use open source) to support rapid experimentation and development of data models that can be readily transitioned to production
Collaborate with DSS and/or MCG software engineering leadership to deploy platforms to support data ingestion from internal and external sources, and to deploy platforms to support continuous transformation of successful models into production usage
Partner with MCG technical leadership team to ensure compliance with security, privacy (HIPAA), regulatory and other obligations
Represent MCG's Data Science Solutions group, products and technologies to business and technical stakeholders at client companies and industry groups / associations
We'd love to hear from you if:
You have a minimum 5 years experience working with AI technologies
You have demonstrated experience building one or both of: Predictive / classification models using Machine Learning techniques, NLP systems using Deep Learning, or other techniques
You have demonstrated experience delivering successful ML and/or NLP solutions to the marketplace is required.
You have demonstrated experience working with software engineers to design and deliver Data Science platforms and tooling for use by a Data Science team is required; this may include creating such a platform from the ground up or successful configuration / deployment / usage of third-party platforms augmented by internally built tooling as needed
You have demonstrated experience with cloud-based data science services
You have demonstrated experience mentoring and providing technical leadership for data science model experimentation, and ongoing enhancement / evolution of solutions
You have demonstrated the ability to think ""outside the box"" and identify business problems appropriate to usage of AI / ML / NLP / DS techniques is required
You have demonstrated proficiency with lean system development practices successfully applied to deliver business value at sustainable velocity
We embrace diversity and equal opportunity, and are committed to building a team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. It is only with diverse thoughts and ideas that we'll be able to create the change we want in healthcare. The more inclusive we are, the better our work will be for it.",4.6,"MCG Health
4.6",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1988,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
157,Sr or Principal Data Scientist,$104k-$167k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are hiring Data Scientists at these levels:
Senior
Lead (Staff or Sr. Staff)
Principal

WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart/$ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2000 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart/$ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

The Sr. or Principal Data Scientist will be heavily involved in executing data analysis and modeling tasks for Freedom Financial Asset Management, the lending division of the Freedom Financial Network. The overarching mandate for the Sr. or Principal Data Scientist is to execute on analytic delivery and to develop new analytic capabilities for the company’s mortgage initiative. The position will essentially be to partner with the mortgage division to execute a new analytic vision. Additionally, he/she may collaborate with other team members to assess and develop new analytic opportunities. This role will provide the candidate exposure and visibility into a strategic initiative for the company, and as such, will be a high impact role within the organization.

THE ROLE:

Some of the key responsibilities for the Analytic Scientist will include:

Drive better understanding of FFN customers and prospects. Optimize customer experience and FFN value proposition by leveraging of GLM, supervised and unsupervised ML modeling solutions.
Utilize your technical and analytical skills, while also gaining in-depth exposure to business strategy.
Act as consultant to cross functional teams, advise how to best leverage predictive modeling and data in general.
Responsibility:
Design, build, optimize and maintain customer LTV / lifecycle modeling platforms.
Identify opportunities to apply data science solutions to improve customer experience and FFN value proposition.
Consult with business partners to develop data science strategy to address and influence customer LTV.
Analyze data, build models and assess their quality
Design experiments and evaluate the results
Monitor model performance and make recommendations
Ad-hoc Statistical requests
Communicating results and recommendations to senior management
Identify and apply best practices and innovative solutions for optimization of customer life cycle.
Skillset and Requirements:
Expert knowledge of logistic regression, decision trees, survival analysis, design of experiment and other statistical techniques
Expert knowledge of supervised and unsupervised ML modeling techniques
Communicating clearly and concisely to individuals from various backgrounds
Influencing others in both verbal and written mediums
Leverage data and advanced statistical and machine learning techniques to develop comprehensive customer experience strategy
Qualifications and Experience
Masters or PhD in Statistics or similar quantitative field of study (Math, Economics, Financial Engineering, Physics, Chemical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Operations Research, etc.)
Hands on expertise in statistical modeling and analysis
Experience with use of credit bureau data for statistical modeling
Experience working with relational databases
Expert SAS/R/Python knowledge
Experience with cloud-based modeling (AI) platforms
0 - 7+ years of total experience. Financial services or mortgage experience, is not required, but is preferred.
Demonstrated experience in statistical modeling and analysis. Expert level skills in Python or R.
Proficiency in qualitative and quantitative data analysis and reporting.
Aptitude working with relational databases and manipulating data from databases for statistical modeling.
Familiarity with UNIX/LINUX environments and BASH/shell scripting is desired.
Very strong analytical skills, combined with an ability to tie analytic results to business implications.
A can do attitude for problem solving.
A keen eye to spot opportunities to automate and streamline analytic processes.
High level of comfort working within the financial services industry, as well as working within a rapidly growing environment in which change is a constant.
An ability to work independently with limited direction but with the judgment to do so within appropriate limits of authority.
Initiative to constructively, but passionately, challenge existing analytic processes.

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.
Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted a Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees, most recently #1 in Phoenix for the 2nd year in a row!
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday

This is your opportunity to be part of a growing company where dedicated professionals strive to help customers and each other succeed every day. If that sounds exciting to you, we want to talk to you. Apply today!

Attention Agencies & Search Firms: We do not accept unsolicited candidate resumes or profiles. Please do not reach out to anyone within Freedom Financial Network (FFN) to market your services or candidates. All inquiries should be directed to Talent Acquisition only. We reserve the right to hire any candidates sent unsolicited and will not pay any fees without a contract signed by FFN’s Talent Acquisition leader. Thank you for your consideration.",3.4,"Freedom Financial Network
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
158,Business Intelligence Analyst,$58k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Opportunity

Rodan + Fields® is looking for a Business Intelligence Data Analyst to deliver insights through data solutions to business groups across multiple domains. You will work with a team of committed Data Analytics professionals, applying your business intuition and technical knowledge. The BI Data Analyst will be required to develop and enhance in-depth knowledge of R+F’s data and systems utilized by the business teams. This person will be responsible for hands-on collaboration with business partners to understand and meet their needs for data and insights. With an understanding of the core business needs in hand, you will use SQL and data visualization skills to develop solutions to move the business forward and enable effective and timely decision-making.

Responsibilities
As part of the Strategic Planning and Analytics team, partner with technical teams and business partners to ensure close collaboration between tech teams and the business
Develop a deep understanding of the company’s current data needs, and shape the future data strategy
Collaborate on engineering and documenting data and analytics process flows
Create and manage dashboards, scorecards, and other analytical services
Train business partners on self-service data solutions and reports
Develop analytics solutions that bring data to life by using design thinking concepts in a timely manner
Effectively coordinate work and collaborate across various cross-functional groups and levels in the organization
Succinctly and effectively communicate complex technical solutions to non-technical users
Support internal Data Science team with data extraction, validation and deployments
Qualifications
BA or BS degree required; MBA preferred
Proficient in MS Office, Data Management Platforms
Experience working with datasets hosted in Cloud preferably GCP is a plus
7+ years in business analytics, insights, brand strategy, management consulting
3+ years of experience with modern analytics tools such as Microstrategy, Looker, Tableau, or similar tools
Fluency in SQL
Experience in common data, analytics, and visualization technologies
Ability to self-prioritize and work in collaboration with multiple partner managers, product managers and marketing managers as a front-line analytics partner
Experience interfacing with business customers, gathering requirements and gaining a deep dive understanding of key data
Ability to answer unstructured business questions and work independently to drive projects and create new processes
Possess a high degree of natural curiosity to drive the next levels of business questions and insights
Demonstrate resilience and flexibility, in the midst of ambiguity, to drive business impacting change
The Company

Rodan + Fields was founded in 2000 by Stanford-trained dermatologists Dr. Katie Rodan and Dr. Kathy Fields with a passion for giving people the best skin of their lives — and the confidence that comes with it. With effective products, a unique business model and a powerful community of Independent Consultants, Rodan + Fields has disrupted the skincare category to become a leading skincare brand in North America. The company has grown its innovative line of products and expanded into Canada, Australia and Japan. Headquartered in San Francisco, CA, R+F now employs 500+ people, has more than 300,000 enrolled Independent Consultants and over two million Preferred Customers.

At Rodan + Fields, you will be challenged to make an impact, inspired to do more, and rewarded for your contributions. We are transforming skincare, and we welcome your big ideas to fuel our ambitious growth plans! If you are looking for a life-changing career opportunity, we've got your prescription. You’ll become part of a positive, passionate movement that celebrates greatness and encourages employees to be catalysts for change. We provide a creative, vibrant workplace outfitted with all of the technology, tools and training you'll need to learn, grow and thrive! We create life-changing impact in our communities through our non-profit, Prescription for Change®, the heart of Rodan + Fields. By funding empowerment programs for students, we teach them how to use their skills to make life-changing differences in their lives and the lives of others. Join us and share your talents as we develop innovative solutions for your skin and empower entrepreneurs. In addition to working arm-in-arm with industry leaders, employees at Rodan + Fields enjoy rich benefits plans and perks.

Rodan + Fields is an equal opportunity employer that champions diversity, inclusion and equality for all. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, military/veteran status, or disability status.

We welcome employees to be their true, authentic selves, without exception and believe individual differences add value to our team. Join our team; we know it will be a life- changing experience!

Regarding COVID-19
With the spread of COVID-19 globally, our Bay Area offices will remain closed until further notice with the exception of phase 1 employees that require access to hardware and lab equipment.

Our primary concern is for the health and well-being of our employees as well as candidates. We have transitioned all interviews and new hire onboarding to be conducted virtually via Zoom video conferencing.",2.2,"Rodan and Fields, LLC
2.2","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Beauty & Personal Accessories Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
159,Medical Laboratory Scientist,$17-$23 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

Performs and interprets tests at all complexity levels. Demonstrates an understanding of the theory and scientific principles of laboratory testing as well as the technical, procedural and problem solving aspects. Correlates abnormal laboratory data with pathological states, determines the validity of test results and the need for additional tests. Determines the validity of test results through the monitoring and/or verifying of quality controls, standards, etc. Communicates test results, reference ranges, specimen requirements, and other pertinent information to authorized sources.

Job Responsibilities:

Follows the laboratory's procedures for specimen handling and processing, test analyses, reporting and maintaining records of patient test results.
Performs laboratory testing in a compliant manner.
Maintains regulatory knowledge and awareness as it pertains to specific job duties.
Adheres to the laboratory's quality control policies, document all quality control activities, instrument and procedural calibrations and maintenance performed.
Assumes responsibility for and takes action regarding any quality control or quality assurance issues as it pertains to specific job duties.
Maintains instruments and equipment in accordance with manufacturer’s specifications.
Assumes responsibility for good documentation practices and maintains clear and legible records.
Performs proficiency testing in compliance with Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA) regulations i.e. analyze proficiency survey sample in the same manner as a patient specimens, no communication with other CLIA laboratories, complete record retention and accurate documentation and result reporting.
Assumes responsibility for participation in continuing education, professional development and required annual competency assessment.
Follows the laboratory's established policies and procedures whenever test systems are not within the laboratory's established acceptable levels of performance.
Identifies problems that may adversely affect test performance or reporting of test results and either must correct the problems or immediately notify the General Supervisor, Technical Supervisor, Clinical Consultant, or Laboratory Director.
Exercises good judgment, analytical and problem solving/troubleshooting skills.
Recommends solutions and improvements.
Documents all corrective actions taken when test systems deviate from the laboratory's established performance specifications.
May function in an educator and provides instruction and training in theory, technical skills, safety protocols, and the application of laboratory test protocols to students, employees, residents, etc.
Other duties as assigned.
Follows Hospital and department policies and procedures with special attention to attendance and punctuality, confidentiality, dress code and display of ID badge, and safety.
Completes mandatory education and training in order to maintain organization and department-specific competencies and requirements.

Education:

Bachelor's degree in a chemical, physical, biological or clinical laboratory science or medical technology from a four-year college or university.
One year training in approved program with registry/certification at Medical Technologist/ Clinical Laboratory Scientist level (MLS or MT) or registry eligible.
OR
Meets the CLIA qualifications for high complexity testing personnel grandfathering clauses.
See Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, §493.1489(b)(3), §493.1489(b)(4), §493.1489(b)(5), §493.1491 Standards; High Complexity Testing Personnel Qualifications.
Diploma and/or transcripts must be provided.
Education will be verified.
Education outside of the United States requires diploma/transcripts translated into English and proof of foreign equivalency from by an HHS approved agency or nationally recognized organization such as NACES (National Association Credential Evaluation Services, Inc.) or AICE (Association of International Credential Evaluators, Inc.).

Languages:

Certifications:

Certification as a Medical Technologist (MT) or certification eligible preferred upon hire, from the American Society of Clinical Pathology (ASCP) or American Medical Technologists (AMT).
Certification must be obtained within one year of hire.

Complexity of Work:

Requires critical thinking skills, decisive judgment and the ability to work unsupervised or with minimal supervision.
Must be able to work in a stressful environment and take appropriate action.

Work Experience:

None required.

Physical Requirements:

Physical demands include: Visual acuity to study specimens under a microscope.
The ability to distinguish colors.
Fine motor skills and manual dexterity to handle specimens and lab equipment required to process specimens and repair equipment.
May be required to stand for long periods of time.
Light lifting may be required.
May be exposed to hazardous chemicals, biohazards, radioactive materials, etc.

Personal Protective Equipment:

Follows Standard Precautions using personal protective equipment as required.

The policy of Cleveland Clinic and its system hospitals (Cleveland Clinic) is to provide equal opportunity to all of our employees and applicants for employment in our tobacco free and drug free environment. All offers of employment are followed by testing for controlled substance and nicotine. Job offers will be rescinded for candidates for employment who test positive for nicotine. Candidates for employment who are impacted by Cleveland Clinic’s Smoking Policy will be permitted to reapply for open positions after 90 days. Decisions concerning employment, transfers and promotions are made upon the basis of the best qualified candidate without regard to color, race, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, ancestry, status as a disabled or Vietnam era veteran or any other characteristic protected by law. Information provided on this application may be shared with any Cleveland Clinic facility.

Cleveland Clinic is pleased to be an equal employment employer: Women/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities",3.8,"Cleveland Clinic
3.8","Akron, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1921,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
160,Machine Learning Engineer - Pipeline Requisition,$86k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"Machine Learning Engineer - Pipeline Requisition
Location


Simi Valley, CA

Employment type


Regular - Full Time

ID

1727

Apply Now

This is a pipeline requisition posted in advance of approved headcount for future hiring needs of Machine Learning Engineers.

AeroVironment Machine Learning Engineers have the opportunity to lead engineering development and work with our R&D Group to develop a variety of innovative capabilities - computer vision detection, classification, localization, and tracking solutions for defense and commercial applications. These development efforts will generally be small focused design teams, which will require a Machine Learning Engineer to use a range of skills and tools across traditional engineering, computer science, and mathematical disciplines including computer vision, machine learning, optimization, deep convolutional neural networks, and visual tracking. This position will work on, and lead, a variety of stages of development including requirements definition, concept design, prototyping, detailed design, test and evaluation, and validation and verification testing.

Position Responsibilities
Leads development of computer vision & machine learning algorithms capable of detection, classifying, localizing & tracking objects-of-interest from a group 1 UAV, using the existing gimballed camera payload
Writes Hand test software to Lead integration of autonomy algorithms into aircraft (such as autopilots, payloads, or other functional components) or other robotic systems
Explores and visualizes data to gain an understanding of it, then identifying differences in data distribution that could affect
Implements Machine Learning systems and validate designs through a series of purpose-designed experiments
Creates objectives & develop models that help to achieve them, along with metrics to track progress
Performs design and analysis tasks using AeroVironment and industry developed tools
Leads Analysis of ML algorithms to solve a given problem and ranking them by success probability
Performance when deploying the model in the real world; Verifying data quality, and/or ensure it via data cleaning
Supervises the data acquisition process if more data is needed; Finds available datasets online that could be used for training
Understands the preprocessing feature based engineering to be done on a given dataset; Training models and tuning their hyper-parameters
Analyzes the errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them. Deploy models to production; Study and transform data science prototypes
Researches and implemenst appropriate ML algorithms and tools
Determines methods and procedures on new assignments and may coordinate activities of other personnel
Special Requirements
U.S. Citizenship required. Must be willing to work on government contracts and the ability to obtain a security clearance

We are pipelining for Engineers with various level of experience:
Machine Learning Engineer III with a minimum of 5+ years of relevant experience
Sr. Machine Learning Engineer with a minimum of 8+ years of relevant experience
Sr. Staff Machine Learning Engineer with a minimum of 12+ years of relevant experience
Basic Qualifications
BS Degree in Computer Vision and Machine Learning is required or equivalent combination of education, training, and experience - with qualifications in any of the following fields: Mathematics, Optimization, Computer Science/Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Aerospace, or Mechanical Engineering
Familiarity with C/C++ and Matlab required
Demonstrated ability to troubleshoot complex systems
Familiarity with office software and computer-based productivity tools
Advanced degree is preferred
Other matrixed skills include:
Proficiency with a deep learning framework such as TensorFlow or Keras
Proficiency with Python and basic libraries for machine learning such as scikit-learn and pandas
Expertise in visualizing and manipulating big datasets
Proficiency with OpenCV
Familiarity with Linux
Ability to select hardware to run an ML model with the required latency
Computational statistics
Mathematical optimization
Data mining
Exploratory data analysis
Predictive analytics
Note: Our team is always interested in speaking with exceptional Machine Learning Engineers though please note this is a Pipeline posting with more of an eye towards our future needs rather than necessarily being an immediate hire. Only qualified candidates will be contacted.
ITAR Requirement:

This position requires the use of information which is subject to compliance with International Traffic Arms Regulations (ITAR). To conform to U.S. Government export regulations/ITAR, applicants must be a U.S. Citizen, lawful permanent resident of the U.S. (or, green card holder), protected individual as defined by 8 U.S.C. 1324b(a)(3). Applicants cannot be hired until they are qualified to have such access. Some positions due to U.S. Government contract requirements will require current U.S. Citizenship.

Benefits: AV offers an excellent benefits package including medical, dental vision, 401K with company matching, a 9/80 work schedule and a paid holiday shutdown. For more information about our company benefit offerings please visit: http://www.avinc.com/myavbenefits.

We also encourage you to review our company website at http://www.avinc.com to learn more about us.

Principals only need apply. NO agencies please.

Who We Are

Based in California, AeroVironment (AVAV) is a global leader in unmanned aircraft systems (UAS) and tactical missile systems. Founded in 1971 by celebrated physicist and engineer, Dr. Paul MacCready, we’ve been at the leading edge of technical innovation for more than 45 years. Be a part of the team that developed the world’s most widely used military drones and created the first submarine-launched reconnaissance drone, and has seven innovative vehicles that are part of the Smithsonian Institution’s permanent collection in Washington, DC.

Join us today in developing the next generation of small UAS and tactical missile systems that will deliver more actionable intelligence to our customers so they can proceed with certainty – and succeed.

What We Do

Building on a history of technological innovation, AeroVironment designs, develops, produces, and supports an advanced portfolio of unmanned aircraft systems (UAS) and tactical missile systems. Agencies of the U.S. Department of Defense and allied military services use the company’s hand-launched UAS to provide situational awareness to tactical operating units through real-time, airborne reconnaissance, surveillance, and target acquisition.

AeroVironment Incorporated is an equal opportunity employer, M/F/D/V and works in compliance with both federal and state laws. We are committed to the concept regarding Equal Employment opportunity. Qualified candidates will be considered for employment regardless of race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, marital status, medical condition nor disability, genetics, veteran and all others that may appy.

To view our CCPA Privacy Policy click here: https://www.avinc.com/legal/ccpa-privacy-policy",4.1,"AeroVironment
4.1","Simi Valley, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1971,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
161,Quantitative Analyst,$81k-$169k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview

We are seeking a Quantitative Analyst in our Evanston office to join the Systematic Investing team. The analyst will develop investment models for a multi-strategy fund, working within a variety of markets, instruments and strategies. The ideal candidate will have experience in empirical finance and other quantitative techniques such as factor modeling and portfolio optimization. The candidate needs to be a team player with excellent communication skills, and able to perform and excel in a fast-paced environment.

Qualifications
PhD or Masters in applied mathematics, quantitative finance, computer science, or related technical fields. 0-2 years of work experience is acceptable; 2-5 years of work experience is preferred.
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills
Excellent mathematical and modeling skills
Broad statistical toolkit including machine learning, econometrics, and non-parametric methods
Experience with factor modeling and portfolio optimization
Experience with statistical techniques in empirical finance
Strong programming skills in languages such as Matlab, Python, C++, and C#.
Ability to work independently or as part of a team
Ability to work in a high functioning environment
About Us

Magnetar Capital is a leading alternative asset manager with $11.2 billion under management as of April 2020. We are conveniently headquartered in downtown Evanston, steps from public transportation and the lakefront. We operate substantial satellite offices in New York, London and Houston.

When you join Magnetar, you will work alongside individuals who are among the best in the business at what they do. We attract highly skilled, dedicated professionals who enjoy working across practices and executing innovative ideas.

Our culture is based on the core values of insight, integrity and passion. We have an intense level of intellectual curiosity, a profound passion for our work and care deeply about delivering results for the Firm and for each other. These qualities drive everything we do.

We seek to generate consistent performance across a variety of market conditions by identifying differentiated investment ideas that we believe can be developed into scalable businesses. We invest across three core pillars: Alternative Credit & Fixed Income, Energy & Infrastructure and Systematic Investing.

We know how important healthy choices are to our employees. We offer an onsite gym in our Evanston office (and subsidized memberships for other office locations), kitchens with healthy snacks, and health-conscious, catered lunches daily at no cost to our employees.

Magnetar employees are passionate about philanthropy and there are plenty of ways for employees to give back through the Magnetar Capital Foundation (a nonprofit focusing on increasing access to financial education programs in high-schools), organized volunteer efforts, and our company matching contributions program. Employees also receive one Community Day per year to volunteer at a cause of their choosing. To further enrich our work environment, we also organize extracurricular activities such as our running club and bowling teams as well as company-sponsored social events for employees and families.

We hope you’ll consider joining us as you explore careers at Magnetar!",3.7,"Magnetar Capital
3.7","Evanston, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
162,Data Scientist,$72k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Scientist, you will have the unique opportunity to work on a program developing target models and advancing state-of-the-art modeling and prediction capabilities. This program will develop and train machine learning models to detect and discern features in scenes and develop an adversarial patch framework to defeat the trained classifiers.
Our delivery teams are driven to explore new ideas and technology, and care deeply about collaboration, feedback, and iteration. We follow SAFe agile practices, embrace the Ops ethos(DataOps/DevSecOps/MLOps) to “automate-first”, use modern tech stacks, and constantly challenge each other to grow and improve.
If cutting edge data science projects resonate with you and you care deeply about joining a mission-driven company with a strong growth direction and diverse culture, we'd love to learn more about you. Check out the details below, and let’s connect.

Technical members of our solutions teams require little guidance, but love to learn, collaborate, and problem solve. This position requires a mid to senior level of experience, a passion for mission support, and a strong desire to solve our customers’ hardest technical and data challenges.
The Data Scientist will be responsible for the following:
Develop, train and evaluate Machine Learning models
Develop strategies for data augmentation and synthetic data
Utilize models to detect and classify targets within scenes
Develop adversarial attacks to defeat trained classifiers

Requirements:
TS/SCI clearance required
5+ years of related experience
Experience with deep learning frameworks such as PyTorch, Tensorflow or MXNet
Prior experience with the Intelligence Community and methodological experience in some of the following areas
Relationships and discovery (correlating, enriching, and prioritizing target data)
Situational awareness (unifying data into a single context, allowing the current situation to be accurately and quickly understood)
Systems modeling (building a computational analog of real-world-system to understand how it operates, what it is capable of, and how it can be fooled)
We're looking for a motivated Data Scientist eager to advance not only your professional career, but also the missions of our Intelligence and Defense communities. At NT Concepts, you'll be able to:
Meaningfully impact the company's growth, and share in the rewards accordingly
Develop your own career path through our What’s Next program, which emphasizes personal growth through training and certification
Work on programs of importance that directly impact National Security and the world
Work in a fun, “challenging yet rewarding” fast-paced environment
#CJ
#JT",3.6,"NT Concepts
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
163,Product Research and Development Scientist,$62k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"PURPOSE OF THE JOB

Do you have ideas? Do you look at a product and often say that it would be great if it could do ""x""... or if it could have “this new feature or benefit” or do you often hear others saying what they find missing and you can decipher what they really want or need?

Lead new product development, innovation, and renovation for Owens Corning Fiberglass Building Insulation business. This role is responsible for owning product development and innovation opportunities through developing new product and optimizing and improving existing products. Also, the role encompasses being accountable for the design, coordination and execution of ethnographic, qualitative, and quantitative research methods to define end-user needs. This position works closely with Product Managers, R&D, Legal and Manufacturing.

Join an organization that believes that every employee owns a piece of our bold growth goals and ultimate success. We are a market-leading innovator that has placed on the Fortune 500®. Owens Corning is devoted to delivering sustainable solutions across our three business segments while striving to ensure our people and products make the world a better place. We take pride in having an inclusive and diverse workplace with employees around the globe. A holistic sense of community exists across our entire organization as our talent grows globally. We are a company that fully recognizes the importance of paving a path to a sustainable and safe enterprise through investing in our people. Our desire to make an impactful difference in the world flows from top down to all levels of the organization. By being a company that instills pride within each and every employee, we aspire to build market-leading businesses; global in scope - human in scale.

Reports to: Product Research & Development Leader (R&D)

Span of Control: Individual contributor

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES

Product Research & Development, Innovation and Product Improvement
Drive for innovation, product development and product differentiation to enhance product portfolio and establishes current and new products as a competitive advantage from consumer and financial perspectives with focus on innovation or renovation.

Assist in generating technical insights which can lead to discovering product intellectual property and novelty.
Identifies, understands and models the habits, choices and unarticulated needs of both our customers and end-users.
Utilize qualitative and quantitative tools to translate customer needs into product improvement recommendations and new product development.
Apply insights into actionable items to provide value propositions and project direction.
Conceive, plan, design, and conduct independent research on processes related to the development of fiberglass insulation products. Apply advanced scientific knowledge to projects. Follow direction provided by project goals and experimental design.
Prepare prototypes in lab and trials in the plant. Coordinate testing-to include monitor, organize, and interpret results. Draw conclusions, make adjustment, suggest direction for, and implement improvements to process and products. Recognize problems and initiate corrective actions. Communicate technical results to project teams. Author summary reports on technical findings, when applicable.
Interact with cross-functional teams, including Legal, QA, Purchasing, Operation/Manufacturing, Marketing, Sales to ensure creations meet business standards and project criteria.
Interact with top technical leaders, suppliers, and industry organizations seeking new innovative solutions and technologies to address complex challenges.
Continually seek opportunities, often in conjunction with Product Engineers, Product Managers and other functions, to drive renovation, reduce overall costs and improve quality of product (as appropriate).
Drive financial results by providing product development options that differentiate the brand from other competitive products in the marketplace. Works closely with Product Managers, Sales and Product Engineers refining and addressing quality concerns and overall aesthetics of the product.
Develop mechanistic understanding based on customer needs to develop new technologies/products which deliver irresistible superiority.
Identify key physical properties and performance attributes driving end-user preferences, choices and satisfaction in the context of fiberglass-based insulation products.

JOB REQUIREMENTS

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor’s degree in engineering or science field (preferably chemistry)

PREFERRED EXPERIENCE:

Advanced degree in engineering or science field (preferably chemistry)
Experience in consumer branded product development and/or process
Knowledge and familiarity of developing and maintaining intellectual property portfolios including patents and technology licenses
2-3 years managing all aspects of product development/innovation from (a) concept development, to (b) project engineering and (c) cross functional program management to launch the new products on time.
2-3 years planning and conducting ethnographic fieldwork, qualitative and quantitative research. Experience with diverse data collection methods such as participant-observation, semi-structured interviewing, audiovisual techniques and survey methods. Familiarity with statistical analysis, data analysis and reporting
2-3 years working in a laboratory setting, familiarity with basic instrumentation. Experience with method or experiment development is a plus.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:

Multi-functional leadership skills (ability to manage across functions from product marketing, operations and other R&D functions).
Demonstrated project management effectiveness in R&D and/or Manufacturing environments is strongly preferred (developing plant trials, communication plans, awareness of budget restraints, etc.).
Demonstrated track record of project leadership from concept to commercialization of large cross-functional teams.
Ability to present data to multifunctional audiences and drive the decision-making process.
Passion for understanding how things work and the ability to navigate through large data sets to provide project direction.
Ability to generate and translate innovative concepts into technically feasible and consumer-relevant products.
Ability to build strong relationships, collaborate and work across multi-functional and discipline boundaries in a dynamic, multi-project environment.
Practices safety-conscious behaviors in all operational processes and procedures.
Ability to adapt to an ever-changing environment and business.
Excellent written, presentation and verbal communication skills.
Ability to travel up to 25-40% of the time (varies depending on project need) is required",3.9,"OWENS CORNING
3.9","Granville, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1938,Company - Public,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
164,Risk Decision Scientist,$112k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are: Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal’s 286 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.

Job Description Summary: The PayPal Risk Platform is looking for a smart, self-motivated and strategic thinker to build out risk platform capabilities supporting emerging payment products and optimizations. This role will partner deeply with product managers, policy analysts and technology teams across risk, payments and core experiences to find synergies and build appropriate fraud controls optimized for the payments ecosystem. We are looking for product managers with Payments experience in the bank, card, tokenization or other related field with a passion for fighting fraud.

Job Description:

Understand and synthesize Risk business needs and platform strategy with various product groups with an emphasis on the payments ecosystem:

Developing expertise in specific areas by leading analytical projects independently, while setting goals, providing benefit estimations, defining workflows and coordinating timelines in advance.
Fight fraudulent activity in one’s domain of ownership by analyzing existing loss trends through review of specific cases, research on our payments database and incorporation of feedback from operations teams.
Produce accurate, automated risk solutions and manual handling policies to block fraudulent activities by declining payments, providing a step-up flow, adding accounts to the fraud review queue or restricting suspicious users.
Work closely with product teams on development of new products to identify potential gaps that might create loss and define requirements to mitigate those risks.
Have a good understanding of general business trends and directions to be able to put own work in the broad business context.
Work with various partners within PayPal to coordinate the execution of fraud mitigation solutions.
Develop controls and monitoring dashboards to ensure performance against business goal, regulatory requirements and business priorities.
Remain up-to-date on industry information, federal regulations and new products, while continuously learning from peers across the organization about fraud and fraud-prevention tools..
Be data-driven and outcome-focused

We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",4.0,"PayPal
4.0","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1998,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
165,Product Strategy Leader - Data Science Technologies,$98k-$158k (Glassdoor Est.),"What We'll Bring:

At TransUnion, we have a welcoming and energetic environment that encourages collaboration and innovation. We’re consistently exploring new technologies and tools to be agile. This environment gives our people the opportunity to hone current skills and build new capabilities, while discovering their genius.

Come be a part of our team – you’ll work with great people, pioneering products and cutting-edge technology.

What You'll Bring:

Advanced knowledge of the product management lifecycle management and go to market processes for B2B software in the data science and machine learning platform space
Experience in managing product portfolio of data science platforms, predictive analytic models, and machine learning commercialization in the financial space will be preferred
Minimum of 7 years’ experience from one of the following areas preferred: risk management, B2B data science technology services, financial services, and/or other similar fields
Understanding of how data science and risk analytics teams have implemented data science software and platforms in the risk analytics space
Undergraduate degree in finance, accounting, mathematics, engineering or one of the hard sciences. MA/MS/MBA or equivalent experience is a plus.
Deep knowledge and experience in product strategy and management, preferably in financial services, risk analytics, or data science technology
Strong leadership skills; ability to take initiative and ownership and effectively leverage resources to successful outcomes without constant direction
Strong problem solving skills; ability to break down complex problems into critical parts, identify the key causes and effectively prioritize and execute way forward
Proven ability to quickly grasp industry and business-wide concepts in order to assess implications to drive actions and to capitalize on opportunities
Strong critical thinking skills, ability to assimilate and understand new concepts in short time frames
Exceptional analytical skills; ability to logically and systematically visualize and efficiently tackle tasks
Superior communication skills (verbal and written)
Outstanding interpersonal skills and ability to work across functions and levels of seniority
Highly organized, excellent project management abilities
Advanced fluency in Excel, PowerPoint and Word
Comfort operating in and delivering high-profile results in ambiguous environments

#LI-JD1

Impact You'll Make:

The Product Strategy Leader - Data Science Technologies will work closely with the VP of Analytics Enablement Solutions to provide leadership in defining, developing, launching, and managing the global data science and analytics product portfolio. You will leverage your domain expertise in the data science platform and risk analytics space to drive the business forward with responsibility for all analytic enablement products globally with a focus on our Prama suite of solutions.

Your role will evolve as we form the group and initially, you will:

Work closely with the VP of Analytics Enablement Solutions to develop the vision and roadmap for the analytics suite of solutions
Accountable for the longer-term P&L performance and strategy for your product portfolio
Develop strategic insights based on market assessments grounded in primary and secondary research
Collaborate with Sales, Markets, Regions, Data Science, Global Technology, Marketing, and the broader Global Solutions Team to create and maintain business plans with clear and measurable targets while ensuring cohesive product offerings
Partners with International Product leads to ensure best practice sharing between US and TU International Markets
Develop and deliver senior level presentations to articulate business plans
Review and approve product backlogs
Assist in designing and establishing a process for continuous improvement of our analytics suite of solutions, leveraging a data-driven, hypothesis-test-learn approach
Gather competitive intelligence on an ongoing basis, monitor strategy and competitive response for key competitive solution sets

#LI-JD1

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability status, veteran status, marital status, citizenship status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other characteristic protected by law.

TransUnion's Internal Job Title:

Sr Advisor, Product Management",4.0,"TransUnion
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1968,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
166,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"At Sisu, we're building a software platform that empowers people to make better decisions using data. Based on years of cutting-edge research at Stanford, Sisu enables users to quickly and comprehensively understand what’s driving their key metrics, so they never miss a window of opportunity to act.

Sisu leverages the massive amounts of data available within private, first-party data warehouses, which capture a real-time, structured view of organizational behavior. By monitoring the performance of key metrics like revenue, retention, and churn, and their relationships to interactions between key factors like user demographics, campaigns, and acquisition channels, we can help users make better decisions. The key problem Sisu solves is to help identify what’s driving change among this enormous feature and hypothesis space. To do so, we combine statistical analysis and machine learning at scale to provide users personalized, real-time diagnoses of changes in their metrics via an explainable, interpretable user interface.

As a machine learning engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to shape the future of machine learning on massive, structured data. Much like public search engines rely on sophisticated models for ranking and relevance over unstructured text, machine learning is integral to Sisu’s value proposition of ranking and highlighting key drivers behind metrics derived from structured data. These results inform our users on how to take action as their businesses are changing.

You will be responsible for investigating and developing state-of-the-art algorithms in Sisu’s large-scale streaming structured data context. ML engineers at Sisu deliver their features end-to-end, from Jupyter notebook prototypes to production in Rust.
Responsibilities
Deliver state-of-the-art, scalable algorithms to production for forecasting time series, personalized ranking, robust statistical analysis of key customer business metrics
Build and maintain the infrastructure for data and model management
Work closely with the Sisu design and engineering teams for ML-adjacent components, such as viz and data processing
Give talks, write blog posts, and produce peer-reviewed publications
Preferred Qualifications
Either 4+ years of professional experience with ML or quantitative analysis, or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, or Physics
Proficiency with Python and experience with data processing tools (e.g., scipy, numpy, pandas, Pytorch, and Spark)
Competency with forecasting deadlines, modular design, testing, code review, and working with new codebases
Strong technical communication skills
Please note that this is a full-time, non-remote role based in San Francisco.

Sisu is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",4.1,"Sisu Data
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
167,AidData Research Scientist OR Senior Research Scientist,-1,"_Application Instructions_*
_For more details and to apply, please visit the position listing at the William & Mary Employment Opportunities portal (https://jobs.wm.edu/postings/39689). There, click Apply for this Job to apply with your resume/curriculum vitae, cover letter, and a peer-reviewed publication that highlights your ability to design and execute policy-relevant, empirical research with rigorous methods. This position closes at 11:59pm on October 15th, 2020._*
_*_
_*_*
_Research Scientist or Senior Research Scientist_*
AidData is currently recruiting for a Research Scientist (U13) OR Senior Research Scientist (U15), depending on the applicant’s qualifications. These positions are based in Williamsburg, VA. As such, applicants will be expected to relocate to the Williamsburg area in 2021.

The Research Scientist will provide intellectual leadership for AidData’s Tracking Under-reported Financial Flows program and work closely with the Director of Policy Analysis to provide technical and management oversight of the grants and contracts that support this program. The Research Scientist will assume the management, fiscal, and research integrity responsibilities of a Co-Principal Investigator on relevant, externally-sponsored research projects. The individual will also contribute to the conceptual development and preparation of grant and contract proposals in line with the mandate of the Tracking Under-reported Financial Flows program and Policy Analysis Unit, represent the program and unit externally in presenting research results to academic and policy audiences, and broker financial and partnership arrangements to advance the program and unit’s research agenda.

The Senior Research Scientist will provide intellectual leadership for AidData’s Tracking Under-reported Financial Flows program and provide technical and management oversight of the grants and contracts that support this program. This is a senior leadership position within AidData. The Senior Research Scientist will assume the management, fiscal, and research integrity responsibilities of a lead Principal Investigator on relevant, externally-sponsored research projects. The individual will lead the conceptual development and preparation of grant and contract proposals in line with the mandate of the Tracking Under-reported Financial Flows program, and represent the program externally to academic and policy audiences. The individual will also be responsible for brokering financial and partnership arrangements to advance the program’s research agenda, while ensuring the long-term health and sustainability of the program area.

Either position may include oversight of staff conducting data collection and analysis related to the nature, scope, distribution, and effects of Chinese, Russian, and Middle Eastern financing. Either role will be responsible for the successful delivery of analysis, datasets and tools related to sponsored research projects, including:
Financial oversight (managing budgets for active grants and contracts, developing proposals for new grants);
External client management (ensuring on-time, high-quality deliverables for external funders);
Personnel oversight (supervision of staff/research assistants);
Project/portfolio management (responsible for direct implementation of projects to produce data and derivative products); and quality assurance.
This position is located at the College of William & Mary in Williamsburg, Virginia. This is a full-time position, and salary is commensurate with experience and qualifications in the U13-15 range (see Salary Structure for University Employees).
Required Qualifications*
Research Scientist: *
A Master’s degree in a relevant discipline such as economics, political science, public policy, public affairs, international relations, international development, or development finance, or comparable education and experience;
Several years of relevant professional experience;
Demonstrated experience leading the design and implementation of externally sponsored research projects;
Experience writing compelling grant proposals and securing external funds for policy research projects;
Track record of submitting high-quality deliverables and progress reports in a timely manner to external research sponsors;
Track record of leading research collaborations;
Established subject matter expert in at least one domain relevant to the Tracking Under-reported Financial Flows program (e.g., China, Russia, Gulf Cooperation Council, development finance, foreign direct investment, blended finance, South-South cooperation, etc.);
Track record of designing and implementing innovative research methods;
Experience leading technical teams and projects and training/mentoring team members;
Experience working with large, complex datasets using one or more of the following: Stata, R, Python, SAS, SPSS;
Strong and effective communication skills;
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively in a demanding and complex work environment; to carry out assignments in a timely manner, and to adapt to changing situations and priorities;
Experience managing small to mid-size project teams and delivery schedules
Senior Research Scientist: *
A terminal degree in a relevant discipline with several years’ experience as a principal investigator or co-principal investigator;
Demonstrated academic rigor to lead the design and implementation of externally sponsored research projects as a Principal Investigator;
Established track record of designing and implementing innovative research methods;
Experience writing compelling grant proposals and securing external funds for policy research projects;
Track record of submitting high-quality deliverables and progress to external research sponsors;
Track record of publishing research in peer-reviewed journals or policy research that meets equivalent standards of scrutiny;
Experience with personnel management and fiscal responsibilities associated with externally-sponsored research projects;
Established track record of leading research collaborations (with and without external collaborators) that result in high-quality and high-profile research outputs;
Established subject matter expert in at least two domains relevant to the program (e.g., China, Russia, Gulf Cooperation Council, development finance, foreign direct investment, blended finance, South-South cooperation, etc.);
Track record of designing and implementing innovative research methods;
Extensive professional network and presence in relevant professional communities, including researchers across multiple domains;
Substantial experience leading large, interdisciplinary teams and technically demanding projects;
Demonstrated experience working with large, complex datasets using one or more of the following: Stata, R, Python, SAS, SPSS;
Strong and effective communication and presentation skills
Preferred Qualifications*
Research Scientist: *
A Master’s degree or Doctorate in a relevant discipline;
Extensive relevant professional experience;
Experience designing and/or managing large-scale data collection and/or research projects in developing country contexts;
Knowledge/experience with qualitative data collection and research methods (FGDs, interviews, Nvivo);
Advanced experience with data science methods (machine learning, web scraping, and text mining);
Demonstrated ability to implement rigorous analysis using experimental methods or quasi-experimental methods, including regression discontinuity, matching, difference-in-differences, instrumental variables estimation, social network analysis, and spatial analysis;
Experience preparing statistical code for reproduction of results by a third party;
Extensive knowledge and experience working with development finance or foreign direct investment data;
Detailed knowledge of aid classification schemes and experience in collecting, standardizing, and publishing data from multiple actors;
Experience delivering datasets and actionable research for policy and academic audiences;
Knowledge of the standards, best practices, and systems related to public service and/or international aid program delivery in developing countries
Senior Research Scientist: *
Doctorate in a relevant discipline such as economics, political science, public policy, public affairs, international relations, international development, or development finance or comparable advanced level experience;
Track record of obtaining research funding from a variety of funders;
Experience designing and/or managing large-scale data collection and/or research in developing country contexts;
Advanced proficiency/experience with data science methods (machine learning, web scraping, and text mining);
Demonstrated ability to implement rigorous analysis using experimental methods or quasi-experimental methods, including regression discontinuity, matching, difference-in-differences, instrumental variables estimation, social network analysis, and spatial analysis;
Demonstrated experience preparing statistical code for reproduction of results by a third party;
Extensive knowledge and experience working with development finance or foreign direct investment data;
Experience delivering datasets and actionable research for policy and academic audiences;
Extensive knowledge of traditional and non-traditional donor classification schemes (with a particular emphasis on Non-DAC donors like China, Russia and the Gulf Cooperation Council countries)
Application Instructions*
For more details and to apply, please visit the position listing at the William & Mary Employment Opportunities portal (https://jobs.wm.edu/postings/39689). There, click Apply for this Job to apply with your resume/curriculum vitae, cover letter, and a peer-reviewed publication that highlights your ability to design and execute policy-relevant, empirical research with rigorous methods. This position closes at 11:59pm on October 15th, 2020.
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement‍*
The College of William & Mary values diversity and invites applications from underrepresented groups who will enrich the research, teaching and service missions of the university. The College is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and encourages applications from women, minorities, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $87,000.00 - $105,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Writing grant proposals and securing external funding: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Location:
Williamsburg, VA 23185 (Required)
Language:
Russian (Preferred)
Chinese (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Required travel:
25% (Preferred)
Application Question:
Do you have experience leading the design and implementation of the externally sponsored research projects?
Company's website:
https://jobs.wm.edu/postings/39689
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Global Research Institute,"Williamsburg, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
168,"Scientist, Culture Science",$74k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rubius Therapeutics is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company developing a new class of medicines called Red Cell Therapeutics™. Our proprietary RED PLATFORM® was designed to genetically engineer and culture Red Cell Therapeutics™ that are selective, potent and off-the-shelf allogeneic cellular therapies for the potential treatment of several diseases across multiple therapeutic areas. Our therapies can potentially be used to kill tumors in cancer and to regulate the immune system for the treatment of autoimmune diseases. We are currently enrolling patients in a Phase 1/2 clinical trial of RTX-240, an allogeneic cellular therapy for the treatment of patients with relapsed/refractory or locally advanced solid tumors or relapsed/refractory acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Additionally, we plan to file an IND for RTX-321 for the treatment of HPV-positive tumors by year-end.
We are proud of our passionate, high-performance culture – one based on a set of values that are the cornerstone of who we are and how we hold ourselves accountable. Founded in 2013, we are headquartered in Cambridge, MA, and our manufacturing facility in Smithfield, RI was named 2020 Top 5 Best Places to Work in Rhode Island among medium-sized companies by Providence Business News. We are currently expanding across all functions within the organization. Red blood cells are no longer just for carrying oxygen. Check us out at www.rubiustx.com, or follow us on Twitter and LinkedIn or like us on Facebook.

Summary
We are looking for a Scientist to join our Culture Science (Rubius Prime) team to design & develop prototypes for our cultured RCT to advance Red Cell Therapeutic prototypes in Discovery. The candidate must be independent, goal oriented, technically competent and able to efficiently work across multiple projects. We are searching for enthusiastic, innovative, and highly motivated individuals, with deep scientific background in cell engineering and engineering processes to mammalian culture systems, who are comfortable working in a fast-paced entrepreneurial environment.
Responsibilities
Work closely with Discovery groups to design prototypes across multiple therapeutic groups
Work with a team of researchers to guide various scientific projects
Develop tools to improve the RCT platform for advancement of various discovery prototypes
Utilize strong knowledge of broad scientific and technical concepts and applies this towards assigned projects and department objectives.
Independently performs data analysis on complex data sets and/or assignments. Prepares summary reports and proper electronic notebook record keeping.
Communication of experimental plans and data to multiple cross-functional scientific teams
Support the continued protection, creation, and expansion of company’s intellectual property.
Assist in maintaining a strong, entrepreneurial and creative culture with a clear sense of urgency and focus on providing transformational therapies to patients.
Qualifications & Education
PhD degree in Biochemistry, Bioengineering, Chemical Engineering or related discipline and 2+ years of relevant laboratory experience, pharmaceutical or biotechnology industry preferred
Strong background in protein design, protein engineering, cell engineering, and development of methods to improve construct screening
Ability to apply deep understanding of the biology involved in cell differentiation for cell engineering.
Strong experimental skills and aseptic technique including handling of primary cell culture, mammalian cell lines, molecular biology skills
Experience with lenti-virus, stem cell culture, differentiation of cells, cell line development, and flow cytometry
Additional experience which is not required, but highly desirable for this role: Next Generation Sequencing (NGS) sample preparation and/or data analysis, MHC Associated Peptide Proteomics (MAPPs), cell-based reporter assay development
Passionate about working at the bench to independently contribute to research directions and solve challenging issues
Detail oriented, self-motivated, and comfortable working with highly technical projects and personnel
Ability to work on multiple projects simultaneously and deliver conclusive results
Highly adaptable and responsive to delivering for challenging commitments
Effective written and oral communication skills
Team oriented with strong work ethic
EEO Statement: Rubius Therapeutics is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.
Recruitment & staffing agencies: Rubius Therapeutics does not accept agency resumes unless contacted directly by internal Rubius Talent Acquisition. Please do not forward resumes to our careers@rubiustx.com account, Rubius employees or any other company location; Rubius Therapeutics is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.7,"Rubius Therapeutics
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
169,Sr Validation Scientist - Sterilization,-1,"Summary

Independently provides and/or directs the technical validation engineering support of process and/or equipment upgrades, replacements, and modifications in the laboratory, manufacturing or manufacturing support environment.

Requirement
Bachelor’s degree in Sciences/Engineering and 5 years of directly related experience
Validation expertise
Experience in:
Sterilization
Kaye Validator & Data loggers
Process Validation
Equipment Qualification
Computer System Validation
Technical Writing
Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Sterilization: 5 years (Preferred)
Equipment Qualification: 5 years (Preferred)
Process Validation: 5 years (Preferred)
Kaye Validator & Data loggers: 5 years (Required)
Computer System Validation: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)",-1,PRPDG,Puerto Rico,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
170,"Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist, Immunology",$35k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rubius Therapeutics is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company developing a new class of medicines called Red Cell Therapeutics™. Our proprietary RED PLATFORM® was designed to genetically engineer and culture Red Cell Therapeutics™ that are selective, potent and off-the-shelf allogeneic cellular therapies for the potential treatment of several diseases across multiple therapeutic areas. Our therapies can potentially be used to kill tumors in cancer and to regulate the immune system for the treatment of autoimmune diseases. We are currently enrolling patients in a Phase 1/2 clinical trial of RTX-240, an allogeneic cellular therapy for the treatment of patients with relapsed/refractory or locally advanced solid tumors or relapsed/refractory acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Additionally, we plan to file an IND for RTX-321 for the treatment of HPV-positive tumors by year-end.
We are proud of our passionate, high-performance culture – one based on a set of values that are the cornerstone of who we are and how we hold ourselves accountable. Founded in 2013, we are headquartered in Cambridge, MA, and our manufacturing facility in Smithfield, RI was named 2020 Top 5 Best Places to Work in Rhode Island among medium-sized companies by Providence Business News. We are currently expanding across all functions within the organization. Red blood cells are no longer just for carrying oxygen. Check us out at www.rubiustx.com, or follow us on Twitter and LinkedIn or like us on Facebook.

Summary
We are seeking a Senior Research Associate or Associate Scientist to join our Immunology group to help drive key Immunology programs. The candidate must be independent, goal-oriented, technically competent, and able to efficiently work across multiple projects. We are searching for enthusiastic, innovative, and highly motivated individuals, with a scientific background in immunology and/or cancer immunotherapy who leads from the bench and enjoys having broad responsibilities and opportunities to work independently and within a team.
Responsibilities
Work closely and collaboratively with a team of scientists in the Discovery teams on Immunology projects.
Design, plan and perform bench work independently for in vitro immune assays, in vivo studies, and ex vivo assays with indirect supervision.
Phenotyping immune populations, sample preparation for in vivo studies, sample analysis.
Utilize knowledge of broad scientific and technical concepts and applies this to assigned projects and department objectives.
Independently performs data analysis on complex data sets and/or assignments. Prepares summary reports and proper electronic notebook record keeping.
Communication of experimental plans and data to multiple cross-functional scientific teams
Assist in maintaining a strong, entrepreneurial, and creative culture with a clear sense of urgency and focus on providing transformational therapies to patients.
This is a hands-on position requiring the execution of laboratory experiments.
Qualifications & Education
BS or MS degree in biology, immunology, biochemistry, bioengineering or related discipline and 2-5 years of immunology related laboratory experience, pharmaceutical or biotechnology industry preferred.
Basic knowledge of immunology and systematic approach to understanding mechanism
Research background in immunobiology, immune modulation in disease models, cancer immunotherapy related experience preferred
Strong experimental skills, including tissue culture, primary immune cell culture, flow cytometry, ELISA, immunoassay development, and in vivo model development and sample processing
Passionate about working at the bench to independently contribute to research directions and solve challenging issues
Detail-oriented, self-motivated, and comfortable working with highly technical projects and personnel
Highly adaptable and responsive to delivering for challenging commitments
Effective written and oral communication skills
Team-oriented with a strong work ethic
EEO Statement: Rubius Therapeutics is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.
Recruitment & staffing agencies: Rubius Therapeutics does not accept agency resumes unless contacted directly by internal Rubius Talent Acquisition. Please do not forward resumes to our careers@rubiustx.com account, Rubius employees or any other company location; Rubius Therapeutics is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.7,"Rubius Therapeutics
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
171,"Data Scientist, Analytics",$119k-$191k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the team:


The Evernote Analytics team is responsible for providing data insights that inform and influence our product and business decisions. We are looking for data scientists who are passionate about using data to solve interesting or challenging problems, to shape the future of what we build at Evernote. The ideal candidate will have a background in a quantitative or technical field, will have experience working with complex data sets, and will have experience in data-driven decision making. You are intellectually curious, focused on results, and have demonstrated success in using analytics to drive the understanding, development, and success of product or marketing initiatives.

What you will do:
Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and data visualization to see beyond the numbers, understand how our users interact and engage with Evernote, and draw actionable insights
Partner closely with product, engineering and marketing teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Lead the definition of product and business success metrics, collaborate with working teams to ensure correct data tracking instrumentation for measurement
Build reports and dashboards to monitor KPIs (Key Performance Indicators), understand drivers of KPI changes
Help set up experiments, analyze and interpret results
Effectively communicate insights and recommendations to stakeholders
Design and implement predictive models to improve engagement, conversion, and retention
Lead ongoing decisions concerning data collection, test/study design and data analyses
What you have done:


Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Math, Finance, or other quantitative field
3+ years experience doing quantitative analysis
Experience in querying and manipulating large data sets using data querying languages (e.g. SQL), scripting languages (e.g. Python), or statistical/mathematical software (e.g. R, SAS, Matlab)
Experience with designing and deploying compelling dashboards using business intelligence tools (e.g. Tableau)
Knowledge in applied statistics (e.g. hypothesis testing, regressions, predictive modelings) or experimentation (e.g. A/B testing) in an industry setting
Ability to translate complex data into actionable insights for a non-technical audience
Who you are:
Strong problem solving and analytical skills
Driven self-starter with good attention to detail
Willingness to learn new technologies, tools and approaches to problem solving
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Experience working within the tech sector preferred
We are committed to an inclusive and diverse Evernote. We believe that different perspectives lead to better ideas, and better ideas allow us to better understand the needs and interests of our diverse, global Evernote Community. We welcome people of different backgrounds, experiences, abilities and perspectives and are an equal opportunity employer.

California privacy notice: Read our privacy policy for job applicants here",4.2,"Evernote
4.2","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
172,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
173,Scientist II DP Development,$69k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Akebia is seeking a motivated and talented scientist to join the Drug Product Development team of the Pharmaceutical Development – CMC department. The Scientist II role will support drug product formulation and manufacturing process development for projects ranging from pre-clinical to late stage clinical development. The qualified candidate must have experience and/or knowledge in oral solid dose preformulation, formulation development and/or process development.

Required Skills
Support formulation and process development activities at external laboratories
Manage GMP production campaigns at contract development and manufacturing organizations
Assist with the design and execution of pre-clinical and clinical formulation development studies for solid/liquid oral dosage products
Author, review and data verify drug product technical development reports, manufacturing/packaging batch records and other development-related documents
Participate in drug product-related regulatory filings and investigations
Collaborate with CMC and partner function lines, including discovery, drug substance development, analytical development, technical operations, supply chain, project/program management, quality and regulatory to achieve project deliverables and timelines
Travel and visit external sites to monitor and contribute to development activities
Required Experience
BS 6+ years of experience, MS 3+ years of experience or PhD 1+ years of experience in pharmaceutical dosage form development
Experience in phase-appropriate oral solid dose formulation development and manufacturing process development
Experience in conducting and managing drug product activities at CDMOs
Strong organizational, interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills
Solid fundamental understanding of biopharmaceutical and physicochemical properties relevant to formulation design and development
Candidate should be self-motivated, eager to contribute and willing to work collaboratively with team
Domestic and international travel (20-30%) is required for this position

Akebia Therapeutics, Inc. is a fully integrated biopharmaceutical company focused on the development and commercialization of therapeutics for people with kidney disease. The company was founded in 2007 and is headquartered in Cambridge, Massachusetts. For more information, please visit our website at www.akebia.com.

Akebia Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer and welcomes all job applicants. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability, or any other factors prohibited by law.

Agency and Third Party Recruiter Notice:

Agencies that submit a resume to Akebia for any position posted on our career page must have a current Akebia agency agreement executed by a member of the Human Resource Department. In addition, agencies may only submit candidates to positions for which they have been invited to do so by an Akebia Recruiter. All resumes submitted outside of these terms will not be considered.

Job Location
Cambridge, US-MA",4.4,"Akebia Therapeutics
4.4","Cambridge, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
174,Data Scientist - Intermediate,-1,"KellyMitchell matches the best IT and business talent with premier organizations nationwide. Our clients, ranging from Fortune 500 corporations to rapidly growing high-tech companies, are exceptionally served by our 1500+ IT and business consultants. Our industry is growing rapidly, and now is a great time to launch your career with the KellyMitchell team.

Data Scientist Intermediate

Required Skills / Experience:
• MS in computer science, machine learning, statistics, genetics, life sciences or closely-related with at least 1 years of industry or research experience
• Strong code development experience with these languages: R and Python
• Knowledge in SQL and experience with big data ecosystem
• Experience with coding best practices, version control and documentation
• Problem solving and analytical thinking
• Strong business aptitude, the ability to rapidly learn new problem domains, and become conversant in the domain with subject matter experts
• Strong organizational, interpersonal skills with proven ability to communicate complex qualitative analysis in clear, concise, and precise manner

Desired Skills / Experience:
• PhD in a quantitative field
• Experience with AWS or other cloud platform
• Experience with Docker and other DevOps tool and airflow or other workflow tool
• Knowledge of plant breeding and genomic prediction
• Experience with web development and object-oriented programming (OOP) and design experience
• Peer reviewed publication and a sense of urgency, identifies and overcomes obstacles",3.4,"KellyMitchell
3.4","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
175,Principal Scientist,-1,"Myeloid Therapeutics *
Role: *Principal Scientist, Translational Sciences
Myeloid Therapeutics is an immuno-oncology company developing its proprietary
ATAKTM myeloid cell program to cure cancer. ATAKTM cells are autologous myeloid cells that have been engineered to unleash their power to cure cancer. Our platform technology has demonstrated activity against hematological and solid tumor targets in preclinical models and we are translating these findings to the clinic.
Purpose: *
We are seeking an energetic and committed Principal Scientist that will be responsible for building the pre-clinical team within the Translational Sciences group. The successful candidate will be an outstanding scientist with expertise in immunology and experience in overseeing the design, execution and interpretation of all in vivo pharmacology studies.
S/he will also be expected to develop and maintain strong collaborations and relations with external experts in the non-clinical and clinical fields of immunology, immuno- oncology and autoimmune diseases. This individual will join a dynamic, rapidly growing, and highly collaborative team that combines significant drug discovery experience, including with pioneering technologies driving novel biological platforms.
Essential Job Responsibilities: *
• Propose, plan and manage and execute studies to characterize the anti-tumor activity of Myeloid’s proprietary cell therapies
• Lead a team of 1-3 scientists/ research associates
• Responsible for preparation of study reports, regulatory filings and project presentations
• Interface with external partners, clinical and academic collaborators, and CROs
• Provide high-level updates and advice to senior management, including evaluation of data and their potential impact on drug programs and clinical/regulatory strategy
• Provide development opportunities and mentoring to direct reports
Qualifications: *
Required:
• PhD. with more than 8 years of experience in immunology, or MS with 10+ years
• At least 5 years of experience working with rodents in a biopharmaceutical setting

• Deep understanding of rodent experimental models in both immuno-oncology and autoimmunity

• Proven experience in designing and executing _in vivo_ experiments, including hands-on experience with IP, IV, IP, PO injection, blood collection blood and tissue harvest
• Driven to deliver results to meet the company’s goals and timelines with the ability to handle multiple projects in parallel
• Rigorous with strong problem-solving and analytical skills
• Proficient in data collection/documentation of all study results in the form of notebook reports and regulatory documents
• Strong leadership, interpersonal and communication skills with an enthusiasm for participating in a fast-paced environment characterized by rigorous science and innovative thinking
• Ability to follow and promote safety instructions and regulations
• A team player and mentor, who listens effectively and invites response and discussion. A collaborator who communicates in an open, clear, complete, timely and consistent manner

Preferred
• Experience with flow cytometry (FACS and cell sorting), T cell activation assays, ELISA and/or histology
• Experience with engaging and managing external efforts with contract research organizations and academic collaborators
• Experience in cell therapies
• Contributed to the authorship of regulatory submission documents
• Broad disease related experience with firsthand knowledge in immno-oncology and/or autoimmune diseases
• Experience working within start up environment

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Experience:
In vivo models: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
https://www.myeloidtx.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Myeloid Therapeutics,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
176,Sr. Scientist,$52k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description:

JOB SUMMARY

Contribute to the overall success of GRAM’s analytical operations on behalf of our customers through contributing to an efficient Analytical Chemistry group in order to develop and transfer drugs into the GRAM facility. This role is responsible to create and oversee various studies including troubleshooting and problem solving for customer products. The individual will develop, transfer and validate analytical methods to support clinical and commercial manufacturing of sterile drug products.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES

Provide expertise in chromatography and spectrometry.
Solve complex analytical problems as well as recommend/implement continuous laboratory improvements.
Provide expertise in ICH Stability and test method development and validation.
Provide expertise in USP analytical method requirements.
Participate in discussions and recommend capital equipment investments for the department.
Deliver on departmental strategy through innovation, use of automation, and efficiency.
Work effectively in a team to achieve goals.
Communicate effectively in written and oral form. Write detailed scientific reports with full experimental details and give proper presentations.
Maintain clear, detailed, and up-to-date laboratory notebooks according to internal policies.
Follow safe laboratory practices and comply with EHS, safety officers, and delegates to ensure that the laboratory is a safe environment. Recognizes potential safety issues, discusses them with EHS and management, and takes action to rectify them.
Assume responsibility for laboratory equipment, ensure equipment is properly maintained and serviced.
Work closely with Manufacturing, Quality Assurance, Quality Control, Project Management, and Business Development.
Open to a flexible and fluid work environment.
Support Agency, customer and vendor audits as needed.
Responsible for exhibiting professional behavior with both internal/external business associates that reflects positively on the company and is consistent with the company's policies and practices.
Perform all other tasks, projects, and duties as assigned.
. Requirements:

DESIRED SKILLS AND ABILITIES

Advanced analytical chemistry skills (understanding, use, interpretation, and troubleshooting of HPLC, GC, FTIR, and UV).
Extensive knowledge and hands-on experience of drug formulation, and analytical validation for parenteral dosages.
Strong science and reasoning skills. The ability to plan, execute, critically interpret, and track the results from a logical progression of experiments in order to efficiently obtain definitive results.
Demonstrated ability to design and execute experiments using different laboratory instruments independently and author summary reports.
Understanding of pharmaceutical manufacturing and analytical labs in regulated environments under FDA, ICH, and EMA guidelines.
Ability to work with a diverse customer base.
Strong attention to detail; Ability to complete tasks with accuracy and efficiency.
Portrays appropriate levels of integrity and professionalism.
Capable of being the project lead for the Analytical Technical Services team
Excellent written and verbal skills; Ability to communicate effectively with clients, management and staff by exhibiting excellent interpersonal skills.
Energetic, self-motivated, organized individual who is accustomed to working in a deadline-focused, high-pressure entrepreneurial environment.
Results oriented and efficient; Acts with a sense of urgency.
Creative and open-minded individual who fosters an environment in which sharing of ideas is encouraged.
A Leader who is capable of training and overseeing other team members as necessary.
Demonstrates confidence in decision making ability and makes decisions while assessing risks.
Takes accountability and ownership.
Ability to work well independently and in a cross-functional team environment. Efficient team management skills.
Must have proficient computer skills in Microsoft Word, Excel and Outlook, Chromatographic Data Systems, and Document Management Systems.
Must be able to communicate in a professional manner with clients and regulatory agencies.

Qualified candidates possess a Ph.D. in Analytical Chemistry or closely related field with 5-10 years’ experience, or M.S. in Analytical Chemistry or closely related field with 7-12 years’ experience, knowledge of GLP and cGMP, and direct work experience in a laboratory environment. Equipment qualification/validation experience not required, but preferred",3.6,"Grand River Aseptic Manufacturing
3.6","Grand Rapids, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
177,Lead Global Data Science Oncology & External Supply (Onc ES),$94k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Lead Regional Data Science US & Japan in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

Global Data Science Lead for the GMS Onc ES Operational Units (OPU):
Drives design, execution und implementation of the overall GMS Data Science strategy for the GMS Onc ES OPU
Develops and owns detailed GMS Onc ES OPU scale-up and delivery execution roadmap for data science and manages respective functional and cross-functional interdependencies
Manages, gathers and executes GMS Onc ES OPU data science needs and execution of initiatives in collaboration with respective stakeholders and advises on the respective short and medium focus
Ensures and establishes Data Science capabilities GMS Onc ES OPU by establishing expert Data Science capability on all levels of data analytics
Provides the Data Science link across local, functional and global GMS OPU Data Science, IT, Engineering and GMS Onc ES OPU.

Accountabilities:

GMS Onc ES OPU Data Science strategy implementation
GMS Onc ES OPU detailed scale-up and delivery execution roadmap for data science:
Reviews data science possibilities/initiatives/requests in collaboration with IT and GMSGQ business stakeholders. Advises on the respective prioritization for short and medium focus.
GMS Onc ES OPU data science capabilities:
Review and establishes internal and external data science ecapabilities within GMS Onc ES OPU. Ensures GMS Onc ES OPU data science capabilities are sufficient to defined data scientist profile. Conducts and participates in technical interviews for data science capabilities. Executes and drives the data science training for GMS Onc ES OPU in collaboration with GMSCI Data Science Training excellence.
GMS Onc ES OPU data science initiatives portfolio
GMS Onc ES OPU functional and cross-functional interdependencies for data science
Ensures GMS Onc ES OPU representation in GMSGQ data science community.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Education / Experience:

University degree of science/business:
Advanced degree is required (Master/MBA and/or PhD), e.g. in Engineering , Mathematics, IT or Physics with focus on either Control Theory/Statistics/Mechatronics, Information/Operation, Management/Strategy, Technology and Innovation Management
Experience in applying and executing Digital/Big Data Analytics/ Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning, Machine Learning algorithms, Respective programming knowledge
Fluent in English

Digital & Data Science Skills:

Strong expertise and experience in Digital/Big Data Analytics/ Artificial Intelligence/Machine
Learning
Experience in Machine Learning algorithms (CNN, SVM, LSTM, etc.),
Respective programming knowledge of either MATLAB/Python/R required, further skills such as C++, SQL etc. are advantageous
Experience in quality mapping of parameters is a plus
Prior experience of Biostatistics, stochastic modelling and decision trees is a strong asset
Strong knowledge of Statistical Process Control Expertise in Bayesian statistics:
Experience in Density estimation
Solid knowledge in Bayesian Hypothesis Testing,
Solid knowledge in ANOVA and forecasting techniques (ARIMA, RMA, NARX)
Expertise in Signal Processing, Control Systems, Mechatronics

Behaviors:

Willingness to travel to various internal/external Takeda meetings and events:
International travel will be required (estimated 1 travel per 4-6 weeks for 1 week each)
Strategic enterprise thinking, finding innovative ways to serve patients build reputation and trust
Creating the environment that inspires and enables people
Focuing on the few priorities and provide superior results
Elevating capabilities for now and the future

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
178,Analytics Manager,$64k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsible for both high level and granular measurement of public and private variable marketing programs. Provide 1:1 program insights with regard to campaign offer performance and efficiency, audience segmentation and performance, ROI that drive future strategy

Provide Omni-channel performance metrics. Consult with modeling team to insure past program performance informs future audience modeling efforts. Assist with program business case development. Produce quarterly reporting of campaign results as well as additional ad hoc requests. Oversee team members work as needed. Multi-task across various programs and activities simultaneously

Must have:
Subject Matter Expertise in 1:1 marketing program measurement
Knowledge of SQL, Alteryx, and Microsoft Office preferred.
Familiarity with A/B testing or experimental design (i.e., treated/control groups) is also helpful.
Past experience analyzing marketing campaign results (e.g., incremental sales, net profit, ROI)
Ability to query, join, and manipulate data (e.g., create new variables as needed)
Experience meeting with clients directly to understand business needs and discuss findings
Ability to create PowerPoints containing graphs and insights into findings
Customer profiling experience
Ability to present findings to the client and team meetings
Additional Job Description

· Highly proficient utilizing SQL and Alteryx, tableau, Qlik, etc. to manipulate, arrange, query and present data

· Experience with complex problem solving – data manipulation, data quality, data modeling,statistical analysis and/or reporting

· Excellent interpersonal skills with people at all management and organizational levels

· Ability to respond in an effective and timely manner

· Subject matter expert in an analytics specialty

· BA / BS in Statistics, Mathematics, Econometrics or computer science

· Min 5-year experiences as analytics team lead or manager
OneMagnify is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.7,"OneMagnify
4.7","Dearborn, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1967,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
179,Machine Learning Engineer,$92k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you enjoy extracting value from our data? Does the prospect of leading the processes from data collection, cleaning, and preprocessing, to training models and deploying them to production excite you? If you answered “yes” to any of those questions, then we would love to talk with you about joining our Data Platform team as a Machine Learning Engineer.

Our purpose at The Motley Fool is to help people become Smarter, Happier, and Richer. We educate people on everything from how to choose the best credit card to how to make the most of their 401(k). We are looking for our next great Fool to lead our ML initiatives.

The ideal candidate will be a confident, experienced machine learning engineer who is passionate about machine learning and will stay up-to-date with the latest developments in the field.

Responsibilities:
Properly use statistical techniques
Use data exploratory techniques using visualization tools
Requirements gathering working with Business Owners and ability to explain insights.
Ability to use choose between a higher score versus explain
Understanding of time-series
Verifying data quality, and/or ensuring it via data cleaning
Analysis of data drift
Defining validation strategies
Defining the preprocessing or feature engineering to be done on a given dataset
Observing the best practices on training models
Automatically tuning hyperparameters using tools like Grid Search
Analyzing the errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them
Deploying models to production
Skills:
A minimum of 2 years of experience required
Proficiency with a deep learning framework preferred
Proficiency with Python and basic libraries for machine learning (PANDAS and Scikit-Learn)
Expertise in visualizing and manipulating big datasets
Proficiency with auto-ML and data modeling frameworks using AWS, Azure, and/or Google
Ability to select hardware to run an ML model
Communication skills and ability to collaborate with Data Engineers and Business Analysts
Adept with Data Wrangling techniques",4.6,"The Motley Fool
4.6","Alexandria, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
180,Autonomous Driving Data Engineer,$99k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"Leading the future of luxury mobility

Lucid’s mission is to inspire the adoption of sustainable energy by creating the most captivating luxury electric vehicles, centered around the human experience. Working at Lucid Motors means having a shared vision to power the future in revolutionary ways. Be part of a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity to transform the automotive industry.

We are currently seeking an experienced Big Data Engineer to help building up our large-scale data management system for the ADAS / Autonomous Driving team. This field allows contributions on various levels around the data pipeline and data processing, data annotation, machine learning, data ingestion, data pre-processing, integration of Deep Neural Network frameworks, efficient data search and high performance data manipulation.
You Will:
Work with a state-of-the-art data pipeline on the development and test process of the ADAS/AD features
Enable efficient data (pre-)processing in our cloud infrastructure
Contribute to the architecture and implementation of an efficient data ingestion process to transfer and store large-scale vehicle sensor data from our Lucid Air test vehicles efficiently into our data storage
Help to optimize the data storage, search and data processing based on a diverse mix of storage solutions, caching techniques and big data frameworks.
Contribute to the implementation of a secure distributed data access solution for data on-premise and via cloud providers to connect Lucid data with service providers and partners
Work with machine learning experts, testing engineers and software developers to solve challenging development problems
You Bring:
Knowledge of database systems, big data concepts and cluster computing frameworks (e.g. Spark, Hadoop, or other tools)
Excellence in C++, Python, Java or other related programming languages
Previous experience with big data applications or back-end software development
Experience with machine learning, data engineering, deep learning frameworks and related open-loop testing techniques
Strong communication skills
Great to Have:
Previous experience building efficient large-scale data collection, storage and processing pipelines
Understanding of cyber-security issues and best practices
Advanced degrees preferred
Education:
BS minimum in the areas of Computer Science/Engineering, Data Engineering or other related fields
4+ years of work experience or a PhD in a related field
LMHP

Be part of something amazing

Come work alongside some of the most accomplished minds in the industry. Beyond providing competitive salaries, we’re providing a community for innovators who want to make an immediate and significant impact. If you are driven to create a better, more sustainable future, then this is the right place for you.

At Lucid, we don’t just welcome diversity - we celebrate it! Lucid Motors is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, national or ethnic origin, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity and expression, marital status, and any other characteristic protected under applicable State or Federal laws and regulations.

To all recruitment agencies: Lucid Motors does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our careers alias or other Lucid Motors employees. Lucid Motors is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.9,"Lucid Motors
3.9","Newark, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
181,Principal Scientist/Director-Immunology,-1,"*Scismic *is supporting the growth of an early stage venture backed biotechnology company creating novel RNA Therapeutics!

We are seeking an exceptional researcher to join our team as a Principal Scientist or Director to join a team to design and evaluate candidate therapies for the treatment of cancer and autoimmune diseases. The ideal candidate is an immunologist with molecular and/or cellular training with experience in using gain-of-function techniques (transgenes, gene therapy, gene editing) to engineer immune cells to create therapeutic candidates. They will be able to lead a scientific team; possess strong oral and written communication capabilities; demonstrate excellent collaboration & interpersonal skills for matrix-based and extra-mural interactions; and be adept at problem solving in a dynamic environment.

*Responsibilities*
Lead a team of scientists to expand our therapeutic pipeline by:
-Evaluating oRNA constructs to express proteins of interestEvaluation oRNA constructs and formulation in relevant human and animal cell lines
-Evaluation oRNA constructs and formulations in in-house animal modelsAs needed, lead collaborations with extramural groups (CROs or academics) to design and execute evaluation of candidate oRNA formulations in established animal models.
-Actively participate within project teams and collaborate across interdisciplinary R&D programs.
-Independently design rigorous experiments, interpret data, and communicate findings in well-articulated presentations.
-Contribute to a positive and exciting work environment, contributing to a strong, entrepreneurial and creative culture.

*Qualifications*
-Passionate, adaptable scientist looking to make an impact in a biotech startup environment.
-PhD or equivalent in immunology with 5+ years of postgraduate research experience in the pharmaceutical or biotech industry.
-Proven track record of scientific excellence as demonstrated by publications and/or patents.
-Expertise leading teams in the following areas: Molecular mechanisms of immuno-oncology and/or autoimmunity
-Engineering immune cell effector or regulatory function (ideally both)
-Animal models of cancer and autoimmune diseaseNew modality therapies, such as RNA, gene therapy or gene editingProtein and nucleic acid manipulation

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* Dental insurance
* Health insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Work Remotely:
* No",-1,Scismic,"Cambridge, MA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
182,"Scientist I, Analytical Development",$51k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scientist I, Analytical Development
Location


CORPORATE - Seattle

# of openings

1

Job Posting


Scientist I, Analytical Development

Scientist I, Analytical Development

This position will primarily be responsible for the development, transfer, qualification, and validation of potency bioassays in support of clinical development and commercialization of antibody therapeutics. The Scientist may also contribute to the development, transfer, and qualification / validation of impurity ELISAs and analytical HPLC and/or CE methods to monitor physicochemical quality attributes for both protein and small-molecule therapeutics. The individual will develop and implement methods for characterization, contribute to tech transfer to clinical and commercial stage CROs / CMOs, and provide input to and manage external CROs who may develop and implement methods for characterization, release, and stability testing.

Come join our highly talented CMC Team and help shape the future of Omeros!

Who is Omeros?

Omeros is a commercial-stage biopharmaceutical company committed to discovering, developing and commercializing small-molecule and protein therapeutics for large-market as well as orphan indications targeting inflammation, complement-mediated diseases and disorders of the central nervous system.

The company’s drug product OMIDRIA® (phenylephrine and ketorolac intraocular solution) 1% / 0.3% is marketed in the U.S. for use during cataract surgery or intraocular lens (IOL) replacement to maintain pupil size by preventing intraoperative miosis (pupil constriction) and to reduce postoperative ocular pain. In the European Union, the European Commission has approved OMIDRIA for use in cataract surgery and other IOL replacement procedures to maintain mydriasis (pupil dilation), prevent miosis (pupil constriction), and to reduce postoperative eye pain.

Omeros has multiple Phase 3 and Phase 2 clinical-stage development programs focused on: complement-associated thrombotic microangiopathies; complement-mediated glomerulonephropathies; Huntington’s disease and cognitive impairment; and addictive and compulsive disorders. In addition, Omeros has a diverse group of preclinical programs and a proprietary G protein-coupled receptor (GPCR) platform

What will your responsibilities be?

Your specific job responsibilities will include:
Analytical method development, testing, transfer, qualification, and validation in a GLP and/or GMP environment
Troubleshoot typical method and equipment challenges
Write standard test methods, technical reports summarizing analytical data, and qualification / validation reports
Participate in cross-functional teams as a representative of the Analytical Development group
Assists in trouble-shooting CMC-related problems from CROs / CMOs
Assists in investigations involving data generated internally and by CROs / CMOs
Ensures laboratory equipment is calibrated and maintained in proper working order to enable compliance with GLP and/or GMP environments
Contribute to drafting regulatory submissions
Ensures compliance with all applicable regulatory guidelines
Education and Experience needed:
Demonstrated knowledge and experience developing potency ELISAs for protein therapeutics and interpreting data is required
Knowledge and experience transferring, troubleshooting, and validating assays is required
Knowledge and experience developing HPLC and/or CE based methods is a plus
Small and large molecule experience is desired
Demonstrated problem-solving capabilities
Knowledgeable in global regulatory CMC documents
Familiar with GMPs and qualification / validation practices
(for Ph.D.) or (for B.S.) years of biotechnology and/or pharmaceutical industry experience required
BS, MS or Ph.D. in biology, biochemistry, analytical chemistry, or a related field
Experience with “start-up” biopharma company desirable
Excellent communication, analytical, and organizational skills required
Other Requirements:

Behavioral Competencies Required:
Must have the ability to build and maintain positive and collaborative relationships with management and peers
Excellent written and verbal communication skills required
Must display strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Attention to detail required
Physical Demands Required:
Intermittent physical activity including bending, reaching, pushing, pulling, or lifting up to 40 lbs.
May encounter prolonged periods of sitting
This position requires working with and near hazardous material .
This is an opportunity for you to be a key member of a collaborative group contributing your talent and expertise to a company that has an exciting pipeline. If you have the knowledge, skills and experience we are looking for, we’d love to hear from you!

Omeros is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to status as a protected veteran or a qualified individual with a disability, or other protected status such as race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.

It is our policy to provide reasonable accommodation to anyone with a disability who needs assistance completing the job application process. If you need assistance, you can either send an e-mail to hr@omeros.com or contact Omeros, asking for Human Resources, at (206) 676-5000.",3.3,"Omeros
3.3","Seattle, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
183,Principal Data Scientist,$113k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Principal Data Scientist, Oncology
The Machine Learning and AI team in AstraZenecas Oncology Data Science group is where we develop and apply sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve the hardest problems in oncology drug discovery and development. The team uses their scientific, quantitative, and problem-solving skills to work on a broad range of challenges across the whole oncology portfolio, working collaboratively with other scientists across a range of disciplines to scope, define, and deliver projects that both advance the state of the art in data science and accelerate the delivery of innovative medicines to patients.

NOTE: This position can be filled in either GAITHERSBURG MARYLAND OR WALTHAM, MASSACHUSETTS

As a Principal Data Scientist, you will play a key role on the front line in this rapidly growing team working to extract insight from complex biomedical data. You will develop your leadership skills and apply and develop your expertise in rigorous quantitative data science to provide solutions to a variety of data science problems, researching, recommending and delivering novel methodologies to solve the problems that matter to the oncology pipeline.

Examples of projects the team works on include developing machine learning models for digital biomarkers, patient risk stratification for clinical trials, new algorithms for survival analysis, approaches to quantitatively analyse wearable data, linking of medical imaging data with omics and longitudinal outcomes to identify and/or validate new drug targets, and much more!

Day-to-Day:
Developing novel data science and machine learning solutions where off-the-shelf methodologies do not fit.
Leading small (2-3 person) data science projects of defined scope.
Coaching/mentoring junior data scientists and others to drive the development of data science as an AZ capability.
What You'll Need:

Essential:
MSc degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering)
Extensive hands-on experience applying data science tools in practice.
Practical software development skills in standard data science tools (such as R or python)
Extensive knowledge of mathematical modelling and statistical modelling techniques and drive to continue to learn and develop these skills
Outstanding communication, business analysis and consultancy
Desirable:
PhD degree in rigorous quantitative science (such as mathematics, computer science, engineering).
Experience within the pharmaceutical industry.
In-depth experience of working in a global organization with complex/geographical context",4.1,"AstraZeneca
4.1","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1913,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
184,Geospatial Data Scientist,-1,"GEOSPATIAL DATA SCIENTIST*
\*\*\*Must have an active DoD Top Secret / SCI Security Clearance\*\*\*
Job Description: *
We currently have an immediate position available for a Geospatial Data Scientist to support a large task order for the Department of Defense at our customer site in Washington, DC. As a member of our core team, you will have an exciting and challenging opportunity to work with emerging technology and a large collection of data sources, engage with a large team of highly skilled professionals, and enjoy a healthy and friendly workplace.
Minimum Requirements: *
8+ years MINIMUM of experience in Intelligence Analysis
Bachelors or Masters degree in Intelligence Analysis, related field, or equivalent experience.
Ability to create high quality finished geospatial intelligence products requiring minimal revisions or modifications.
Must have experience using geospatial intelligence analysis and imagery tools such as ArcGIS, Analyst Notebook, Q-GIS, Image Product Library, and Intelink.
Familiarity with Modernized Integrated Database (MIDB), NES, M3, Data Xplorer suite, Target Profiler, and other community systems are desirable
Ability to work with and identify patterns of life in very large data repositories and cross-correlate metadata across multiple data sources.
Ability to identify new emerging data sources that provides value to the overall mission requirements.
Python scripting and Jupyter experience a strong plus.
Ability to work independently with minimal oversight.
Strong communication and leadership skills.
Responsibilities: *
Conduct research and analysis of data and create finished intelligence products.
Review data ingest streams for anomalies in support of QA/QC activities.
Validate accuracy of geolocations in big data systems using sampling and vetting techniques.
Coordinate data requirements with collection teams and developers.
Perform light scripting in support of analysis and QA/QC.
Populate various databases with results of analytical findings.
Disseminate a broad array of intelligence data analysis products dealing with subject profiles, networks, facilities, and resources.
Our Company: *
BigBear, Inc.* is a software development company with locations in San Diego, Washington DC, Charlottesville, and Reston, VA. Our mission is to enable big data computing and analytics for our customers at a low cost. We leverage capabilities such as machine learning, crowdsourcing, geospatial image processing, and Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) data processing using our on-premise cloud computing technology stack. Our solutions provide a unique offering of products, custom-built software, and services focused within Big Data Analytics, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS), Visualization and Cloud Computing to our Department of Defense, and Commercial customers. We currently have exciting and challenging career opportunities for talented, motivated individuals who want to be part of a fast-growing company.
Our Team: *
We like to play with new toys and technologies. We like to break things to see if we can put them back together again in a better way. Our tails wag when we hear the words Big Data, Geospatial or Machine Learning. Each team member provides a unique set of advanced technical skills and trade that contributes to our overall success.
Perks/Benefits: *
· 100% employer-paid for Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance (PPO)

· A competitive salary based on experience

· Flexible Spending Account (FSA) - optional

· 401(k) with dollar-for-dollar match up to 6%

· A warm, cozy office with actual chairs and tables

· Life and Disability Insurance 100% paid for by the company

· Education Assistance

· 529 College Savings Plan - optional

· Healthy Rewards Program

· Pre-paid Legal & Identity Theft Protection - optional

· Gym Reimbursement

· Pet Insurance - optional

· A shiny magical machine that does wonderful things

· Flexible Hours

· Unlimited Coffee, Drinks and Snacks

· 6 WEEKS of Paid Time Off (PTO) on top of 11 Paid Holidays!
BigBear is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Team members will eventually report to a specific work site in Washinton D.C. but for the time being we are working from home for the safety of our team members.

Experience:
Intelligence Analysis: 6 years (Preferred)
MIDB: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Washington, DC 20032 (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Company's website:
www.bigbear.io
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"BigBear, Inc.
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
185,Data Analyst,$43k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

Develop, implement, and maintain leading-edge analytic systems, taking complicated problems and building simple frameworks
Identify trends and opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets
Evaluate organizational methods and provide source-to-target mappings and information-model specification documents for data sets
Create best-practice reports based on data mining, analysis, and visualization
Evaluate internal systems for efficiency, problems, and inaccuracies, developing and maintaining protocols for handling, processing, and cleaning data
Work directly with management and users to gather requirements, provide status updates, and build relationships
Work closely with project managers to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from stakeholders or out of self-initiated curiosity with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources
Define and implement data and integration logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools within defined technology stack to ensure optimal scalability and performance of the solution
Develop and maintain databases by acquiring data from primary and secondary sources, and build scripts that will make our data evaluation process more flexible or scalable across data sets (1.) Suggest design solutions (2.) To participate and facilitate the walkthrough’ to brief the Functional Specification mapping to Business Requirements. (3.) To prepare the functional specification document and ensure for completeness and storage. (4.) To prepare and / or aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements (5.) To understand the business requirements and map it to functional specifications.

Required Education and Experience:

Bachelor's degree in a related field and 2 years’ experience in Business Intelligence (BI) or Data Warehouses and 2 years’ experience working with SQL and Access. Four additional years of related experience will be considered in lieu of a Bachelor's degree.
5 years experience in quantitative analysis and statistical modeling (regression, correlation, clustering, etc.).
4 year of experience consulting or experience in a similar field requiring client collaboration, presentation, and delivery.
3 years experience using analytics tools and languages R, Python, SAS, Oracle and SQL etc.
3 years experience combining data sets, extracting key variables, and creating new variables to enhance modeling.
3 years experience performing basic ETL functions and understanding of data quality steps/measures.
US Citizen; no dual citizenship.
Minimum of a Secret Interim clearance to start (Day 1 requirement).
CompTIA Security+ certification required to start (Day 1 requirement).
Adept at using Access, Excel, Power Point and Word.
General Data Warehouse / Business Intelligence knowledge including data modeling and Key Performance Indicators (PKIs) preferably in the SAP Business Objects environment.
AWS experience highly desired

#ind#

CDO is an Equal Opportunity Employer",3.4,"CDO Technologies Inc
3.4","San Antonio, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
186,Senior Data Scientist,$91k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data everyday and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve the American dream on our realtor.com website and mobile apps.

What will you do?

We seek a highly seasoned Senior Data Scientist to join our experienced data science team and help take it to the next level. As a key member of the team, you will be responsible for the development of innovative concepts, research, predictive modeling, and machine learning algorithms. You will serve as a mentor for the junior data scientists on the team and provide guidance on their individual projects.

Responsibilities:
Develop predictive, explanatory models and machine learning algorithms.
Create automated learning systems that gracefully scale to increasing complexity and expectation.
Perform exploratory analysis on realtor.com's wealth of data including consumer web and mobile behavior and North America's most comprehensive and up-to-date listings and properties data set.
Effectively partner with product and engineering teams to build new data driven and machine learning based features for enriching the consumer experience of home shoppers, renters and sellers.
Design and build data science solutions to drive revenue growth, customer retention and support strategic decision making.
Generate descriptive visualizations and presentations to communicate insights.
Drive A/B & multivariate tests and design of experiments to facilitate testing of new product and design features, with focus on improving engagement, retention, and conversion.
Help improve the scope of our data sets by identifying new data collection and procurement opportunities on an ongoing basis.
Mentor a team of data scientists on data exploration, machine learning and developing data-oriented products.
Work with a sense of ownership and urgency, advocate for experimentation based, agile culture.
What will you bring?
Requirements:
MS in computer science, statistics, mathematics, operations research or related fields.
3+ years of relevant experience in data science, machine learning or applied statistics.
Experience with Machine Learning, NLP or Computer Vision and data mining tools and underlying algorithms.
Experienced in Python, R, Spark or other languages and frameworks appropriate for large scale analysis of structured and unstructured data.
Working experience with relational databases (SQL) and large scale distributed systems.
Experience with experiment design and A/B and multivariate tests.
Proven track record of developing online data products.
Strong creative thinking and problem solving skills.
Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skills.
About realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.

#LI-IH1",2.9,"realtor.com
2.9","Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
187,"Sr. Scientist, Cell Therapy R&D",$57k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are: *The Secant Group is an advanced technology biomaterials company headquartered in Telford, Pennsylvania, with manufacturing facilities in Quakertown and Perkasie, Pennsylvania. Secant provides innovative solutions through next-generation materials, structures, textile designs, and process technologies for the medical device, pharmaceutical, aerospace and energy markets.
What we're looking for: *Based in our Telford, PA facility, the Sr. Scientist, Cell Therapy R&D, will be primarily responsible for driving early stage research centered on the development of manufacturing platforms to support the cell therapy market. Working independently, the Sr. Scientist will be responsible for identifying and providing solutions to unmet needs in cell-based manufacturing processes. This includes bringing a product from concept through design, prototyping, development testing and validation. This individual will work with both internal and external stakeholders and collaborators.
What you'll do: *
Working both independently and within a small multidisciplinary team, drive the development of novel solutions for cell processing and expansion in CAR T and other cell manufacturing platforms.
Serve as cell biology subject matter expert and provide technical leadership to others and make decisions to set directions for multiple projects.
Develop and perform analytical assays to characterize manufacturing process steps.
Collaborate with business development to understand unmet needs and customer requirements for cell processing.
Define, participate in, and manage CMO and CDMO relationships.
Reviews and critically assesses patents and other forms of intellectual property.
Actively develops intellectual property through the filing of patent applications.
Clearly communicates technical information and project status to supervisor and colleagues through written and verbal means.
Accurately and thoroughly documents procedures and results using laboratory notebooks, protocols & reports, records and databases.
Effectively collaborates with colleagues on laboratory techniques, sample preparation, instrumentation, data analysis and documentation.
Follows all applicable Company test methods, work instructions, S.O.P.’s, and guidelines.
Performs other job-related responsibilities as assigned.
Who you are: *
MS degree in the field of Biological Sciences, Cell Biology, Bioengineering, Chemistry, Biology, Biomedical Engineering, Materials Science or equivalent. PhD is highly desirable.
3+ years’ direct experience in cell therapy manufacturing.
Ability to work in a high paced team environment, meet deadlines, and prioritize work on multiple projects.
Knowledge of autologous and allogenic CAR T processing.
Practical experience with mammalian cell culture, fluorescence imaging, cell health and viability assays, flow cytometry, PCR. Experience with T Cell or Pluripotent SC culture is highly desirable.
Prior work experience in a regulated environment (ISO 9001, 13485 and QSR Standards) a plus.
Ability to accurately analyze data generated by various analytical and physical testing instrumentation.
Solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists.
Why join us: *We promote a collaborative, high energy and fast-paced environment. Using fact-based data, our team members strive to constantly improve our processes and products. We nurture an environment where employees can creatively innovate solutions that drive impactful results both for the business and themselves.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Employee Discount
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Referral Program
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Location:
Telford, PA 18969 (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
secant.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",2.9,"Secant Group, LLC
2.9","Telford, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
188,Senior Data Engineer,$91k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our Data Warehouse team is looking to add a Senior Data Engineer. Qualified applicants will have 5-7 years’ experience in a Data Engineer position with a background supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency, and workload management. Ideal candidates will be experts in Talend, Python, Snowflake, CID and SQL.

Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job duties
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, including building a data pipeline infrastructure for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL , cloud based relational or non-relational databases employing Talend, and/or scripting languages like Perl/Python
Build complex data platforms, and large scale CI/CD data pipelines utilizing a variety of technologies (REST APIs, Teamcity, Jennkis) and cloud databases (Snowflake)
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements, including automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in the organization’s data integration platform
Collaborate with technical staff to identify, learn, and understand software problems
Follow established configuration/change control processes
Identify options for potential solutions and assessing them for both technical and business suitability
Work closely with peers, stakeholders, and end users to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction
Essential Skills
A minimum of 5 years of developing ETL processes using Talendnformatica including the processing of NoSQL and JSON formats. Talend Certification preferred.
Strong skills with Ant, Maven, GIT, Jenkins, TeamCity.
Experience in writing Jenkins, Teamcity pipeline groovy, PowerShell scripts
Strong skills in source code repository tools such as Clear Case, SVN, CVS, and Git.
Advanced working knowledge in scripting languages, including Python, Perl and Shell.
Deep understanding of ETL, ELT, Talend, Informatica, Hadoop
Demonstrate independence, creativity, and initiative; as well as the ability to master the company's product architecture and its business goals
Experience in working in an Agile project management environment
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills
Superb verbal and written communication skills
Location: San Jose, CA 95134

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position",3.2,"First Tech Federal Credit Union
3.2","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
189,LEAD COMPUTER SCIENTIST - LEAD ENGINEER - PRINCIPAL ENGINEER - SPACE AVIONICS,$77k-$150k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


As a recognized leader in space systems, SwRI develops avionics, data storage, and on-orbit processing electronics enabling next generation missions throughout the solar system.


Objectives of this Role:

As part of SwRI’s Space Avionics Flight Software Team, you’re work will benefit humankind through enabling scientific discoveries, improved weather forecasting, in-orbit satellite servicing, and revolutionizing on-orbit processing.

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Lead, design, develop, and verify mission, spacecraft and instrument flight software for a variety of space applications applying sound software engineering disciplines and practices.
Perform and direct all phases of the system lifecycle including proposal development, applied research, requirements generation, design, implementation, testing, integration, installation, and documentation.
Perform software project management functions including project planning, cost and schedule development, progress tracking against plans, programmatic and technical reviews, etc.
Support related systems engineering activities and maintain relationships with other technical disciplines and project functional areas.
Interact and interface with clients including developing technical presentations. Travel to client and team organization facilities is required and varies by project.

Requirements:


Requires an Bachelors with a 3.00 GPA in Software Engineering, Software Development, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or related
At least 8 years of direct experience designing software for high reliability embedded systems. Experience in working with hardware preferred
Must be able to work independently and in project team environments
Must have good organizational skills and attention to detail
Must be an embedded systems software designer/developer, have experience with real time operating systems, and be familiar with the design of real-time systems. Proficiency in C/C++ for embedded systems, including algorithm and data structure design required
Experience with networking/socket programming and Python, as well as, familiarity with VxWorks, embedded Linux, RTEMS OS for embedded systems
Interest and/or experience in working with hardware and direct space flight design experience a plus
Excellent Communication Skills and the ability to thrive in a collaborative team environment
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas | Austin, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Space Science & Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
190,"Principal Scientist, Discovery",$121k-$234k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role Description:
We are looking for a highly motivated principal scientist to join the Discovery Immuno-Oncology group at Jounce Therapeutics. The successful candidate for this position will play a leading role within a team of scientists engaged in the discovery and testing of novel cancer immunotherapeutic biologics. Direct program leadership of one or more early discovery programs including managing timelines, driving key go/no-go decision making, communication of program strategy and progress, contributing to regulatory filings, and management of multiple reports are key elements of this position. The candidate must be capable of working across functional groups and possess superb oral and written communication skills. The ideal candidate should be a highly motivated self-starter capable of working independently and as part of a team.
Responsibilities:
Lead development and execution of one or more early discovery programs.
Provide both immuno-oncology guidance and technical expertise to a cross-functional team.
Present program strategy and progress to research leadership and senior management teams.
Assist in management of program budget and deliverables.
Play a leading role in the Discovery IO group by sharing ideas, data, and working closely with colleagues to ensure success of entire early portfolio.
Drafting documents in support of regulatory filings.
Management of multiple direct and/or indirect reports.

Requirements:
Doctoral degree (Ph.D., M.D., M.D./Ph.D.) or equivalent in Immunology or Cancer Immunology, postdoctoral experience of 1-4 year, with 5+ years industry experience a plus.
S/he will have a strong background in Immunology, with a track record of successfully advancing early target programs in an industry setting.
S/he should have managed multiple direct reports and/or managed project teams.
Publications in top tier journals, and/or patents.
Excellent organizational, communication and presentation skills.
Strong time management skills and focus to drive toward key decision points on target programs.
Able to thrive in a highly collaborative, fast-paced, team-oriented environment with colleagues from diverse disciplines but with the capacity to work independently.
Ability to think creatively and critically to make a measurable impact on projects is an important aspect of this role.
A passion for bringing novel therapeutics to cancer patients.
Experience with technical report writing and IND filings

Equal Opportunity Employer
Jounce Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in its employment decisions on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental disability, marital status, religion, creed, sex, or political beliefs. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package. All applicants should be legally entitled to work for any employer in the U.S.
To apply, please visit https://careers-jouncetx.icims.com/.

Company Overview
Jounce Therapeutics, Inc. is a clinical-stage immunotherapy company dedicated to transforming the treatment of cancer by developing therapies that enable the immune system to attack tumors and provide long lasting benefits to patients through a biomarker-driven approach. Through the use of its Translational Science Platform, Jounce first focuses on specific cell types within the human tumor microenvironment to prioritize targets, and then identifies related biomarkers designed to match the right immunotherapy to the right patient. Jounce currently has four development-stage programs, two of which are clinical-stage: vopratelimab, a monoclonal antibody that binds to and activates ICOS, and JTX-4014, a PD-1 inhibitor intended for combination use with Jounce’s broader pipeline. Vopratelimab is currently being assessed in a Phase 2 clinical trial, EMERGE, and Jounce plans to initiate an additional Phase 2 biomarker trial using TISvopra for patient selection, SELECT, to assess vopratelimab in combination with JTX-4014. Jounce’s IND-enabling preclinical programs include JTX-8064, a LILRB2 receptor antagonist and JTX-1811, a monoclonal antibody designed to selectively deplete T regulatory cells in the tumor microenvironment. For more information, please visit www.jouncetx.com.",4.4,"Jounce Therapeutics
4.4","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
191,"Clinical Laboratory Scientist (CLS), Full Time, Nights",$27-$45 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Adventist Health is more than an award-winning health system. We provide whole-person care to our communities and champion the greater good - from the operating room to the boardroom, we are driven by our unique passion to live God's love through health, wholeness and hope. From Oregon to Oahu, we have a calling to always do more. Now is your chance to apply your passion to our mission.

Nestled at the western edge of Little Lake Valley in Willits, California, Adventist Health Howard Memorial features key services including 24-hour emergency care, intensive care, surgery, an orthopedic joint center, diagnostic imaging and laboratory services, to name a few. It is also the first hospital to pilot-test the AMA’s 2017 Healthy Food Options in Hospitals policy. Howard Hospital’s Nutrition team is serving wellness daily, with fresh fruits and vegetables from the hospital’s Commonwealth garden in partnership with the Howard Foundation.

A charming rural town, Willits is considered the ""Gateway to the Redwoods"" nestled among majestic redwood trees and close to the coastal towns of Fort Bragg and Mendocino. Home to excellent trails and nature areas for hikers, campers and bicyclists, Willits is an outdoor enthusiast’s dream. It is also known as the home of the legendary racehorse, Seabiscuit.

We're looking for someone to join our team as a Clinical Laboratory Scientist who:

Prioritizes and performs a wide variety of clinical laboratory tests on various biological specimens. Reviews, evaluates, documents and reports results. Preserves confidentiality of patients and follows lab safety and maintenance protocols. Trains and supervises trainees, laboratory assistants and clerks as needed.
Essential Functions: *
Employs positive patient identification procedures to ensure the integrity of each specimen for pre-analytical, analytical and post-analytical testing. Performs proper specimen collection (including phlebotomy procedures as necessary), labeling, handling, preservation or fixation, processing or preparation, transportation and storage. Adheres to Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) and other patient confidentiality guidelines and regulations.
Prioritizes lab orders according to type (STAT, ASAP, routine and timed studies) and performs various testing (including chemistry, coagulation, hematology, special chemistry, urinalysis, blood bank, serology, immunology, bacteriology, microbiology, referral testing and more) following prescribed quality assurance policies and procedures. Performs, evaluates and documents quality control checks. Reviews testing results evaluating validity of test results in comparison to anticipated results indicated per procedure manual.
Reviews and evaluates the validity and accuracy of test results, recognizing the interdependency of tests, the physiological conditions affecting results, patient age and normal values, controls, linearity errors, instrument codes, delta checks and more. Correlates test results with diagnoses and questions incompatible results. Thoroughly documents and communicates test results, expediting all critical values and results to appropriate clinicians.
Disposes of contaminated materials and equipment in accordance with policy and assures that work area is properly cleansed after each test. Performs equipment and instrumentation maintenance, troubleshooting and calibration as needed. Inventories and restocks reagents, calibrators, controls and supplies as needed.
Participates in the collection and evaluation of data for Performance Improvement evaluations. Documents adverse events using incident reporting tool. Orients, instructs and supervises laboratory assistants and clerks as needed.
Performs other job-related duties as assigned.
You'll be successful with the following qualifications:
Education: *
Bachelor's Degree in medical technology, clinical laboratory science, biological sciences, chemical sciences or allied health technologies or equivalent: Required
Work Experience: *
Clinical laboratory experience: Preferred
Required Licenses/Certifications: *
Valid Clinical Laboratory Scientist (CLS) license in state of employment: Required
Current certification from American Society for Clinical Pathology (ASCP) or National Credentialing Agency for Labs (NCA): Preferred
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Night shift
License/Certification:
Clinical Laboratory Scientist License (Preferred)
ASCP Certification (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",3.5,"Adventist Health
3.5","Willits, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1973,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
192,Medical Lab Scientist - PRN Night Shift,$14-$20 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Thank you for considering a career at Bon Secours!

Performs routine and specialized moderate and high complexity laboratory tests on all types of blood and body fluid specimens under minimal supervision. Insures accurate and reliable test results by adhering to a strict quality control program. Performs instrument function checks and preventative maintenance procedures according to department’s policies and procedures. Maintains records and statistical data according to regulative requirements. Teaches new employees and students laboratory policies and procedures. Collects chain of custody urine drug screens as required. Performs breath alcohol testing as needed. Assists as needed in all laboratory areas as required to maintain appropriate patient care.

Education: BS degree from an accredited college or university preferred. Degree must be in Medical Technology or one of the biological or chemical sciences. Laboratoary training through an accredited laboratory school required.

Experience: One to two years experience preferred. Will accept a new grad.

Licenses/Certificates: Registration as a Medical Technologist, MT (ASCP), MT (AMT), HEW, CLS (NCA) required.

Bon Secours is an equal opportunity employer.

We’ll also reward your hard work with:

Comprehensive, affordable medical, dental and vision plans
Prescription drug coverage
Flexible spending accounts
Life insurance w/AD&D
An employer-matched 403(b) for those who qualify
Paid time off
Educational Assistance
And much more

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
01
Work Shift:

Nights

Department:

Laboratory - Clinical - Southside RMC - Petersburg

All applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, genetic information, or protected veteran status, and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability. If you’d like to view a copy of the affirmative action plan or policy statement for Mercy Health – Youngstown, Ohio or Bon Secours – Franklin, Virginia; Petersburg, Virginia; and Emporia, Virginia, which are Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employers, please email recruitment@mercy.com. If you are an individual with a disability and would like to request a reasonable accommodation as part of the employment selection process, please contact The Talent Acquisition Team at recruitment@mercy.com.",3.4,"Bon Secours
3.4","Colonial Heights, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1983,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
193,Data Engineer,$69k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Engineer will be responsible for expanding and optimizing our data and data pipeline architecture. The ideal candidate is experienced at data wrangling, enjoys data systems, and enjoys building things from the ground up. The data engineer will support the analytics teams at our client’s site by creating processes and programs to ingest the many unstructured files we receive, transform the data into a standard form and load it into the ecosystem. The right candidate will be excited with the prospect of optimizing and redesigning the client’s data architecture for the next set of data initiatives.
Use tools to build processes to extract, transform and load data from multiple sources
Assemble complex data sets that meet business requirements
Identify, design and implement processes to automate manual processes
Create structured datasets from unstructured data from multiple sources
Experience working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
QUALIFICATIONS
3-5 years of experience with SQL query language plus experience creating complex queries
3-5 years of experience with Hadoop; specifically, Hive, HiveQL and HDFS
3-5 years of experience building processes supporting ETL work
1-3 years of experience building and optimizing big data pipelines and data sets
1-3 years of experience with programming languages: Python, Scala, PySpark
Strong Analytical skills
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Information Systems or some other related field
OneMagnify powers business performance for its clients with actionable analytics, compelling marketing communications through brand strategy, and technology solutions for companies here and around the world. We think that’s pretty cool, making us an exciting place to work. But there is so much more to this employee-centric company. For example, it’s all the fun and important things we do—like our charitable giving team program, summer poker walks, quarterly cake day and, of course, the creative client solutions we deliver daily. It all stems from a culture of caring—for each other, our clients and the world around us.

OneMagnify is an equal opportunity employer.
OneMagnify is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.7,"OneMagnify
4.7","Dearborn, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1967,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
194,Data Analyst,$30k-$55k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are...

Connecting people in a more meaningful way is not just what BombBombs software delivers - its what drives our teams every day. Through simple, personal video, we aim to Rehumanize communication. Our team is resourceful and intelligent. Competitive and collaborative. Fun-loving and tenacious. Were close-knit and love adding new talent to the mix. If you are seeking a dynamic workplace and new challenges, we want to hear from you!

Who we're looking for...

A Data Analyst eager to learn and and collaborate with those around them to derive powerful data insights from large data sets. An Analyst who thrives on getting into the details and developing high quality reporting capabilities. An analyst who is committed to analyzing, organizing and gathering large amounts of data to discover new patterns and assisted in identify what data is important to the business.

What you will do...
Provide quality assurance of data in the data warehouse, by studying, cleaning, organizing, and resolving data weaknesses
Works with data engineers and business analysts to develop clarity, consistency, and unity in dimension and fact tables.
Create, organize, and maintain metadata. Make data assets understandable and usable for data consumers.
Collaborate with data engineers and organizational leaders to identify opportunities for process improvements and recommend opportunities for data source improvement.
Develop, manage, and monitor reports and dashboards in Tableau to ensure data quality and assistant is data validation
Presents data insights and recommendations to key stakeholders.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
How you'll do it...

Embody BombBombs core values: Relationships, Fun, Humility, Flexibility and Service
Analytical: Able to structure and process qualitative or quantitative data and draw conclusions from it.
Commitment to quality: Dedicated to ensuring accuracy and precision in daily tasks and projects.
Persistent: Tenacity and willingness to go the distance to get something done.
Teamwork: Reaches out to peers & supervisors to create a collaborative work environment.
Self-Starter: Motivated to take initiative on projects or tasks, assembling the resources required to complete the objective.
Communication: Communicate clearly, concisely, and courteously with the ability to give a detailed explanation if necessary.
Flexibility: Must be able to multitask in a fast-paced environment and adapt to new challenges as they arise.
Our ideal candidate will be or have...
Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Economics, or equivalent experience
1+ years of experience in data analytics, business intelligence, or other data and reporting environments
Strong SQL skills and experience in querying common databases like Oracle, Redshift (PostgreSQL), big data.
Experience with data visualization tools (Tableau, PowerBi, or Excel)
AWS familiarity (S3, DynamoDB, Athena, Redshift)
Data modeling, understanding of basic data warehouse concepts
BombBomb Benefits Package Includes...
Excellent Medical, Dental and Vision Benefits for you and your family (2 PPO + HSA option)
Flexible Paid Time Off program
7 paid holidays
401k Plan with employer match
Monthly company-catered lunch
Fun workplace: happy hour every Friday and company game room
Annual Education / Development for your career growth
Powered by JazzHR",4.1,"BombBomb
4.1","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
195,SENIOR CONSULTANT– DATA ANALYTICS GROUP,$65k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"SENIOR CONSULTANT– DATA ANALYTICS GROUP


Opinion Dynamics seeks a new team member to join our Data Analytics team. The Data Analytics group is a dynamic and tightly knit team of individuals from a range of backgrounds working closely together on analytically challenging and methodologically innovative consulting, advising, and research projects to support energy efficiency and grid-focused needs. Our ideal candidate enjoys data analytics/science, data mining and data munging, is a problem solver, can effectively operate and navigate a dynamic environment of a consulting firm, and is excited to work with a multidisciplinary team of data scientists, statisticians, data analysts, and programmers.

Opinion Dynamics is a firm known for the excellence of our team and our commitment to a corporate culture that fosters innovative thought, growth and enrichment opportunities, passionate employees, collegiality and collaboration.

What we are looking for in an ideal candidate
Demonstrated interest in energy, energy policy, or building science
Minimum Bachelor’s degree in engineering, quantitative social science, statistics, political science, economics, computer or data science, or related field
Two or more years’ work experience in analytics, ideally evaluating energy efficiency programs and/or performing other forms of longitudinal data analysis, OR higher educational attainment with relevant coursework
Strong programming skills in Python (including the standard data science stack)
Experience importing, cleaning, and manipulating large datasets (500,000+ records) in the context of analytical modeling
Experience with econometric modeling/statistical regression analysis, including model evaluation and validation best practices
Highly motivated, with a demonstrated track-record of thinking critically about your work and clearly communicating with other project staff and managers about your work
Strong written and oral communication skills, including the ability to communicate with clients as well as ability to work effectively with people at all levels in an organization
Ability to explain complex technical concepts to non-technical audiences.
Strong consulting and advising skills
Ability to juggle and prioritize multiple tasks and deadlines simultaneously and flexibly
Additional qualifications of value
Master’s or PhD in statistics, economics, engineering, or related field
Programming skills in other programming languages (R, Java, SQL etc.)
Experience with version control software (e.g. Git) and collaborative code development
Experience with machine learning methods
Demonstrated aptitude with data visualization tools and techniques (e.g. PowerBI, Tableau)
Experience working on a collaborative, cross-functional team
Location

Preferred: Waltham, MA (Company headquarters)

Other locations across Continental United States will be considered.

About Opinion Dynamics Corporation

Opinion Dynamics advances knowledge to address emerging energy and social issues

through sound and insightful research. Our inter-disciplinary team of consultants provides actionable research to support the needs of our clients, which include electric and gas utilities, regulators, and stakeholders. Our research and consulting services inform program planning and design, performance assessment, and optimization of energy efficiency, demand response, and renewable energy programs. Our company fosters innovative thought, collegiality and growth opportunities for our employees. The Data Analytics Group within Opinion Dynamics is especially focused on taking a data-driven approach to answering complex technical questions.

How to Apply:

To be considered for this position, please submit your cover letter (required) and resume with “Data Analytics Consultant” in the subject line. If contacted, please be prepared to complete analytical tests as part of the interviewing process; provide data analysis and writing samples that clearly demonstrate your experience and aptitude in the areas outlined above; as well as supply two or more references who can speak to your experience, work orientation, and work ethic.

No phone calls, please. Only those resumes accompanied by a cover letter will be considered. Opinion Dynamics is an affirmative action-equal opportunity employer.

Responsibilities
Qualifications


To be considered for this position, please send your cover letter and resume to:

Careers: Senior Consultant- Data Analytics Group

careersMA@opiniondynamics.com

Please submit a cover letter and resume to CareersCA@opiniondynamics.com.

No phone calls, please. Only those resumes accompanied by a cover letter will be considered. Opinion Dynamics will not provide sponsorship for work authorization for this position. Opinion Dynamics is an affirmative action-equal opportunity employer.",4.2,"Opinion Dynamics
4.2","Waltham, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
196,Machine Learning Senior Data Scientist,-1,"CodaMetrix is a well-capitalized and early-stage company focused on solving some of the more interesting problems in healthcare administrative and clinical areas. The company was formed by the Massachusetts General Physician Organization to help commercialize and build upon internally developed, and highly utilized AI-based applications.

CodaMetrix is led by proven entrepreneurs, technology and healthcare veterans, whose vision is to create a highly desirable atmosphere for technical talent to flourish and develop innovative, significant, reliable, and broadly utilized solutions.

As an early-stage company, specific responsibilities will evolve, and significant job expansion and promotion opportunities are available.
Job Description*
The Machine Learning Senior Data Scientist reports to the Senior Director of Machine Learning and AI. The machine learning team is responsible for the invention, analysis, and deployment of new machine learning techniques using healthcare data to improve administrative and clinical medicine.

This is a unique opportunity for a passionate individual about innovation in machine learning, and AI. This is a fast-paced, collaborative and iterative environment requiring quick learning, agility and flexibility.
Responsibilities*
Innovate, implement and test machine learning and deep learning techniques at scale.
Analyze the quality and calibration of predictive models.
Collaborate with machine learning and engineering team members for deployment of new machine learning techniques, and follow deployments tracking issues and successes.
Interface with medical coders, administrators, and physicians to understand the strengths and weaknesses of existing products and to help develop new machine learning-empowered products.
Requirements*
PhD in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field.
Excellence in technical leadership and working an independent individual contributor
Minimum of two years hands on experience with machine learning approaches and understanding of the analysis, testing processes of machine learning techniques.
Familiarity with deep learning approaches such as CNN, RNN and Reinforcement learning.
Minimum one year experience with cloud computing environment such as AWS
Hands on experience with databases and Elastic Search.
Proficiency in one or more of programming languages such as Python, or Java.
Demonstrated end-to-end project leadership.
Strong verbal, visual, and written communication skills.
Beneficial Experience*
Experience mentoring junior data scientists
Experience with AWS EC2, S3 and AWS SageMaker
Demonstrable experience with NLP applications.
Publications in major ML/NLP conferences, and/or participation in Kaggle or similar competitions
Some knowledge of US healthcare systems.
Location*
Boston, MA with the ability to work remotely.
Job Type*
Regular, full-time.
Compensation*
Highly competitive and commensurate with the level of experience.
EEO Statement*
_CodaMetrix is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. _

_Our company, as well as our products, are made better because we embrace diverse skills, perspectives, and ideas._

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
AWS: 2 years (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 2 years (Required)
Elasticsearch: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Doctorate (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.codametrix.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,CodaMetrix,"Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
197,Clinical Data Analyst,$52k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview:
The Clinical Data Analyst is responsible for assisting in the development and execution of the clinical strategy for new indications. The Clinical Data Analyst will analyze data from clinical publications and TrakStar and develop statistical models to support new indication submissions. The Clinical Data Analyst will also work with Marketing, Sales Operations and other cross-functional teams to provide TrakStar data analytics to support cross-functional department needs.

Essential Duties/Responsibilities:
• Use enterprise level analysis tools to gather and sort through data from TrakStar.
• Provide data tables and reports as requested by various departments.
• Perform a wide range of technical analysis on various data sets.
• Work with marketing to gather patient demographic data.
• Work with Sales Operations to gather MT, utilization and other data.
• Gather post market surveillance data to support regulatory filing requirements.

Education and Experience:
• Technical/Science or related Degree.
• Strong analysis skills; able to sort large amounts of information for significant data.
• Self-directed, resourceful, and able to get work done without significant input.
• Good organizational skills, attentive to details, and able to multitask.
• Strong problem-solving skills and ability to deal with changing priorities.

Preferred Skills:
• Experience with statistical methods used for clinical trials.
• Experience in medical research and/or development.

Physical Requirements
• Must be able to remain in a stationary position 50%-75%
• Walking/Bending/Stooping 50%-75% to access file cabinets, office equipment, etc.
• Light to moderate lifting (up to 50lbs)
• Some light travel maybe required by air, rail or auto within the United States",3.1,"Neuronetics
3.1","Malvern, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
198,Lending and Mortgage Data Analyst,$46k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why Provident

Provident Credit Union is member-owned, trusted, financially sound, technologically advanced, and provides ""world class"" value, convenience, products and services to all members. We are headquartered in Redwood Shores, CA and have 21 branches located throughout California, in the San Francisco Bay Area, and Folsom.

Job Summary:
Responsible for maintaining the effective day-to-day operations of all Lending Operating Systems (LOS).
Coordinate the installation of new software releases, system upgrades, patches and resolution of software related problems.
Perform a variety of tasks to assist in the development, integration and implementation of new application software to support Real Estate Lending, Consumer Lending, Accounting and Loan Servicing.
Enable control and maintenance of lending system records to support effective management analysis and safeguarding of information required to service loans.
Develop and maintain a coordinated working relationship with our Information and Technology (IT) department and outside vendors as required.
Coordinate the lending information needs of all departments and assist with training efforts as they relate to LOS.
This position will participate in real estate and consumer lending portfolio analysis, design and implement of budget forecasting models as well as improving process efficiency and system optimization


Specific Job Duties:
Be able to create basic business rules and conditions using Encompass 360 (GUI) and write more complex queries
Support the Lending Department through knowledge of the mortgage process (Encompass expert preferred)
Maintain and test system updates, and provide report writing (Tableau preferred).
Responsible for managing the accomplishment of the Credit Union's long-term objectives, strategies and policies, relevant to all lending systems in the Consumer, Collection, and Real Estate Lending areas.
Ensure compliance with up-time benchmarks as defined by each department.
Manage relationship between all vendors and internal customers, including the Information Technology department, working with all parties to ensure lending systems remain functional, up-to-date, and useful to users throughout the lending division.
Develops, in partnership with users, workflow processes, business rules, controls, reports, and interfaces with vendors, documents, and other tools to maximize efficiency and establish standards for high loan quality.
Ensure that our systems are secure, by providing timely access and restricting access, as instructed by department managers.
Actively participate in the development of the vision of the lending systems and their enhancements.
Create functional specifications for new or modified systems or processes. Recommend system improvements.
Gather and document business requirements, formulate use cases, track requirements, provide status, and ensure quality of solution throughout a project.
Develop test plans and pre-UAT testing, documenting and tracking issues, and ensure timely issue resolution, liaising between users and vendor support on rollout of new releases and enhancements.
Participate in the process of re-engineering systems and work flow in lending operational areas in order to ensure efficiencies whenever and wherever possible.
Make changes to systems as instructed by superiors. This includes the maintenance of documents, workflows, and processes.
Prioritize tasks to ensure that tasks affecting loan production are the top priority.
Participate in the design and implementation of analytical tools that improve the effectiveness of data used for making decisions. Contribute to the design and implementation of budget forecasting tools using statistical modeling and other techniques that result in less variability and higher accuracy in the budgeting process.
Participate in the design and implementation of portfolio management tools that improve pre-payment speed analysis, loss analysis, and credit granting criteria and processes.
Responsible for preparation and compliance with Change Management documentation and protocol.


Job Knowledge/Experience:
Knowledge of commonly used concepts, practices, procedures within Real Estate and Consumer Lending.
2 years of experience as an Analyst/Administrator working with Encompass 360 Loan Origination System preferred
Experience creating and editing custom input and output forms
Well versed in using Microsoft Access, Excel, and Word
Demonstrated project-management skills.
Oral and written communication skills.
Demonstrated research and analytical skills.


Education/Training and Preferred Skills:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Knowledge of Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Possess thorough knowledge of Real Estate Lending including documentation, compliance, forms and related system configurations and processes.
Complete required BSA & OFAC training annually.
Understand and adhere to BSA & OFAC policies and procedures, including reporting suspicious activity.
Working knowledge of:
Federal Lending Requirements
California Credit Union Law and Rules and Regulations
Provident Board Policies
NCUA Rules and Regulations
Department's policies and procedures
Ability to communicate clearly and with fortitude of purpose.
The position demands maturity, flexibility and someone ready to contribute at a high leveland enjoy the rewards come with it:
Fully paid health insurance premiums
Quality medical, dental and vision care coverage
401(k) retirement plan with matching employer contributions
Strong commitment to investing in your career and educational advancement by offering up to 100% tuition reimbursement for approved
Incentive plan
Generous paid time off and paid holidays
Flexible spending accounts
Short and long-term disability coverage
Life and AD&D insurance
Provident membership
Rate discount on home and auto loans
In-house training
And much more!
Provident is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are a winner of the Bay Area News Group Top Workplace in 2017, 2018 & 2019. Check us out on Glassdoor",3.9,"Provident Credit Union
3.9","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1950,Nonprofit Organization,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
199,"Associate Scientist, Clinical Development",$20k-$55k (Glassdoor Est.),"GENEWIZ is a leading global genomics service company and trusted provider for DNA sequencing, gene synthesis, molecular biology, next generation sequencing, bioinformatics, and GLP regulatory services. Our customers depend on GENEWIZ to achieve results in a rapid, cost-effective manner through specialized expertise and customizable, scalable services.

We are seeking an Associate Scientist I to join our Clinical Development Services department. This position will primarily be responsible for nucleic acid extraction, qPCR setup, and next-generation sequencing library preparation and is a great entry-level role with room for growth and advancement. If you have the desire to work in a casual yet results-driven environment that embraces innovation- then you’re just what we’re looking for!

Title: Associate Scientist I

Responsibilities:

Independently carry out nucleic acid extractions from a variety of sample types
Perform quantitative PCR (qPCR) set-up and data analysis
Prepare libraries for high-throughput sequencing
Carry out DNA sequencing on next-generation DNA analyzers
Perform routine maintenance of DNA analyzers and related equipment
Check inventory and replenish consumable sequencing supplies
Communicate with customers by phone and e-mail in a friendly and professional manner
Follow SOPs and guidance of supervisors
Be an effective team-player committed to company goals

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree in Biological Sciences required
1+ years biological lab experience is required
Experience working in a regulatory environment (e.g. CLIA/CAP, GLP, GMP, GCLP, and/or GCP) is highly desirable
Knowledge of standard laboratory processes
Follow and help to develop Standard Operating Protocol (SOP)
Strong communications/interpersonal skills, both verbal and written, and attention to detail are essential.

GENEWIZ is a leading global genomics service company and trusted provider for DNA sequencing, gene synthesis, molecular biology, next generation sequencing, bioinformatics, and GLP regulatory services. Our customers depend on GENEWIZ to achieve results in a rapid, cost-effective manner through specialized expertise and customizable, scalable services that contribute to the advancement of life sciences and technologies.

GENEWIZ employees have a winning attitude and champion innovation, teamwork and accountability through a results-oriented, customer-centric, and fun culture. We offer various health and financial benefits, learning opportunities, competitive compensation, rewarding bonus programs, and a wide range of work/life benefits designed to make your life easier.

EOE M/F/Disabled/VET",2.8,"GENEWIZ, Inc.
2.8","South Plainfield, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
